Hands down the best in greek. If you want to wine&dine/impress/close a deal you bring them here. Order the lamb. It has always been consistent.
We made online reservations to Evvia for a Sunday evening. There is a parking lot close to the restaurant. As soon as we arrived, we were greeted courteously and escorted to our seat. The restaurant ambience seemed very interesting, it had a rustic feel to it. We were served complimentary bread and olive oil. I wish the bread was warm. Our waitress was super friendly and she was very attentive in replenishing our bread and olive oil. For appetizers, we ordered Saghanaki and it was good. I ordered their popular Arnisia Paidakia (Lamb Chops) and my husband ordered Moschari Souvlaki (beef fillet). The lamb chops was well-seasoned, the meat was tender and it definitely lived up to its hype. We enjoyed the meal and would certainly like to return.
Highly over rated restaurant for no reason. Food was extremely OK, not worth going back for and definitely very highly priced. Not sure if I would pay so much only for the ambience.
We had just arrived in Palo Alto for a business trip and didn't have dinner reservations. We waited by the bar for a space to open up. It was taking longer than expected so the bartender, Pener, made a little area where we could stand and order drinks and appetizers while we waited. The food and wine was absolutely amazing. And Pener and the rest of the staff was incredibly helpful and nice.  I really wish they would open this restaurant in LA! I will definitely come back the next time I'm in Palo Alto.
With one of my buddies moving back into town, his fiance gathered a bunch of us together for a sort of "welcome back" dinner at Evvia.  With its warm, intimate feel and a full slate of customers filling all of the other tables, I was just as stoked they were able to fit all 16 of us as I was about trying the food! Since it was going to take a while for everyone to figure out what to get, my friend ordered a few plates of their dips/spreads to share - Taramosalata (fish roe), Melitzanosalata (eggplant), and Tzatziki with house made pita bread ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ).  Of the three, I thought the taramosalata was the best.  I liked the fish flavor over the eggplant in the melitzanosalata, and it was a little more unique than the tzatziki. For my entree, I decided to go with one of their signature dishes - Arnisia Paidakia (rib-cut, mesquite-grilled lamb chops with olive oil lemon roasted potatoes).  I'm not always a fan of lamb, but I thought these tasted great ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ).  Each bite was full of flavor and I really liked how the gaminess was kept to a minimum.  If it hadn't been a little overcooked, it would have been just about perfect. When it came time for dessert, I ordered the Ice Cream Sundae because I thought I had read/heard that the ice cream was Greek or something.  It didn't seem any different than regular ice cream, but it was pretty good and I loved the toasted hazelnuts on top ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ).  Expensive for a sundae ($12), but still good. While the food was pretty solid, the service is what keeps them from getting at least a four.  Personally, I didn't have a problem with the server other than him not being all that friendly.  My friend though, noted he was a little pushy with her about getting a few plates for the appetizer.  The fact he tacked on two plates of pita bread without telling her she was going to be charged didn't make her feel any better either (she was under the impression it was complimentary). After seeing all of Evvia's four and five star reviews, I felt a little bad for for giving just three stars.  Since it had more to do with the service though, I feel a little better about it.  Besides, I'll definitely be back to give them another chance.
This is a staple restaurant of dtown Palo Alto. I've been coming here ever since I was in middle school and it holds a very special place in my heart. I'm glad to say that it's been just as good as it was years ago. The lamb chops are their main dish, so if it's your first time here, definitely give them a shot and you'll be blown away. Their chicken and fish dishes are just as strong too. Pair it up with a nice glass of wine or cocktail and you'll have a great time. There's really not much to say about Evvia, other than just come already! If you're looking at a busy hour for dinner, then you'll definitely need a reservation or come early to grab one of their open tables.
Oh guys seriously? You didn't like Evvia?! I am a true food lover, and I'm so picky about the quality of everything I eat. Back in my country, my family gets the meat and diary products daily fresh only. This has made me be so watchful of my food. I've been living in Palo Alto for 5 years and this place is my most favorite restaurant not only in Palo Alto but in San Francisco. The food, the service, the quality and the ambiance are so good! That is the only place that I actually fulfill my desire for homemade type of food. Definitely recommended!! I go there at least once a week.
One of my favorite restaurants. Always have a great time here. It's a rather small restaurant, so I would highly advise making reservations for this restaurant. Friday and Saturday nights could require a minimum of 1 week to make reservations. Everything is good here. You really can't go wrong with anything on the menu. My favorites: Appetizers: 1) Spanakotiropita 2) Octopus 3) Lamb Riblets 4) Taramosalata, Tzatziki, Melitzanosalata 5) Horiatiki (Greek Salad) Entrees: 1) The whole fish. You can't go wrong with a branzino if it's available. In general if they have any Mediterranean fish, go for that. Lots of restaurants serve whole fish branzinos, but I think Evvia does it best. Tip: if you don't want them to open your fish, then you should tell them to keep it closed 2) Lamp Chops - best lamp chops I've eaten 3) Moscharisia Brizola - Delicious rib-eye Dessert: 1) Galaktoboureko  - this one is my favorite 2) Sokolatina - really good Things I do not like about the location: 1) In the winter, you want to sit far from the entrance door and some of the windows, where cold air can leak in 2) The chairs are not comfortable at all 3) The place is real small and it can get kind of cramped in there depending on the table you get. I have changed tables many times, if I they get seated in a very cramped up area 4) I don't like sitting next to the kitchen. It gets real hot and your clothes will smell 5) You need to plan to go here, because it's always packed My 5 star rating is on the food and service and not the location itself, because I wish they had a larger location. I guess that's why they have kokkari. Kokkari is their sister restaurant, but is located in San Francisco.
No need to review..but here goes! In a word, amazing! beautiful ambiance, fabulous food and attentive service. (I had no idea they were Kokkari's sister location, but it makes sense. They are excellent as well) We were seated nearly an hour later than our reservation. The place was packed! But the manager was very attentive,and funny and sent us some spanakopita (wayyyy better than Trader Joes ;) it was delicious I had the lamb shank with orzo. It was phenomenal. And i'm not a lamb lover... Not gamey, aromatic, spiced wonderfully, and fall off the bone tender. We also had the grilled octopus and special heirloom salad, both excellent. The desserts were also delicious.  The warm chocolate cake and the custard thingy with ice cream! Delicious!  (So good, we ordered another round of each!) No wonder Zooey Deschanel (what a snobby B* she was! All you had to do was smile for ONE picture) was seated next to us. This is a fabulous place. And trust me, i'm an elite :)
This is one of the more popular restaurants in downtown Palo Alto. Making a reservation ahead of time definitely helps securing a table, even on weekdays! There is street parking as well as parking in public surface lots that are usually free after 6 pm. Valet parking is $6. Octapodaki tou Yiorgou - Excellent and outstanding! The octopus is fresh and perfectly cooked. Tender and non-rubbery. A must-try! Arnisia Paidakia - Lamb chops are the reason to come to Evvia! My 3 lamb chops were medium rare as requested and came with 3 pieces of roasted potatoes. They were perfectly flavored and cooked! Galaktoboureko - This dessert was heavenly! The phyllo dough wrapped vanilla was delicious and not too sweet! The pistachio ice cream had a unique crunch! Service was excellent by the waittress.
Saw all the great reviews about lamb chops at this place that I had to take the opportunity to give... Read more 
This small restaurant in Palo Alto is nice for a special dinner out or romantic night out. There are a number of appetizer dishes to order from. The lamb is particularly good at this restaurant. We ordered a vegetable appetizer, lamb meatballs, and split their lamb dinner as our main. We enjoyed Greek Ouzo for our drink as well as ended the meal with Greek Coffee. Overall good place. Since it is popular, its a bit of a noise level - you can still have a conversation but its a tad noisy. They have jammed more tables in as well. There is valet parking for $6.00 - but given we found a free parking spot directly across the street from the restaurant, we parked there instead. Reservations are highly recommended for this restaurant.
I have been here 2 times in the past month during lunch.  WOOOOOOOOOOOOWZA.... its good :) I had the Chicken SLovaki 2 times and it was great both times. Here is some other fun information.  I am not a fan of feta cheese and this being a Greek Restaurant it LOVES FETA.  I had the Spanakopia (Is that how you spell it?)  and it had Feta and it was good - I am alive and well and wouldnt mind having it again. Another reason I gave this place 5 stars is because of their service... The manager is a good guy.. he had a full house (they even do lunch reservervations) during lunch and didnt have room for walk ins... but he made a space for us and we did not feel rushed.  KUDOS! Try this place out, you wont be disapointed.
Lamb chop is great.
Came here on a Wednesday for the wife's bday and only could get a 2100 reservation for 2 the day of.  I knew it would be busy, and boy was I right.  We were sat around 2115 after being early by 10 minutes; not cool.  We were greeted by Brent who did fantastic the entire night by the way.  We had the following: Drinks: Long Island-strong and sweet; skinny girl margarity-tasty and strong. Appetizers: Fresh calamari with a tomato spice dipping sauce.  The calamari was rubbed with something similar to old bay.  It was tasty.  If you are a calamari person; order this.  We also ordered the Octopus based on our fellow Yelpers recommendations.  As usual=WIN.  10 or so inch long pieces on a small plate shared slightly and tender.  Came with drizzled lime juice and olive oil.   Thanks yelp! Entree:I ordered the Lamb Shank and the wife ordered the Rib-eye.  We got exactly what we were looking for; american food with a greek touch.  The lamp shank came in something similar to an Au Jue(sp?) sauce and orzo.  Im not a big orzo guy, but based on what my wife said, its the best she has had since her ex's mom's who was greek...lets say I didn't dig into that one and just nodded :)  The meat fell off the bone and tasted exactly what you would think a well cooked piece of lamb would taste like.  I probably won't get this again, but I wanted to try it.  The wife's Rib Eye was cooked to perfection and was gigantic.  We couldn't figure out what the flavors were, but we  know it had olive oil on it.  It almost had a basil flavor to it, but like I said, we couldn't figure it out and didn't ask.  Either way, it tasted great, but to me it was a little over powering. For dessert we had the amazing amazing amazing, did I say amazing?  Get the Gigantic Burrito dessert.  This is a total misnomer and I am 100% sure I don't even know the name of it, but wow.  Mediterranean to the T!  Two flaky custard filled (taquito looking things) with a pesto ice-cream.  The warmth and texture of the bread and custard go perfect with the coolness and flavors of the ice-cream. Overall the ambiance was loud and I got tired of hearing snobby Stanford people talk about all the money and PHD's they have, but the restaurant is set up nice and classy.  I would have given this place a 3, but Brent our server made the night special for my wife with a candle in our dessert and great conversation.  That guy should get promoted!  4 it is!
Went here with a group a few nights for a friends going away. It is definitely a popular place. We had reservations on a Monday at 6 and the place was packed when I got there.  I had been wanting to try this place since its a sister restaurant of Kokkari in SF. The food- I personally thought the apps were the best part of the meal. I love the dipping sauces and spreads. I could literally just have had these for my meal and been perfectly happy. Based on the table of empty plates - the lamb chops were a big hit as well as the locally caught fish of the day. I don't know if its b/c I went here after 2 weeks of eating well in Italy- but I thought my steak kebab was good but not amazing -#firstworldproblems. But overall a great place thats worth trying if you're in PA
I came here to celebrate my birthday with a close group of friends. The service was top notch. Food was amazing. We had a variety of appetizers and entrees and loved every single dish. Can't wait to be back. If you are looking for a special place to celebrate a special event in a classy atmosphere- that's the place to go.
Been meaning to try this place for a long time, and finally came here for a friend's birthday. The ambience inside is romantic, rustic and we were seated promptly and got a close view of the grill. The service was excellent here. Our party got a bunch of appetizers. TRY the Grilled octopus! It is chewy, and slightly charred but oh, so delicious! We also had some fried okra, as well as calamari. The lamb shank with orzo and lamb chops were very tasty. The phyllo crust dessert is worth it just to come for it. Would love to come back for another special occasion.
My boyfriend and I had dinner here one night with a group of friends. I had a semi-high level of expectation for this place when I read all the great reviews on Yelp...I even anticipated the possibility that I might order their famous lamb chops even though I'm totally NOT a lamb fan! We (boyfriend and I) dressed up a little because it said "dressy" on Yelp, but most people were in semi-casual attire when we arrived. The wait was shocking because we arrived quite late for dinner and they still had people lining out the door for a table (good thing we made a reservation!). The service was alright - he took the time to describe all the specials for the night and was semi-attentive for the rest of the night. I kind of expected it because we had a large party and that usually makes the waiters keep a distance to avoid having to wait on you so much. [ appetizers ] 1. Spanakotiropita - tasted a lot like the ones from Costco...I wonder if they just buy them in bulk (I hope not!). Totally did NOT justify the arm + leg they charge you for 2 tiny little pieces (I can get a ginormous box from Costco that'll last me a month for what we paid for this dish & it'll taste just the same). 2. Octapodaki tou Yiorgou - this was an interesting dish that we got instead of calamari. I have to admit that this dish was pretty well done - usually octopus gets overdone (and tastes super hard and nasty) at most restaurants when I order them. 3. Anginares Souvlaki - good preparation of artichokes/eggplants...I actually enjoyed this dish even though I'm not a fan of either vegetable! 4. wild mushrooms (not listed on menu) - this was a special appetizer for the night...again, great preparation of mushrooms because I usually dislike the taste mushrooms have when they're cooked. [ entrees ] 1. Psari Psito - their fish special for the night. This was my dish and I thought the fish was very well done - very tender and they actually managed to carefully  remove the bone without ruining the integrity of the fish. That was also their downfall in this dish - my very first bite included a long bone that was NOT removed and it cut me pretty badly. That basically traumatized me for the rest of the dish so I couldn't enjoy it all that much for the rest of my meal. 2. Moschari Souvlaki - my boyfriend's dish...I was originally going to get this but because he's more of a beef fan, I picked fish instead. The beef was good but it was a little hard at times. It was also seasoned a little too powerfully because I felt like I needed a lot more rice to accompany the beef... 3. Arnisia Paidakia - this is their famous lamb chop. I got a few bites from one of our friends that ordered it. I thought it was pretty good...I can still taste the gaminess, but definitely NOT as much as any other lamb I've had in the past. Still not a converted fan, but I can't deny that it was well-prepared. Overall, I thought this place was just okay...nothing really stood out and nothing really tasted all that bad. I'm not sure if this place is really all it's hyped up to be, that's for sure...and I definitely would not come back (unless we're invited again...even then, it's a maybe) just so I can pay an arm and a leg for mediocre food!
Best Greek restaurant, cannot wait to go back soon!
This is my favorite restaurant!! They have delicious food and great service. I have never had anything bad from here. They're a little pricy but totally worth it. I would recommend getting the dips and pita as an appetizer. The tzatziki here is the BEST. Entree wise, everything I have tried has been great. You can't go wrong. Now for the best part. The dessert. I literally have dreams about their galaktoboureko. It's INCREDIBLE. If you go here, be sure to save room for it!!
Went in a few weeks ago with a friend. We ordered the lamb and some appetizers (did not taste very fresh, and the appetizers came out way too quickly and way too hot). Both of us woke up the next morning with, to put it politely, stomach issues. Will not be patronizing this place again.
I think if I had to pick one restaurant in the Bay Area that always delivers on service, food and atmosphere, I would have to pick Evvia as my personal favorite. There are lots of great choices but the service is so cheerful, knowledgable and never overbearing. And the food always seems to be done right with just the right char, the right doneness, the right mix of the bright and the spicy to make me grin with pleasure. It is a bit loud and crowded and there never is enough space at the bar and still I love the open air feel of the place in the warm months and the cozy kitchen atmosphere in the cold months.  A truly wonderful place!
I have been to Evvia several times and find that the food is not as uniformly great as most reviewers rave about. There are many menu items I have not tasted, but here is my assessment so far. The strength of this restaurant lies in its lamb dishes. The lamb chops are perfectly seasoned and grilled, and live up to the lavish praise they receive. The lamb shank is also a powerhouse for those who like Meat with a capital M (there's only a bed of orzo and no vegetables to accompany the shank). As appetizers, the lamb meatballs and lamb riblets are also good. Next in line is the seafood. The whole fish is usually a good bet. The octopus and calamari appertizers are decent, though not as succulent and tender as you'd get in Greece (then again, the Mediterranean isn't exactly around the corner). Thumbs up for serving taramosalata, which is made with fish roe and not commonly found on the menus of Greek restaurants in the US. Further down the list is the chicken souvlaki, which was surprisingly dry and bland the one and only time I tried it. Even more surprising in that the moussaka, the most well known Greek dish, is way below average. It's served in an earthenware pot, it's heavy and greasy, and completely misses the delicate blend of flavors that should be created when eggplant, potato, ground lamb, tomato sauce, and bechamel sauce get together. At the bottom of the barrel are a couple of appetizers that made me scratch my head: fried okra for $9.75 and French Fries (oh sorry, Greek fries, because they have feta on top) for $7.50. So, yes, Evvia can be fantastic, but please order wisely!
Good food but overpriced. I liked the ambiance and the service, yes.  But it's too expensive for the quality of the food.  It was good, but not the best i've ever had. Probably won't be back.
If you find a table there, you will have a great experience. It's actually the be best Greek restaurant in Palo alto with a very interesting yet affordable wine list . Try their Lamb Rib and Octopus as appetizer. The Whole fish wood oven roasted is always good.
One of the Peninsula's most loved restaurants and for good reason.  I've been to Dio Deka and had been to Evvia years ago, but it was nice to revisit.  Haven't had a chance to go to Kokkari though. Service is top notch and the atmosphere is nice, but comfortable.  The entrees are all well explained and everything we had was hearty and satisfying.  I was planning on having the lamb chops, but a friendly diner at the next table who had just returned from Greece recommended the moussaka. Never would have ordered it as it sounded very plain, but it reminds me of advice I once heard about menus: order the most homely sounding dish because if it's on the menu, there is a very good reason. It worked out this time as well.  The Moussaka was creamy, delicious and had wonderful ground lamb meat mixed with creamy potatoes.  It was quite similar to a shepherd's pie, but much better. We also enjoyed the dessert.  Baklava crumbled and mixed with their ice cream.  No doubt they use their day old baklava if I were to guess, but it's still heavenly and was the perfect ending for a great meal.  Entrees are pricey here, but the food portions are generous and well prepared.  Reservations are a must. Evvia accepts all credit cards, including American Express.
I love the lamb chops. The appetizer menu was so appetizing that I ordered tapas style. I welcomed all recommendations from my waiter John. Next time, I will increase my party size and order more entrees to share.
I arrived in late into SF, and this was the kitchen that opened the latest in downtown Palo Alto. We got the oven roasted asparagus and wood oven baked prawns. Both were great, but unmemorable compared to the lamb chops that were probably THE BEST lamb chops I have ever had. Perfectly done medium, flavorful, and just right. Before I fully recovered from my lamb chop delirium, I had the "Galaktoboureko" AKA the Galactic Burrito. This dessert blew my socks off. Really, do not skip this, no matter how full you are from the previous courses. Every component of the dish was to die for. Probably the best dessert I have gotten at a restaurant that doesn't specialize in dessert.
YUM! Been to this place twice and haven't been disappointed yet. The food is amazing and the atmosphere is warm and comfortable. The service is exceptional and always very professional - even the owner is bussing tables! Highly recommend for a great dining experience.
Evvia is a poplar spot in downtown Palo Alto and for good reason.  They've got great food, ambiance, and service.  If you plan on showing up for dinner unannounced expect to wait a bit. Service is always good when I've gone so no issues here. Staples when I come here include... Apps: If you're adventurous I definitely suggest trying out the grilled octopus.  It's just grilled to perfection and oh so tender.  The Pita Spread and calamari are also safe bets. Entree: They always always have grilled fish.  You can usually choose from a few fish to be cooked in this manner.  It's excellent and should be tried at least once.  If you're not a seafood person there's always grilled meat, soups, or salads. Dessert: I'm not a dessert person so it's rare that I'll get any.  I DO like to finish off the meal with one of their coffees.  It's pricy at $5 for a smallish cup, but the place is just pricier overall.  I'd go Metrio or lighter on the sugar.  Even Metrio is pretty sweet and there's supposed to be the mud at the bottom of the cup so don't pop it all back.  Dont' say I didn't warn you. If you're in the area and want to try some excellent Greek food or just want to treat yourself to a nicer dining experience in the PA area.  This is one of the top spots in my book.
From NY so expect an East Coast bias. First, they have valet parking, which is a gem for that area. Decor is fabulous, fits the Greek theme, lots of attention to detail, and not overly cluttered.  Linen tablecloth service. Appetizers, Meatballs, Mussels and Watermelon Salad were all excellent and a good size portion. Dinner, I had the Lamb Chop and my friend had the Whole Fish, great as well. Good portion, tasted excellent. Staff is very attentive, polished, 4.5 star service. The only thing keeping me from a 5 is that the bar is tiny.   Like honey I shrunk the kids tiny.  The bartender himself was unbelievable and very on top of managing logistics as we ate at the bar and he cleared people out and a spot for us. We didn't have reservations and didn't mind waiting for a bar seat.  But it seats 7 and there's no room to really stand.  Great wines - but it's California, to be expected. Highly recommended.
Evvia is one of my favorite places to visit but be warned, you will need reservations and a big wallet to have a good time here. I had dinner last Saturday night and the wait staff was fantastic! My date and I had heard nothing but raves for this place and they definitely lived up to expectations. It's a big small for such a popular spot but that's not a bad tradeoff for amazing food. Can't wait to go back!
I have always loved Evvia since they opened many years ago! Amazing Greek food to die for
The main problem with Evvia is to be able to book a table... once you do, things are pretty easy going... We got our table as soon as we walked in at the time of our reservation. A super friendly greek waiter took care of us and recommended a nice greek wine made from one of those obscure grapes. It was very original and we all loved it. We tried several appetizers with clear winners being the octopus and the lamb ribs... i had the grilled fish of the day which was simply but very nicely prepared. The atmosphere of the place is heartwarming, exuberant and very noisy... not the best place if you are trying to close a delicate business deal or to have a sweet romantic dinner... but it is great to clean your head from a day of meetings, enjoying life, food and wine ...
Super busy restaurant, so make a reservation! So the food: all the appetizers were quite small in size, similar to tapas-serving sizes: fried zucchini balls - the best appetizers that we had. :) It wasn't overly greasy and was quite tasty octopus - it had a citrus kick to it the beans (Gigantes) - served on a hot plate. I have no idea how they seasoned it but it was delicious For entree, I ordered the whole fish. It was a huge fish! They grill the fish in salt and other seasoning, de-boned it and served whole. Dessert was my favorite part. The Galaktoboureko was the best! It's phyllo wrapped vanilla bean custard with a side of pistachio ice cream. One of the best desserts I've ever had. So remember to save room for dessert!
Food:  The food was either delicious or just not good (see below).  We also split a bottle of a Malbec and it was very good and a good value (I think $38). 1) Melitzanosalata (Appetizer) - chopped eggplant served with warm pita bread--it was delicious 2) Kokinisto me Manestra (Lamb Shank with Orzo) - super tender and falls right off the bone, great taste and a surprisingly large piece of meat 3) Moussaka (Baked casserole with eggplant, lamb ragout, potatoes & yogurt bechamel) - my friend had this and it was just OK.  I was never a big fan to begin with but this didn't really change my mind about the entree.  I'd get something else. Service:  No complaints. Value:  They're expensive, no denying that, but it's a higher end restaurant.  All in all, came to $150 for 2 people for an app, 2 entrees, and a bottle of wine with tax and tip.  Also, we had 2 drinks at the bar while waiting and that came to $25. Atmosphere:  In a word: crowded.  We walked in at 9:45 on a Thursday with a reservation and still had to wait at the bar for 15 min.  The space is really nice and inviting.  It's loud inside because of the number of people. Conclusion:  Overall very good food (but I'd stay away from the Moussaka) and a bit expensive.  Don't forget to make reservations and expect to wait anyway.
I'm not saying Evvia is bad, because it isn't. But if you want my five stars you have to wow me at your price level and Evvia didn't. Let's get pricing out of the way first. We're talking high-end prices for food that's basically Greek street food. A main of grilled chicken breast served with a variety of vegetables is priced close to $20. At that price, with those ingredients, it really has to amaze, and it doesn't. It's good, really well done, but not fabulous. Likewise for everything else that Evvia serves: simple ingredients, done well. So it's a 3 star. For that kind of pricing, I expect amazing.  That said, service was great and everything was tasty. Go if you don't care about the price.
Extremely underwhelmed by my meal at Evvia. I went with a group and ended up piecing together a meal of several appetizers. I personally liked the saghanaki but everyone else at the table found the fried cheese too heavy for anything more than a small bite. The galaktoboureko (dessert) was probably the best thing we had. Add in the fact that the service was really slow and the meal was paced oddly added to a less than stellar experience. Obvious miscommunications in terms of clearing of plates and serving of appetizers (one took a long time to come out and another was served twice). At the price point that Evvia is charging it should be a much stronger meal. I left wondering exactly what it was we paid so much for.
Highly over rated. They tried to put me at a back corner table next to a hot grill when there were at least 5 other tables for 2 open  I have had greek food at all the great greek spots and this food is good but no way deserves the ratings it gets here.
This is probably my overall favorite restaurant in Palo Alto  It has a great cozy ambiance. Great place to go with a date or with a couple of friends. The food is to die for. Staples are the Brazino (white fish grilled to perfection with olive oil. lemon, and braised greens. Also enjoy the grilled octopus, zucchini cakes, and hummus platter for apps. Beef Soulvaki is great if you are craving red meat and comes with a delicious oily basil and veggie orzo. These plates are so good that I always find myself repeated the same order. Make sure to save room for desert. The custard filled phyllo with pistachio ice cream is probably my favorite desert ever! (And I have a big sweet tooth ;p )  Again, reservations are a must!
After hearing rave reviews about this place for years, and watching friends take their sig. others out here for special occasions during my college years, I finally got to try out Evvia for myself for a  work lunch.  As a disclaimer, I'm not a big fan of Mediterranean food... I really liked the ambiance, with the table settings, white tablecloth, and overall classy environment. The pita with spreads were amazing.  Soft, fluffy, delicious pita...mmmmm.  I wasn't as big of a fan of the Dolmathes, but that's probably more due to personal preference rather than a knock on Evvia. I got the beef souvlaki entree.  The meat was flavorful but a bit dry and overcooked. I really liked the Cretan rice that came with the dish. Service was pleasant, though a bit slow.  We waited around for the drink refills and check to come.  Overall, very good food (though still probably not my top choice of a restaurant because of my relative aversion to Mediterranean) but also quite pricey.  I generally reserve paying this kind of price for a restaurant that is truly remarkable/special/Michelin rated
Friends' reviews, Elites' reviews, non-friends' reviews, and enemies' reviews all had one thing in common: eat the lamb.  In fact, I think I saw a vegetarian recommend the lamb.  I would have to back through all 900 or so reviews to figure that out.  If you do, let me know, but until then I will work under the assumption that even vegetarians are recommending the lab from Evvia.  AND THEY SHOULD!  The lamb is a dish you do not want to miss.  You don't necessarily have to order the lamb, but someone at your table does, and you must take a bite. The waiter was a bit arrogant, making the bold statement that Evvia served the best food in town.  Well, he may also have been right!  I don't eat everywhere in Palo Alto, but of those I have visited, this is the best. When I order wine, especially when I do not know many specific bottles on the menu, I like to create a short list of things that sound interesting.  I was all over the map this time, with French, a couple Italian, and even a Greek wine making the cut.  Waiter recommended and I went with a 1er Cru to go with the lamb.  Damn was that a good choice.  Not only was the wine affordable and excellent, it made a great pairing with the food.  What did you expect, tho, really?  I'm sure you weren't reading this and thinking "oh, that will NEVER work".  So, it wasn't groundbreaking.  It was still a whole lot of awesome in my mouth. The dessert was good, and almond ice cream is something special.  A good, light dessert after that crazy meal.  It makes a good way to finish off the meal.  You probably want to have it with coffee, although they have a nice selection of dessertifs on the menu.  I did not partake, for once.  Cocktail hour before dinner plus the excellent wine was plenty.
3.5 Stars - I had to round down, however, due to my disappointment in the service. I threw my boyfriend a "Welcome to NorCal!" party here and we had a large party - 16 to be exact. So of course, there was a mandatory 20% gratuity. While the server was friendly, he was a bit pushy about ordering appetizers for the entire table. After he convinced us to order dip for the table (came out to $40 total) and also brought us two extra plates of pita bread without notifying us that it was $4.50/plate. We assumed it was complimentary. Aside from that, I enjoyed the food -- many people ordered the Lamb Short Ribs based on the good reviews and it was indeed, really really good. They meat was very tender and did not taste gamey. For dessert, the Sokolatina is a must have. I opted for the Strawberry Fruit Tart, which was good, but not nearly as special as the Sokolatina! The ambiance is also really nice. There is a cozy, but upscale feel. There is a partially open kitchen, which is also fun to have in a restaurant! Other than slightly disappointing service, I enjoyed my time here.
If you love lamb you have to come here. They had four different lamb dishes on the menu and we had three of them at our table. They were all delicious. I have never been a huge fan of Greek food but this place has won me over. The food was delicious from starters to dessert and the ambiance of the restaurant was great.
This place is straight-up amazing. Went here with a good friend raved about how amazing this place was, and well, she didn't lie.  Not one bit. Made a reservation in advance, and were seated immediately. Been here a couple times now, and never been disappointed.  I've gotten lamb both times (my favorite) and I'm pretty mostly fairly 100% sure I'm in love with this place.  I had the most delicious mushrooms as an appetizer this one time, and I honestly would've gotten full off of mushrooms, if not for the the lamb that awaited me. Service was very very good.  They clearly cared about your experience there, and the restaurant in general wasn't too formal. Price was a little steep but reasonable considering I did order the best lamb of my life.
lamb sandwich + galaktoboureko= heaven. I would eat here every day if I could
been here a few times with my babe...LOVE this place. i have never had anything subpar here. darling... Read more 
LAMB CHOPS!!! I'm only a fan because of their lamb chops! They never seem to disappoint me!! If it's your first time dining here, the only thing you need to get is the LAMB CHOPS, not the Lamb Shank! I promise you, it'll be worth it! :) This place is always, always crowded and super noisy on any given night. We had 9:30pm reservations on a Saturday for my birthday dinner and the place was still packed!! We came a little before 9pm and they were able to immediately seat us! It was unusual that the owner of the restaurant had to come and talk to our table telling us that they're going to make room for this big group that's going to occupy our section. The owner offered us free dessert, so we said sure. But I kinda wished the big loud group didn't take up so much room or come at all. We felt really cramped by our table and annoyed. The group was extremely loud and obnoxious, making the free dessert and experience not really worth it. =\ FYI- On another note, I've noticed whenever I make opentable reservations via yelp. I don't get any dining points from opentable. Booo. So if you want your opentable points, I recommend booking it through the opentable app on your smartphone or through the opentable website (NOT YELP).
The only two things you need to order from this restaurant are the lamb chops and galaktoboureko... Read more 
Great food and they pair the wine with the food you would order... I must say they have really nice collection.. Best idea would be to have a reservation before you come to the restaurant . Grilled octopus and lamb chops are to die for. For the dessert I ordered Galaktoboureko, it's phyllo wrapped vanilla bean custard which is absolutely YUMM! Awesome food right from starter to dessert.
Have to give this place 5 STARS after last night's meal.  Everything was extremely well prepared and so very tasty to the palate.  We both had the lamb chops which simply are the best, ever.  They marinate them overnight and then cook them over a charcoal grill with special rub added to them.  One bite and you are in heaven.  Accompanied so very nicely with glasses of Hendry's zinfandel. What a treat! Had the romaine salad as a starter.  Lettuce was crisp, fresh and dressing so yummy. Desserts were the baklava with ice cream, and a warm chocolate cake with sour cherry ice cream. They had some great fish specials that I shall try on return visits. Extensive menu with something for everyone. Doesn't get any better than this.  Be sure to make reservations in advance. because the word is out.  My friend was there on a Monday night, and it was packed. Highly recommended!
THE LAMB CHOPS LIVE UP TO THE HYPE......they are BEYOND AMAZING...... We have been wanting to try Evvia for while and finally went with our friend Jen.  Here is what we had..... Appetizers - Kolokithokeftethes - crispy zucchini cakes with cucumber & mint yogurt Soutzoukakia - grilled lamb meatballs with tomato & green olive compote [featured on Food Network's "the Best Thing I Ever Ate"] Entrees - Ravioli - cheese & herb ravioli with sweet onion, kale, roasted butternut squash & pumpkin seed oil Hirini Brizola - mesquite grilled pork chop with sweet potato gratin & Evvia dressing Arnisia Paidakia - rib-cut, mesquite-grilled lamb chops with olive oil lemon roasted potatoes Dessert - Galaktoboureko - traditional phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream Everything was delicious - but my favorites were the lamb meatballs, the lamb chops (obviously), and the dessert.  Can't wait to go back and try a few more items Minuses - restaurant is popular, so it was a bit tough to get a reservation.
Wow. It is a high end Greek restaurant. Appetizers are wonderful and also wonderfully pricey cuz you don't get very many but the quality is amazing. Tzatziki - very, very yummy. I like that they make their own pita. Souvlaki or kebabs are heavily seasoned.  I'm a big kebab person but I like to be able to taste what I'm eating, not just the after taste of a lot of seasoning. The lamb shank is very good -  moist and off the bone good. If you're a fan of lamb shanks - believe me when I tell you that I've never had a bad lamb shank at any restaurant that has them on their menu. I wonder why that is???? For ambience - the place is packed and noisy. If it was quieter, it would be quite different. We felt fortunate to have a booth so it seemed to have a little more privacy. I would definitely go back - but if someone else is paying.
Nothing less than what you'd expect from a high-end Palo Alto restaurant. The ambiance is really well done -- rustic chic style with hanging garlic wreaths, a visible kitchen, natural wood floors and furniture and high ceilings. Our server was really friendly and knowledgeable about the food and wine. This is what we got - Appetizers: Charred octopus, wild mushrooms and greek fried cheese, crispy fried smelts Main Courses: dry-aged beef, lamb special with different types of cuts, grilled mediterranean bass, and grilled petrale sole. Dessert: homemade greek yogurt with honey, dates, and walnuts and local strawberry tart a la mode. A lot of food for 4 people! The food was pretty excellent. I think for the price though, it could've been even better. The Sole was a tad under seasoned and over cooked, so it had a slightly unpleasant chewy texture. The smelts were good, but maybe they weren't fried at a high enough temperature because they were greasier than I expected. Also, the tart could've used more strawberries and less crust (it was more like a strawberry dumpling). Our total with wine, coffee, a cup of tea and tip was a little over $300.
I wanted to try Evvia for a long time, so when a friend of mine suggested we meet in Palo Alto for dinner, I knew exactly where I wanted to go. This restaurant is beautiful, the service is attentive, and they have great selection of wine and beer and a full bar.  I liked everything we ordered off the appetizer menu and our desserts were great (we shared).  The hiccup came when the main dishes arrived.  Outside of the lamb chops (which were cooked well, but for me lacked seasoning to make them outstanding), the other lamb (slow cooked, different cuts), the chicken and the halibut at our table, were done ok but not special enough to carry such hefty price tags.  For something that came to about $175 per couple, our meal just wasn't that spectacular. I will come back here again, but I think this time I will stick with the appetizer menu.
This review is not for food, but for the service. i came here for dessert.  made reservation at 9, didn't get seated till 9:25!  as soon as we sat down, waitress delivered some bread.  i said i'm here for dessert only.  c'mon i'ts so late already.  but she looked very surprised and seemed to blame me and said, "you don't make reservation if you want dessert only.  You just go straight to the bar!"  what's worst is she took away the bread immediately!  such poor attitude and don't show respect to your customers!  look at the big picture.  what's so expensive about the bread!  it's the bad impression you leave to your customers.  i did the same thing at Alexander Steakhouse which is also a popular restaurant and they are happy to deliver me not only the bread, but chef sampler even though i said i'm here for dessert only. i ended up giving them big tips.  I hope Evvia will learn a lesson and treat their customers with respect... their famous custard dessert is good, but not THAT great.
On days like Friday last, when the temperature lets you wear just what you want under a deep blue sky in pleasant company it's almost easy to forget the rest of the world, the troubles, the strife, the discontent. Evvia conspires to help make this happen.  And I suppose it's not a bad thing, to take to a carefully prepared delicious meal laid before you by smiling articulate beautiful attendants.  To let this meal pull you out of the swamp and gently with fluffy towels a light brush of your hair and a story lullaby all of it straight away. I only had lunch.  Shared a perfect Greek salad, looked at the lamb souvlaki, had me a delicate gyro like thing but more delicately prepared and presented with love.  For two hours I wasn't here.  I was there.  Just there. Radius test - Evvia is five stars from anywhere in the Bay Area.  Maybe in combination with a classic film in the art house down the street.  Romantic.  Delicious. Just do me this favor.  After your evening of loveliness, after you kiss her goodnight, just for a second remember this - on the other side of Highway 101 lives East Palo Alto.  EPA doesn't get to go to Evvia.
My mom and I decided to pop in here for lunch last week.  We were seated immediately.  The service from Anthe was fast, friendly and very efficient. To start we had the fried calamari.  It was probably the best I've every had.  Super fresh, flavorful and it came with a wonderful dipping sauce. We both had the chicken kabobs which were outstanding.  They were cooked perfectly and the seasonings were outstanding. It was my mom's b-day and they comped her any dessert she wanted.  The strawberry tart with creme fraiche ice cream was amazing. In short, this was a perfect lunch.
We celebrated daughter's birthday here last night per recommendation of son, everyone had a wonderful time. Evvia is 4.5 stars in every measure, from the ambiance, service to the food, (oh the food).... if I had to find something to complain about, it's how 'unfriendly' the menu is designed on it's website. I usually research the menu before going to a higher end restaurant, not easy here..... hopefully they can make it better to 'perfect' the total customer experience. Parking can be challenging, we opted to do the valet for $6, very friendly service and a great start. We were seated right next to the open grill, interestingly we did not feel the heat in a warm evening but enjoyed watching the grilling and bread slicing in action. Our waiter was very personable, attentive and intelligent, the rest of wait staff were also excellent. For starters, we shared the prawns, mussels and two salads; the winners were the butter lettuce salad with freshly toasted almonds and the plump and tasty mussels. The prawns were a little overcooked for my liking. Our main courses were 2 lamb chops, an aged rib eye steak and a whole fish. Everything was grilled perfectly with excellent quality ingredient and generous portions. Our special bottle from home was decanted and the cocktail was nice and strong. Yummy desserts! The strawberry tart and some kind of cream filled phyllo (can not pronounce after multiple tries) were both wonderful and not too sweet. One of the desserts was comped for the birthday girl, a nice touch. We'll be back for sure and highly recommend it to other foodies.
My wife and I went here for our anniversary dinner and we loved it. The food was great, the service was charming. We recommend it to our friends and will go there again.
Evvia's is EXCELLENT Greek food. I have now been there twice and both experiences have been superb from the service to the food. We most recently went there on Mother's Day and it was outstanding. Every person that we had contact with was very nice and offered great service from the hostess, the waiter, and the manager. the food is outstanding. I haven't have anything I haven't liked yet but a couple items that are must haves for an entree & dessert... Arnisia Paidakia - rib-cut, mesquite-grilled lamb chops with olive oil lemon roasted potatoes Galaktoboureko - traditional phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream I highly recommend this restaurant!
Wow. This is the best greek restaurant hands down.  Warning to those who try their spanakapita --- they are so good you will never find another place to equal them. The menu is large, interesting and delicious.  Service is well paced and friendly.
what an interesting place. I totally enjoyed being here tonight had wine and food. their wine tastes great. I am totally in love with this place! maybe it is because i had too much wine ! I have to decide tomorrow
This was my second time here now and I loved being able to try even more on the menu.  Delicious! Very fresh ingredients and tasty food! I love the atmosphere as it's the perfect date night or spot to go with a few friends.  The Anginares Souvlaki - grilled artichokes & eggplant skewer with Greek yogurt is my favorite starter now.  The Tomato Salata was very fresh with a yummy cheese I had never had before and the Shrimp appetizer was good but not my favorite.  Wine and Baklava was delish also!
5 easy steps to make yourself happy: 1.)  Pick up the phone. Call their number and make a reservation. 2.) Drive to Evvia (or cab,walk, bike, or bus) and be on time for your reservation. 3)  Look at the reviews here and order the Spanakotiropita or Kolokithokeftethes or just about anything. 4)  Then look at the reviews and order what is most popular for your entree. 5) For the dessert finale, order the Sokolatina with a Greek coffee. At the end of all this, you should be happy.  See how easy it is? :)
The food is generally really tasty.  The ravioli was not the best, but the salmon was very good.  Friendly staff.
This place never fails me.  Best lamb chops or lamb anything here.  We had the lamb chops, lamb shank and suckling pork (special of the day) between four people.  Of course we also ordered a few appetizer, but it was the perfect amount.  The server helped to ensure that we wouldn't order too much or too little.  Best part was that we had the tiniest room left for some desserts.  The only problem with this place is that a lot of people know how awesome it is and it's hard to get a reservation. Anytime I want to have a great meal and great service, I come here.  By far one of my top restaurants in the Bay.
My in-laws took me to Evvia's for my birthday.  This is a great Greek restaurant and have been here several times.  Their spanakopita, wild mushroom and lamb meatball appetizers are all to die for! Lamb is of course their specialty - and the lamb chops do not disappoint.
Oh So Incredible. Growing up in Palo Alto, I have seen many restaurants come and go.  This is by far one of my favourites! I am probably a little biased, though.  One of my friends from high school worked here, and a couple of us were invited to eat dinner here.  The chef or manager (I forget) who she was friends with all gave us a bunch of dishes on the house - all of which I remember were amazing. As other reviewers have said, it is usually crowded on Friday and Saturday nights (as are many restaurants in Palo Alto), so be sure to make your reservation!  Tables are close together, so it's not a rigid atmosphere. When I'm back in town, I'll have to come back!
There isn't a whole lot more that I can add that hasn't already been said. Well okay, here are a few things (maybe).  Most people get the lamb chops and miss out on the lamb shank.  Yes the lamb chops are the best thing here.  But if you're greedy (like I am), get BOTH the lamb chops and lamb shank.  Because the shank is absolutely awesome when you reheat it the next day with the orzo it comes with. The beef souvlaki is a gorgeous filet mignon - a lovely steak and skewer all in one.  The best of both worlds.  But don't get it.  Get the lamb chops instead.  You won't miss the beef. Order family style.  Share everything.  Go nuts and get too much.  Plan on having the most fantastic lunch or brunch the following day.  Make sure to order extra lamb chops so that everyone at the table gets at least one -- preferably two. But as awesome as the lamb chops are, man cannot live on lamb chops alone.  (I've tried).  Fortunately there's moussaka that is unlike any other moussaka I've ever had.  That brilliant grilled whole fish.  And fresh simple greek salad.  And tasty spanakotiropita.  And oh those spreads and pita! Refuse the bread.  Make them take it away from the table.  Waste of carbs.  Get more pita and spreads.  Unless you really want more stuffed grape leaves (they're pretty tastey so maybe you do), don't order them.  The assorted spreads comes with four of them. Buy the best wine you can with the meal.  A nice robust red one.  It goes well with the lamb chops.  (Yes, there is a theme here regarding the lamb chops.)  Evvia is a fantastic meal, but with the plenty of the right wine, it is absolutely magical. A greek feast with friends and family and half a dozen dishes and wine - this is how dining should be.  Is this absolutely the most exquisite food I've ever had in my life?  No.  But I've had a some the best meals of my life here.  This is where I'd want my last meal, surrounded by loved ones. It's the sharing and company (and wine!) that makes it extraordinary, and this restaurant embraces that. Other thoughts -- it's tempting to sit in the back at the bar if you want to squeeze in and there are no tables.  Don't do it.  Too small and close to the bathrooms.  Order take out instead if you don't have reservations.  The lamb shank and moussaka are fantastic to go.  The lamb chops, less so (but still good). What makes the grilled fish work is not only that it is a beautiful whole piece of fish, but those greens!  Especially if they're just a little too salted, they just merge with the herbs and buttery soft fish and lemon.  What a compliment to the lamb chops! Go for dinner, not lunch.  Lunch is good, but it's different when you're feasting with friends and family.  It's kind of sad when you think about it -- just eating from your own little plate with work colleagues at lunch. It's okay to get the beef souvlaki for lunch.  Lamb chops are for dinner.
A good friend took me here for my birthday and I have to say I was very impressed.  Took a while to get our table even with a reservation but once we were seated it was all green and service was golden. For appetizers we had their steamed mussels in garlic sauce as well as the pita with artichoke hearts and olives.  The mussels were amazing and the sauce was even better.  The pita was not what I expected as it came out like a pizza but it was regardless it was delicious.  We also got a pretty reasonably priced half-bottle of Zin and for my entree I got their HUGE lamb shank which was ridiculously tender.  For dessert I had a pretty good tart with a surprisingly good walnut ice cream. In terms of Greek fine dining, Evvia pretty much hits the mark.  I will definitely be back!
Fabulous. Had an amazing dinner last night. I'm not huge on seafood but we had the octopus appetizer and it was great. We order the lamb shank and the salmon. Both we cooked to perfection and seasoned well. The waiter was friendly and helpful and suggested an excellent wine. All in all, just a really great evening. Would highly recommend!
Wow, wow. Wow. Excellent, prompt, friendly service. Great vibe. Fantastic food. What more could you want? * MUST-HAVES: Prawns, whole fish, * Crispy Zucchini Cakes - 4 stars (with marinated cucumber & mint yogurt - $8.75) The breading was just firm enough to hold the whole thing together, yet still crumbly and soft. The inside was a little too soft - you couldn't quiet slice your fork through it, it kind of just crumbled/fell apart under the pressure of a utensil, but the flavor was great and the yogurt dip SO refreshing and perfect. * Prawns - 4.5 stars (wood oven baked with tomato & feta - $10.75) This was like.. having the ocean in my mouth. In a tasty tomato sauce. The prawns were so fresh, with that really nice crisp crunch to it. The sauce was tangy and thick from the feta. Loved this. * Avgolemono Soup - 3 stars (traditional egg-lemon soup with chicken & rice - $8) I wasn't a big fan but I don't really like sour to be the dominant flavor in soups (eg. I hate sweet & sour soup). My friend was a huge fan. I will say that the chicken was soft & tender and this had a really nice consistency, not too thick but not watery either. * Whole Fish (bass) - 5 stars (mesquite grilled with lemon-oregano vinaigrette & braised greens - $35) SO delicious!! Love that the fish has a nice crispy slightly burnt skin, just enough to give it some texture but not too much to give it a charred flavor. The texture was so tender and just fantastic, and the flavor slightly tart. * Galaktoboureko - 4 stars (traditional phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream - $8.25) Very nice. A flaky, soft yet firm crust to the phyllo. The filling was a bit on the sweet side (and I have a major sweet tooth!) that could be offset a little by the ice cream (which btw was delish).
After reading some of the reviews, and seeing how many there where, I was starting to get a little worried that Evvia wouldn't live up to the hype and would ultimately be a disappointment. Boy, was I wrong. I had the most delightful dinner here. My date and I had reservations for 8:00 pm on a Sunday, and we were lucky we made those because when we arrived the restaurant was popping. That late on a Sunday, parking was a breeze (there was a lot across the street) and we were happily seated a few minutes early. The restaurant is a little loud (but it was pretty crowded) but the ambiance is nice and warm and welcoming. Since I am gluten-free I did not get to enjoy the complementary bread, but my date did and ended up gulping it down. He approved. We ordered the octopus appetizer per our waiter's recommendation- and it was a total win! It was crunchy, chewy, salty, spicy, and just overall YUM! Not fishy at all. For our mains date ordered the lamb skewer, and I had the lamb chops- both executed to perfection! Medium, pink, tender, and lovely. The potatoes were delish as well, perhaps a little on the oily side. I was also impressed with the portion size- both plates were HUGE (although the appetizer was definitely only for two). For dessert we enjoyed the Evvia Sundae- the chocolate ice cream was so rich- it was almost a brownie, and the whipped cream wasn't over sweetened. Next time, I want to give the rice pudding a whirl, I've heard great things. Service was prompt and unobtrusive. I am looking forward to my second visit soon!
The DH and I stopped here for date night.  What a delightful surprise.  The service here is top notch.  Our server was very helpful and knowledgeable of all the dishes and specials. We had the wild mushrooms with cheese appetizers along with the mussels.  When we came in we saw that they had a suckling pig spinning on the spit, so we could only guess that the rotisserie of the day, was roast pig (oink, oink).    I ordered the lamb chops and the hubs ordered the suckling pig.  The lamb chops were AMAAAAAAZING!!!!  Cooked perfectly with a nice charred crust.  The flavor was fantastic and even.  I had three lamb chops with oven roasted potatoes.  I could only get through 1.5 of the dish and couldn't eat another bit.  Oh well, looks like I'll get to have lamb chops again the next day.  The suckling pig was also extremely good and the DH was extremely satisfied with the food.  The food is a little pricey, but well worth it for a special occasion like an anniversary or birthday. The service was top notch and we will be back for a special occasion.
Evvia just about serves the best lamb chop ever set foot on Earth -- I'd be happy to nosh on it for the rest of my life!  I must say that the ambience and the service are a pleasure as well!  Oh and after you devour the delicious lamb, be sure to save room for dessert.  We tried the Galaktoboureko and it truly hit the spot!
I suffer from being over-hyped when it comes to Evvia Estiatorio - I've heard such amazing things about Kokkari Estiatorio, that I had super high expectations of it's sister restaurant. Given my earlier notions of what the food would be like, I had a pleasant meal but was not overly impressed. The food was mostly on point, with the star being the porchetta special I ordered as the main entree. The pork was perfectly cooked, and they had fried pork skin scattered on top - this dish was clearly made specifically for my pork-loving ways! The rest of the meal was good, but not memorable. The zucchini cakes were lukewarm and tasted very flat. The calamari was that balance of crispy without being too oily, but seemed to lack a certain depth of flavor. The desserts were more delicious than I've had at other restaurants, but were also sweeter than I typically like. All the other hallmarks of a good restaurant were there - the ambiance was warm and romantic, the staff checked in but wasn't intrusive, and the space itself was beautiful. Overall, this was worth the trip, but not one I'm compelled to repeat again. I'm excited for Kokkari - if it's the better of the two, then I have a great meal to look forward to.
Medium rare lamb chops melt in your mouth and is seasoned perfectly! The roasted potato that comes with it is also excellent, the perfect french fry. We also started off with their flat bread and dip which is very good too!
If you are looking for romantic dinner, look no further than Evvia. Seems like other people agree as I have never been able to reserve a table early enough for Valentine's day. Everyone says order the lamb, and I will say no differently: order the lamb. After you consume a delicious dinner served by an attentive staff, and come back knowing what Evvia is capable of, you can venture out into stranger waters. On a side note, there was a Ferrari outside both times I dined, so maybe that's another bonus to look out for.
In love!! I'm happy n glowing... and its definitely because of the semolina custard wrapped in Phyllo with the most delicious pistachio ice cream. Oh no... Wait, it could be the greek yogurt with honey and walnuts, baked cheese with roasted peppers, the simple and elegant asparagus with feta infused with herbs, the fries with oregano and feta, the gigantic beans in a tomato-based sauce, the roasted beets on skordalia or the scrumptious spanakopita. They all were equally delicious and gave me a reason to visit Palo Alto again. The ambiance and service were impeccable too. Last but not the least please grab a bunch of the toffee with fennel after your meal at the reception desk... You'll be pleasantly surprised as I was!!
it has a nice ambiance. but it was very crowded on a tuesday night. should make reservations. it has no falafels i tried the greek fries. the feta cheese made it a little special. skinny fries. for entree, i got the lamb chop. it came in three pieces, but i only ate two of them (was too full... i had a small meal before that b/c our reservation was at 9). ordered medium. i thought the first piece was too cooked, but the second piece was just perfect. not sure whether the first piece was overdone or if the second piece was under-cooked, though. got the Baklava for dessert. it came with a small scope of ice-cream. forgot what flavor it was. overall desert was ok. i didn't get a wine but my friend got the zin. it was ok. overall food was ok. lamb chop was good but it was on the pricier side.
Yum, yum, yum! Took my dear friend here for lunch to celebrate her big 4-0. Our meal was amazing! We ordered: Grilled brussel sprouts - I don't like brussel sprouts, but after having these I do now! We both ordered the whole fish with braised greens - OMG! Super crispy skin and flakey juicey meat... perfection Phyllo wrapped custard with pistachio ice cream - she ate it all (ok, I got a bite, and it was dang good) Warm chocolate cake with cherry ice cream - I ate this all and loved every moment of it. lol! I don't get to say this often, so I'm happy saying it... one of the best lunches I've had in a very long time! The kind of meal where you're happy the rest of the day just thinking about the food (and well okay, the excellent company you had as well!) ;) It was a very special occasion and the food was outta this world, so it was well worth the price! I'll definitely come back! :)
This place sets the bar for service/ taste/ wine selection and overall experience. I'd give it a perfect score, but then there would be nothing to improve, right? I was here over the weekend and this was my second visit. Had a similar experience the first time so I can vouch for the consistency. Ordered rack of lamb or lamb shank (Huge! Probably only took 2 bites out of it since I was already full). Also ordered a lot of little appetizers that were unbelievably good. We ended up ordering almost everything they had and just sampled each and took the rest to go. We topped everything off with some cabernet as a suggestion from the waitress which complimented the meal just fine.
My Favorite Greek Restaurant Ever!! This review is coming in about a year after my visit.  Anyway, where should I start?  Started like a nightmare because of the limited parking, but ended like a dream.  I found out about this hidden gem in Palo Alto from Food Network, so I was already a fan without even trying the food yet.  When I told the manager this, & how I was impressed by all the great reviews on Yelp, he made it his mission to make our 1st visit a wonderful dining experience.  Even though we didn't have reservations, & the place was packed, he found our little party of 2 a table in the corner within 25 minutes (which is not bad for Evvia). We ordered: *Soutzoukakia- Lamb Meatballs: delicious, but only 2 in an order *Forgot the name- Grilled Fish kabob thingy w/ a pureed garlic dip: tasty but dry *Arnisia Paidakia- Mesquite-grilled Lamb Chops: absolutely flavorful & juicy *Olive Oill & Lemon Roasted Potatoes: the BEST potato wedges I have ever ate, perfectly crispy on the outside & fluffy on the inside- yummmmmm *Tzatziki- the BEST Tzatziki sauce I've ever had/made, you can really taste the garlic & cucumbers, not watered down like bland Indian Raita *Galaktoboureko- Phyllo wrapped Vanilla Bean Custard w/ Pistachio ice-cream: wonderfully divine!  Probably 1 of my top 3 favorite desserts ever.  The phyllo was crispy & warm, w/ the velvety custard & cool, rich ice-cream, you're definitely spoiling your taste buds = D Though our waiter was impatient & made us feel uncomfortable asking about the menu items, the manager was kind & respectful.  He came by several times to check on us, it being our 1st time there & all.  I'm a really slow eater, & he noticed that my lamb chops got cold, so he insisted on taking it back to re-heat it.  He brought back my plate all tidied up and added a couple of extra yummy potato wedges for good measure.  That's what I call customer service!  He also comped our dessert and gave us his card (too bad I misplaced it, grr) for help w/ reservations or special dietary requests next time.  My mom & I can't wait to go back and check a few more menu items off our "next time let's order that" list. Minus 1 star for the cramped parking.  The high prices are not reasonable for the small portions you get, but I guess they make up for it w/ authentic Greek flavor and ambiance.  I guess it will be our special occasion place. I've heard Evvia's sister restaurant, Kokkari in San Francisco, is even better, if that's at all possible- I don't know, I'll have to judge that for myself.  But for now, Evvia, you have a special place in my heart... or better yet, tummy = )
THIS IS MY FAVORITE RESTAURANT IN PALO ALTO! :) *This review is long past due! :) I was a regular at this place, my friend John Le introduced me to this place and I am so grateful! Everything is delish, it doesn't matter what I'm in the mood for. Anything and everything I've ordered and tried at this restaurant was fantastic! My all-time faves are: Starters: Lamb Riblets and Dolmathes Salads: Watermelon and Feta, and Heirloom Tomato Salad Dinner Entrees: Kokinisto me Manestra (lamb shank), and Moscharisia Brizola (rib eye steak) Desserts: Galaktoboureko (we call it #2! haha) and baklava I don't normally go to a bar and drink by myself but I did at Evvia! A few times after a stressful day at work, I went straight to Evvia to have a glass (or two) of wine. I felt safe and comfortable. I guess it helps that I know the bartenders (thank you for always being nice John!), a lot of the servers and their manager Panos. They are all very nice and have always been very accommodating to me. They make you feel special as soon as you walk in the door! (Yes, Fabio, keep up the good work! haha) It's a great place to go on a date or even just to hang out with your friends, which I did quite often with my very good friend Lana :). I am definitely going to miss this place and the people there. It is on the pricey side but it's worth it. If you feel like treating yourself, this is the place to be! But I recommend that you make a reservation a few days in advance as they tend to be very busy. Seriously, I've come here on all days of the week except Sunday and they are always packed! So what are you waiting for, call now and I guarantee you, you will have a great time! :)
Nicest and best Greek restaurant in the area!
The first thing you notice upon walking into Evvia is the wonderful Greek ambiance. There are plates and pots lining the walls and ceiling, creating a nice feel to the entire place. I sat at the bar tonight, alone, and was served by the bartender, Josh. He was very friendly and outgoing; he seemed to really care about how he presented himself and represented the restaurant. I went ahead and started with the feta and elies, which was marinated olives served with feta cheese. These are two of my favorite flavors, and they were absolutely brimming with tastiness. A wonderful start! After that, it took a good long time for my entree to come out. This, perhaps, wouldn't be a bad thing if I were enjoying the ambiance of the restaurant with someone else, but given that I was seated alone at the bar, it was a bit of nuisance to have to wait so long for my entree. Finally, out came the ravioli. On paper, it sounded wonderful: cheese and herb ravioli with sweet onion, kale, roasted butternut squash, and pumpkin seed oil. Although not listed on the menu, it seemed also to have a crumbled cheese (probably feta) sprinkled on top of it. That said, although it sounded wonderful on paper, I was a bit disappointed, as the flavors were all pretty mild, and nothing really stood out. Those who know me or have read other reviews of mine know that I'm a HUGE pumpkin/squash nut, so I think I would've liked it if they brought out the sweetness of the squash a little bit more, and then balanced it by bringing out a bit more of the sharpness of the feta. Oh well. To their credit, the ingredients were very fresh. Almost astonishingly fresh. And it was still a very good meal; I'll certainly be back to Evvia in the future!
Evvia is one of those places that you treat yourself to, and then all your problems quickly melt... Read more 
After having gone to the sister restaurant many many times in the city, i did have expectations for Evvia... And let me say they met them with flying colors! I had made an open table reservation for 2 for 645... we got there over an hour early... and they sat us... awesome! (we just couldn't wait) The food was perfect. worth every penny. I'll be back as much as possible.
Ola kala Always have reservations; placed is always packed Valet/street/lot parking The best food service by Hakan; he said leave everything to him; we did; we were overwhelmed He ordered our appetizers; all were fantastic i.e., zucchini cakes, octapodaki, brussel sprouts, pataria (beet) salad He ordered our wines, a nice Santorini Sigalas Assyrtiko white & a cab franc red; both complemented our food excellently The whole branzini was delicious as were all the lamb dishes He ordered our dessert: galaktoboureko w/ice cream was wonderful washed down with Greek metrio coffee One of our best dinners ever
My gf took me here for my birthday at my request.  We had planned to go to Mission Chinese Food in SF that day, but the weather ended up crappy so we decided to stay closer to home.  I think it was a great choice. We walked in w/o a reservation at around 5 PM.  We were told we could have a table now but there was a reservation earmarked for our table at 6:30 PM.  No problem for us, we weren't planning on taking that long. I'll start by saying our server was prompt, attentive, and knowledgeable from beginning to end.  Couldn't ask for better service, that's for sure.  The place itself has an upscale feel and is dimly lit for ambiance.  Has a very rustic feel to it with pots and pans hanging from up above and direct view to the grill and oven (I think, it's been a few months). And most importantly, the food was fantastic.  We both agreed that we had one of the best meals we've had in a while here.  A basket of very good crusty bread was brought over, and standard olive oil/balsamic was on the table, as well as a nice sea salt...divine.  We had an appetizer of roasted vegetables with a red pepper sauce and also some yogurt.  Vegetables were roasted perfectly, still retaining some texture, and the sauces complimented them well.  For entrees - I had a roasted lamb dish which came on a few wedges of potato and some lightly sauteed swiss chard, and she had a grilled branzino with the same swiss chard.  Both were cooked well, with the chard especially having just the right amount of texture.  For a place like this, the portions were probably more than we were expecting as well, which was nice.  And bonus points for the 1/2 lemon coming wrapped in a netting so you could squeeze it without the seeds coming out onto your food. Cannot comment on the value part of it since I didn't pay, but from viewing the menu, it was not outrageous and seemed par for the course for this type of dining.  And the quality of the food, as noted above, was FANTASTIC.  Can't wait to come back!
Went here with and at the recommendation of a colleague who lives in San Francisco. She clearly had made reservations or there is no way two of us could get a table, even on a Tuesday night! And, I was really glad she shared this gem with me. I started with the Milo Salata (heirloom apples, field greens, manouri, candied walnuts & apple cider vinaigrette), which was delicious. For my main course, I selected the Kotopoulo Souvlas (lemon-oregano rotisserie chicken with roasted root vegetables & Evvia dressing), which was a great mix of flavors and a VERY hearty portion. I can't go Greek without tasting the Baklava, which I ordered for dessert. My colleague doesn't like Baklava, but was able to eat the vanilla ice cream that was served to the side. I left full and fondly thinking of my trips to Greece...this place would make any Greek God or Goddess proud!
Wow is this place is yummy! My family went here for Mother's Day and we all enjoyed our food! I ordered the lamb kabobs and they were so tender and juicy - cooked to perfection. The ambiance is also very cute - however, it does tend to get a little crowded and loud on weekends. Book in advance if you want to go!
Overall 3.5 stars but bc of the great dessert & nice ambiance, up'd it to 4 stars.  I had high expectations coming into this place after reading all the rave reviews.  The food was good but especially given the price, I wasn't 'WOW'd' (review of our dishes below).  The dessert, however, definitely WOW'd me, and it's the only reason I'd come back.  The service is very slow (very nice, but very slow).  We also had to wait over 30 minutes even though we had a reservation, but the manager gave our table 2 complimentary appetizers and the bday boy got a free sundae, so that made up for it.  We celebrated the bf's 30th bday here and I really enjoyed the ambiance of the restaurant; it's good for dates.  Whether you're coming for lunch or dinner, expect to block out at least 2 hours to eat here (friends have been here for lunch and have said it takes awhile too). FOOD: - Sweet Peas & Feta: basically a plate of green peas which I normally don't like, but these were fresh, sweet and crisp.  Something about them made me keep going back for more! - Mushrooms: good but nothing special - Moussaka: unique & hearty. kind of like a greek lasagna without pasta. we've never had this before so it was different. not a dislike, but not sure if we like it either. - Arnisia Paidakia (lamb chops): ok, I had VERY high expectations for this especially based on reviews saying that even vegetarians loved these.  I was a lil disappointed.  They were good & the presentation was nice, but just tasted like steak & it's not something I would get again for $40. My expectations may have just been too high. - Galaktoboureko (phyllo wrapped with custard dessert): OMG. OMG. SO GOOD!!  (picture attached) This really made our whole dinner.  It's a perfectly flaky warm roll of custard w/ pistachio ice cream on the side that enhances it even more.  I had to share but really didn't want to.. soo yummy.
reservation is highly recommended. this place is always packed and books fast! service was good, food was ok and price is a little on the high end. i had the spanakopita for appetizer---fail! for $8.75, i had two small pieces of oil drenched phyllo. the costco spanakopita if much much better than the one i had here. for that reason, i give it one star. they serve generous portion of the entree, which made up for the appetizer we had. the vegetarian version of mousakka was good and the vegetables were sweet. unfortunately, it was also was a bit too oily for me.  my husband had the lambshank. the meat was tender and he seemed to have enjoyed it. 3 stars. galaktoboureko for dessert---heaven! if you love pistachios like i do, this is the perfect dessert for you. one of the best desserts i've had! 4.5 stars.
Evvia is a solid upscale dining establishment in Palo Alto. While their dishes aren't necessarily mind-blowing, they are consistently delicious and high quality. I also love the ambiance and decor of this place. I'm actually not the biggest fan of Greek food--it's okay. I maybe overdosed on Greek salad and phyllo pastry while I was in Greece. But I like Evvia and their lamb chops are kind of amazing. Tender, flavorful, and not gamey at all. If you want to split their famous lamb chops, they will actually add another one (so that the total is 4) for about $11 extra. I don't really like Greek desserts so I'm not going to comment on them here--and maybe point out the amazing gelato place across the street ;) Service here is also very good. Definitely make a reservation before coming. Even with one, I've had to wait 15+ min past my reservation time. In Palo Alto, there aren't a huge amount of choices for fine dining, so I guess they're just too popular. But I'm definitely interested in trying their sister restaurant in SF, Kokkari, now!
This place is too popular for its own good but the food is spectacular and the service is top flight. Worth the hassle - every appetizer is great, really delicious food, true Greek cuisine
The food was fantastic and the service just right. Reserve early, because it is hard to get a table during busy times.  Worth the expense.
Maybe I'm spoiled by Kokkari, but we split a bunch of starters and they were just OK. The Spanakotiropita and Crispy Zucchini Cakes were my favorite out of the bunch, even though their Octopus is one of their best starters - it just wasn't flavorful for me and was too chewy. We also tried the Evvia Flatbread and Brussel Sprouts, which were tasty but not as good as they could be. The atmosphere was lively and service was great, but the food didn't meet my expectations.
Advance reservations are highly recommended.  This place gets so busy. I give Evvia 5 STARS for OUTSTANDING TASTING FOOD, HIGH QUALITY FOOD, YUMMY DESSERT, GREAT WINE, NICE ATMOSPHERE, and did I mention their food is great??  IT'S ALWAYS ABOUT THE FOOD!! It's a bit pricey, but ABSOLUTELY WORTH IT. I've been coming to Evvia since 1999 and I LOVE EVERYTHING HERE.  EVVIA is MY FAVORITE RESTAURANT!!  I've brought my family and friends here and have told everyone I know about this place. MY ABSOLUTE FAVORITES ARE: 1.  Psari Psito - grilled whole fish with lemon-oregano vinaigrette & horta 2.  Galaktoboureko - traditional phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream OTHER ITEMS WE LOVE ALSO ARE: 1.  Arnisia Paidakia - rib-cut, mesquite-grilled lamb chops with olive oil lemon roasted potatoes 2.  Moscharisia Brizola - mesquite grilled dry aged rib eye steak with olive oil lemon roasted potatoes & horta You can't go wrong with anything else on the menu.  The above is just a list of our favorites. They have a great selection of wine, too.  Got to have a bottle with your meal! When the weather is warmer they open up their front sliding doors to really open up the restaurant and it feels fantastic!! Cheers and happy eating!!
Best Greek food in town.....wine selection was great.  But you have to get the lamb chops....wow.
holy crap, just went there today again and I have to say, this place is AWESOME!!!! Hot diggity damn, I just never get tired of the burst of flavors this place delivers. Today I had the Apple Salad and Avgolemono soup which is traditional egg-drop soup w/ lemon & chicken. Everything I've had here is really delicious...give this place a try. But I will say parking is a bitch...come here before or after lunch/dinner hour...
This place ROCKS. I've been here twice and I can't wait to go back. The food is amazing, great wine... Read more 
Great service and food.  Tough to book a table on short notice, but every meal we've had there has been fantastic.
On the cusp of four stars, but I found a few things that hold me back. Obviously, Evvia has been a top establishment and will remain so. Perhaps there is just a bit of complacency creeping in, though. The tables are too many, and too close together. Removing a few would make it more relaxing for the diners and much less difficult for the servers. The appetizer plates, particularly the vegetables, are tiny. The house certainly could afford to be about 50% more generous with the Brussels sprouts. I mean, what's the mark-up on those?! The lamb riblets were on the gray side, and mostly fat and gristle. For lunch, I had a grilled branzino that was very good. All the other entrees looked very good and portions were good-size here. The desserts shined. Naturally, the Greek yogurt was rich and creamy, and the pastries and ice creams were very well done. Our server was attentive and good- natured, paying close attention to the wine service in particular. I like Evvia, although it's close twin Dio Deka, in Los Gatos, is better.
Probably not fair to compare Evvia to its sister restaurant Kokkari (especially since Kokkari is my FAVORITE restaurant), but Evvia and Kokkari have very very similar menus and I feel like Kokkari executes slightly better.  One example: the zucchini cakes at Evvia were smaller than what I remember having at Kokkari, and my sister commented that they were not as hearty. That being said, Evvia still does a very good job of putting out quality dishes.  The zucchini cakes were small but delicious, and the calamari were perfectly fried (not greasy at all!)  The rotisserie of the day when we went was pork...half of the table ordered the rotisserie pork and LOVED it.  The lamb chops were so good that even my lamb-hating sister liked them.  I don't really like custard-based desserts, but the semolina custard dessert here (also at Kokkari) is so good that I recommend it to others.  All in all, I enjoyed this meal and recommend coming here if you can't get up to the city to go to Kokkari!
Food is good but not as great as the sister restaurant Kokkari. I tried similar dishes here for comparison and the result is obvious. The Grilled Octopus appetizer from Kokkari that I adore was just average here. Evvia's version of the octopus is tender but not crispy on the outside. The olive oil was also not as fragrant. Lamb Riblets were likable. The meat fall off the bone easily although there were some parts that are slightly too dry. The Lamb Chops here was comparable to the quality of Kokkari. If you like lamb chop you won't be disappointed. Texture was good and seasoning was flavorful but not overwhelming. Not the best I have had but it was satisfying. Location is everything when it comes to restaurant business. Evvia is tactically located in the heart of Palo Alto downtown close to all those banks and financial companies. It is always very busy. I doubt they could accommodate any walk in for lunch or dinner. If you really want to eat here, make sure you make a reservation well in advance (think in weeks, not days). Is it really worthy of marking your calender and confirming twice? (yes they call you twice to confirm) Personally I don't think so. If location is not too big of a concern to you, I would recommend dining at Kokkari instead. The food and service are both better there.
Been to Evvia many times over the years and also to their sister restaurant in SF.  What can I say, my wife and I  are big fans. Lamb is fantastic, their spanakotiropita rocks, the whole fish is great  and the Sokolatina for dessert is sometimes worth the trip. As a matter of fact, we've gone to Evvia a few times just for dessert and coffee. If you've never been, what are you waiting for? Place is usually busy, so plan ahead.
My husband had a business dinner and I made the reservation for him. He said it was amazing. They had some dish with eggplants he said it was to die for.. He also said it was very expensive. I remember dining there once and it was very good but it was long ago and don't even recall what I had. I do remember the service was excellent and the place was packed.
Be sure to make reservations or be prepared to sit at the walk-in table for two by the door.  (BTW, it has a good variety for vegetarians.) Friendly server. Food was good a bit on the healthier side... I ordered the veggie ravioli.. with walnut pesto and arugula. It was tasty nevertheless. The white wine recommendation by our server was excellent. It is a bit on the pricey side...
What's all the hype? It was just ok. A very weak 3-star at those prices. I like the tall ceilings and the decor but it's in Palo Alto...it's expected to to have a little charm. Service was just blah. Our server Brent didn't even tell us about the specials till we heard our neighboring table asking him explicitly. We had grilled octopus, lamb riblets to start, the mousaka, and grilled fish for entrees. Everything was just ok, a bit on the bland side. The mousaka was especially disappointing. It was overloaded with cream and salt, yet lacked the rich flavoring from spices. Was not impressed at all.
3.5 stars. Great, vibrant ambience. If it's Sat night (or any night for that matter) it's gonna be a packed house.   I enjoyed dining here;  warm, rustic setting with large open kitchen.  Good, friendly service and excellent dinner options. For starters, we tried the grilled artichoke and eggplant kebob, fried zucchini, and beets.  My friends really loved the beets, i really liked the artichoke and eggplant. I tried their special fish of the day: rock cod (see pic).  Needless to say, it was HUGE and very fried ($35).  It was just okay but i probably wouldn't order it again.  Most of my friends had some sort of lamb on their plates and they seemed to enjoy it for the most part though they did mention that were some fatty parts to it. We also ordered a nice chilean syrah which was quite tasty ($40).  We didn't end up getting dessert this time but the options looked decent and affordable. Overall, I really enjoyed the atmosphere but the food i personally ordered was a bit of a miss.
the best of the best
Short and simple.  Excellent...George and Kenny do a great job...on all levels... Bon Appetite
Recently went here for dinner and am happy to report that my husband and I both left VERY satisfied!  Thanks to my coworker, Jackie for recommending this place! Made reservations on OT for Friday 9:30.  Thought it wouldn't be too crowded since it was later in the night, but boy was I wrong!  The place was fully packed, loud, and vibrant.  We didn't get seated until close to 10 so we were a little antsy, but as soon as we were seated, we were surprised with complimentary appetizers from the manager.  We got the Spanakotiropita and some hummus type of dip with pita bread.  Thought that was a nice gesture on their part.  Great customer service! The Spanakotiropita was superb!  Light flaky phyllo pastry with mouth watering feta cheese and greens.  YUM YUM YUM!  The dip was good too.  For dinner, I ordered the Kokinisto me Manestra (lamb shank with orzo), which Jackie recommended and my husband had the Arni Soulvlaki (lamb souvlaki) after seeing the guy at the table next to us order it. The lamb shank was a generous piece and I couldn't stop smelling and MMMM'ing because it was too good.  The meat fell right off the bone and I loved the orzo with the flavorful sauce.  Of course, it was too much food that I had to take most of it home.  The lamb souvlaki was really nice too.  Cooked medium rare and came with cucumber salad, tzatziki and potatoes.  Best tzatziki I've had!  Usually don't get desserts, but after seeing the menu, we ordered the Galaktoboureko (phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream).  It was just too good!  Good thing we came here after our workout!  Definitely worth it.  In the end, we totally forgot about the 30 minute extra wait.  Thanks, Evvia for a great meal!
Not hard to understand why this restaurant is so popular.  Dishes are executed very well. In the past month, I've eaten here twice and enjoyed each dish of mine or my friends.  The whole roasted fish was amazing and surprisingly big.  Deboned also! Don't be surprised if you need to reconfirm your reservation at least once.  Yes, it can get that crowded.
I've been there several times and I think it's a really nice place for dinning, however the food used to be better... Last time the main course was a little cold for our taste and the halibut wasn't as yummy as it was described, plus it was too greasy.
I've been here twice, and once to the sister location in SF...I don't get what the big hype about it is.  My bf and I came here for our 2 year anniversary and nothing we had was spectacular. The food is just OK & if you count the expensive price I would pass. Cozy, warm ambiance but not much else to recommend it
After hearing many, many things about this place from Yelpers and friends, my fiance and I were dying to try it.  We finally had the opportunity to do so for dinner tonight.   Unfortunately, although we had a perfectly pleasant meal we agreed it didn't live up to our (admittedly high) expectations and wasn't worth the $$$ spent. We started with a nice basket of bread and olive oil.  The bread was nothing exceptional, but still good, and I loved the flavor of the olive oil.  We ended up going through 3 baskets of the bread, although interestingly enough each time they brought us significantly less bread than before - I wonder if they were hinting that we should stop eating it. For our entrees we split the rotisserie chicken ($24) and the lamb chops ($36).   I debated ordering the salmon fillet ($25) but a plain fillet seemed kind of boring for that amount of money, and people go on and on about the lamb chops on Yelp.   I also like to get things I can't make at home when we go out, and I regularly cook salmon but never lamb, so this seemed like a chance to get something I couldn't make at home.    I am not a regular red meat eater, but I do enjoy lamb when its cooked well.   I went against the waitress' recommendation of medium rare for the lamb chops and had them medium well, since I really don't like to see my meat red, just slightly pink (that was kind of awkward, since I originally went with what she recommended and then switched my order to the opposite of what she had suggested). First, the good: both dishes were flavored well, with nice spices that gave it a flavor that was noticeable but not overwhelming.    The potatoes ("Evvia potatoes") that both dishes came with were amazing!!   That was the highlight of the meal for us (a bit sad to pay $30 for a meal and have the potato be the best part, but they were really really really good). The bad: The lamb chops didn't really impress me.   As I said, I'm not as big of a fan as lamb as I am of chicken or fish in general, but I have had much better lamb.  The pieces were quite fatty and it was hard to find the meat in all the fat.   I also thought the portions were very weird.  The portion of chicken was HUGE and had 3 large pieces, but the lamb chop portion was quite small - 3 chops that were about 5 bites each.   If we had both ordered the lamp chops I think we would have gone home hungry.   The 3 lamb chops were also at different done-ness levels:  one was barely pink at all (I would say medium well/well done), while another was bright red (much more like medium rare/medium).   I preferred the chicken, which was quite tasty but nothing amazing. Service was generally fine, although I thought a little bit brusque and she definitely seemed displeased when I went against her recommendation for the temperature of the lamb chops (although it was stupid of me to ask when I know I don't like my meat to come out red).   Also, we took home some leftover chicken and they threw out one of the two pieces.    It was mostly eaten, but still, I HATE when restaurants do that - its so wasteful.   I also dislike how snooty the people on the phones are about getting a reservation.  They acted horrified when I asked if they had availability for Friday on a Tuesday of the same week ("um, THIS friday!?!") - but then they DID have availability.    If you're going to act like you're the hardest restaurant in the world to get into, then you shouldn't have lots of availability on a weekend night three days out ;) Bottom line: For us, at least, the prices here make it a splurge/special occasion place, and if we're doing that we're looking to have a really exceptional meal, which this was not.   It was perfectly fine as a regular weekly meal out, but for that, it was way too expensive.    Maybe if I give it another shot and try different things (except of course, for the potatoes) I'll have a different opinion, but for now I'm afraid I'm in the "it's nice, but highly overrated and far from Palo Alto's best restaurant" camp.
Came without a reservation and ate at the bar.  The bartender recommended lamb chops.  They were delightful.  Saganaki was also great. Would definitely go back.
Came w/ the bf as we were craving greek food, and something new. Spanakotiropita - phyllo stuffed with braised greens, feta cheese & herbs - mm.. yummy. Anginares Souvlaki - grilled artichokes & eggplant skewer with Greek yogurt - ok. Mydia - mussels steamed with roasted tomato, ouzo sauce & garlic crostini - super good! Definitely order this one! Soutzoukakia - grilled lamb meatballs with tomato & green olive compote - tasty. worth trying. :)
Have been here on many occasion and apologize for a late review. Evvia since it's inception has always delivered. Food is always fresh and delish!  Whatever is on the menu, I always order the lamb! I don't frequent eating here enough, though I have to say, I have never been disappointed! I wish I could say that about a lot of other places that I frequent. I guess I have been lucky because waiters can't always have a great nite.
Agree with all the reviews below.  This place is amazing.  We hated Tamarine in Palo Alto but loved this place.  Food, service, decor, atmosphere were all excellent.  I had the rotisserie lamb which was the special that night and it was incredible.  The heirloom tomato salad was equally good.  My only regret is we went here our last night in Palo and couldn't repeat.  Next time.
After reading the reviews, I was fantastically excited to dine here. Shame on me for not booking in advance... I would love to come back and try the food, but walked away feeling insulted: how dare I have the temerity to arrive at Evvia without a reservation?! We walk in the door, but upon being acknowledged by the hostess as walk-ins, proceed to sit and wait for literally 10 minutes until we are given any answer to availability. The answer, "we will try to squeeze you in." Okay , I can do that. It looks and smells amazing. 50 minutes go by, 6.55pm to 7.45pm. 55 minutes. No room at the bar --- a minuscule affair  --- leaving us sitting at two of four tiny seats literally in the doorway. Admist the wait, another host shows up and gestures to us. Oh, those are "walk ins," they sigh rolling their eyes. The three of us avert our eyes in shame. Other than this condescending remark? One update. Fifty minutes. Sitting literrally next to not one, but two hosts. Unacceptable.
With almost 800 reviews averaging 4.5 stars there's really not much I can add about Evvia that hasn't already been confirmed review after review. They produce fantastic dishes served by charming servers hence it's spot earned as one of the top restaurants in Palo Alto. Heck, the peninsula. A reservation here is an absolute must. The restaurant is pretty much filled to the brim at practically any given time. The three of us were seated in a long communal table along with another party of four which I didn't care for but it is what it is. At this point I was so ready to fill my belly with the deliciousness that is Evvia that I didn't care. We plotted our meal carefully and hoped for a satisfactory meal that I've been hearing so much about. We shared the following sides: -Saghanaki -Taramosalata, Tzatziki, Melitzanosalata served with grilled pita bread -Crispy Zucchini Cakes -Calamari -watermelon salad We saved a bit of space for dessert which I was glad that we did. Between the three of us we shared two desserts - Galaktoboureko phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream and the Rizogalo rice pudding. It was an excellent wrap up to a superb meal. After all it was a congratulatory lunch for a coworker for having passed an extremely difficult certification exam and this was her restaurant of choice. Evvia was THE perfect place to celebrate.
First reason I came here is because Kokkari is my typical "three bastards dinner" with two of my high school friends.  So our silent rule was to not take anyone to Kokkari, so i figure, to try out the "sister" restaurant. Make sure you make reservations.  Only available was always 5:30pm or 9:00 pm.... and this old man needs his dinner so I always take the earlier one and take my time. Server was totally friendly, made recommendations, knew her wines and the specials.  I felt bad for her having to memorize that and described all the specials for a couple who in the end said "we don't eat meat" Ambiance: nice cozy and dark.  Cool wall of colored bottles. Parking: Plenty of street parking, there's a free parking garage 2 blocks away, a parking lot next to the movie theater, and there's Valet. Now onto the important portion the food: They had a cheese and pepper appetizer.  I think this is a special, but if you like either, it is good good good, a bit rich though. I had a special for Pork Shoulder.  I can't quite put what they used for the sauce, tasted close to Indian Curry, but definitely gave it a kick to this really tender meat. Bad thing is, I'm usually too full after half my meal (appetizer, half pork shoulder and a glass of wine) to even have room for dessert, so maybe next time!
Evvia did NOT dissappoint! Went with my family to celebrate my birthday and it was a wonderful experience! The food was OUTSTANDING - the lamb chops were SO MOIST - and the sea bass was absolutely delicious, the appetizers - lamb meatballs and zucchini crisps were SO good - tiny portions but VERY good - my kids thought the zucchini crisps were similar to falafel balls but better!.. But most of all - the desserts... I actually can't wait for another special occasion so we can get the desserts! The phyllo wrapped vannilla bean semolina custard was excellent but the Meringue with Greek Yogurt and berries on top - OH MY - wish I ordered my own rather than share!! We were there for my birthday celebration and it was the best meal and experience I could've wished for! Will be there again!
I usually don't rave about very many restaurants... but considering that Evvia isn't a Michelin rated eatery, it is totally 5-stars in my opinion! It's a very classy restaurant, but comfortable and unpretentious. Service: The waitress was super sweet and helpful in making oh-so-important menu decisions! Overall service and timing of the different courses were great. Food: We ordered the Classic Greek Salad (3.5 stars) and the Crispy Zucchini Cakes (3.5 stars) for appetizers. Both were  good and had very clean flavors. The Zucchini cakes weren't overly heavy/fried and the salad was the typical Greek flavors/dressing. For the entrees, I ordered the braised lamb ragu pasta and my date ordered the lamb chops with roasted potatoes. OH my. My pasta was pretty good, but the lamb chops were BETTER. The chops were cooked perfectly medium-rare and the spices brought out the best of the little, yummy lamb. Dessert: DO NOT SKIP DESSERT. I am typically NOT a dessert/sweets person, and almost opted out of getting dessert. We ordered the Galaktoboureko (phyllo wrapped vanilla bean custard with HOMEMADE pistachio ice cream). It's almost a bad idea that we ordered this, because now I crave it. I would come all the way to PA just to order this and go home. I would babysit five 3-year old kids, and accept this dessert as payment. haha....okay maybe just one 3-year old. ;) Overall, definitely a great place for a first date, anniversary (you get free dessert), or just nice dinner in Palo Alto.
One of the best restaurants I have ever been to and I would highly recommend dining here.  Lamb off of the rotisserie was unbelievable!   The service was outstanding and the atmosphere was perfect.
Got the lamb as everyone indicated and was not disappointed. We also got a soup and had the dessert as well. The dessert was the most memorable part of the evening, figure on spending $90 - $150 for a party of two. The atmosphere was nice and the servers were attentive.
Good service, disappointing lamb shank. My husband and I went here for his birthday.  Service was good (not overly exceptional).  Appetizers of zucchini cakes - round little balls of fried zucchini which came with a dipping sauce - were wonderful.  We also ordered the Saganaki, which to my surprise and disappointment didn't come to the table flaming as served at every other Mediterranean restaurant I've been to.  The server mentioned something about Palo Alto fire ordinance or something, but if you're not going to serve the Saganaki flaming you should not put it on the menu.  My husband had the special of the evening  - lamb rotisserie -  and he enjoyed it.  I ordered the lamb shank and was very disappointed as the chef was much too heavy-handed with the cinnamon.  The spice totally masked the lamb flavor, and added a slight bitterness to the dish.  The orzo that came with it, though, was very good.  The highlight of the evening was the Galaktoboureko - a custard wrapped in phyllo dough served with pistachio ice cream.  Overall, good restaurant - just a bit of a spotty evening on the food.
Decent restaurant - over-hyped and nothing special. Many people had told me this was the best restaurant in Palo Alto, so I had expected something more. All of the food is fine. Nothing blows your mind. I had the lamb chops (their special dish), tried the whole fish and a bunch of appetizers. All of it was fine. But if you want something special, go elsewhere (the Village Pub is a 10 minute drive away, for example).
I've always heard great things about this place and never really had a chance to try it out but finally got around to eating lunch there. I chose the catch of the day which was a whole seabass. It was cooked very well - seasoned perfectly - tasted exceptionally healthy. Almost had the beef souvlaki but was so tempted by our waitress' description. The appetizers we ordered included the spanakotiropita which I thought was great - not oily - perfectly crispy with greens, herbs, and cheese. I didn't really like the crispy zucchini cakes. Was with 3 vegetarians so I couldn't try out the meaty appetizers. But the DESSERT... that Galaktoboureko did not let me down. phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream and crumbled pistachios. I love pistachios! Got me there. Custard is a bit sweet for me but that's just because I'm not a big sweets person. Please get this when you are there.
I finally got the opportunity to eat at Evvia (with my coworkers) after the longest wait of my life. I've always wanted to try it out (granted it does have amazing reviews on yelp) but never had the opportunity...until recently! We came with a party of around 15 during lunch on a Friday afternoon. The atmosphere of Evvia definitely felt very...rich...and sophisticated. Although I was wearing a polo, I was definitely under-dressed. And the average age of each customer? Well...I'd say its about 40-50. We definitely lowered the mean age by about 10 years though. The restaurant itself looks like very Greek-like (though I've never been to Greece), but just imagine yourself eating at a fine restaurant with Hercules back in the day...that is what Evvia feels like. The service is phenomenal...our waitress was very sweet and helpful. But the one downside to eating at such a nice restaurant is that the wait for the food was around 1 hour...when I'm that hungry, even a McChicken will do wonders in your stomach. But on to the food! I had the lamp chops cooked medium, which were the best damn lamp chops ever! OK, I am saying that partly because it IS good but also because its a $23 lamb chop. I can buy nearly 23 McChickens (that will last me the entire week) with that. The general customer base of Evvia is retirees and rich people that live around Palo Alto.. But don't be afraid because the service and restaurant are very welcoming...just don't walk in with a t-shirt and shorts and you should be fine.
Came here for some lunch... I was hoping for the best. Service wasn't bad, took a while to get seated even with reservations.  Our server was pretty on it, but he didn't seem to like his job much. We started off with Lamb Riblets - mesquite grilled with lemon & oregano- they reminded me of mini lamb chops.  They weren't bad, the lamb was very well cooked. Moussaka - traditional baked casserole of spiced lamb, eggplant, potato & yogurt bechamel- it had too much of cinnamon taste for me, sadly I've had better. Also had a taste of one of their lamb pasta dish which wasn't bad, more on the vinegar taste side. Overall, I really expected too much with the high ratings I guess.. but they do know how to cook their lamb.
My sister brought me here raving about the Galaktoboureko, and she was right. I'm not a huge fan of the "a la mode" idea, the the combination of the pistachio ice cream with the cream filled pastry was delicious. Their food has amazing flavors. The fresh pita bread was thick and fluffy, the tzatziki and eggplant dips was very refreshing. I ordered the Moussaka and when my spoon cut through that top layer the aroma from the seasonings amazed my me.
really love this place, my favorite of all in Palo Alto. I order the whole fish each time I am there, always very delicious.  The dessert, try the 2nd one on the menu, loved it. Also very impressed by their service, the servers, the hostess, all are very nice and attentive. I've been there many times already and will keep on going back there! Do make your reservations ahead of time though!
I had dinner here, and the food as so good I went back again the next weekend. The first night I have the Katsiki Yiouvetsi (braised goat), which was very tender, and had lots of flavor. The second night I had the lamb chops, which were the best I've had. Reservations are a must.   Ambiance is nice, with the front of the restaurant being open to the street. I would have rated this place 5 stars, but I brought my own bottle of wine the second time, and they charged a $20 corkage fee.
Yes yuppie meets rustic Napa valley..um duh it's like Standford grad parent central. this place is fantastic. our server was that old school attentive knowledgeable quick friendly kind. i was very impressed. couldn't get enough of that bread. you could actually just get all the appetizers and share and have a fantastic meal. in our group of 7 we got calamari, the fried smelt, yummm, zucchini croquettes, artichoke and eggplant. their so accommodating, they added a few extra pieces since we had a larger group. wow, how nice. for entrees we had the rotisserie lamb, oh god yummm..the whole fish, moussaka, slouvaki, and halibut. all of it was fantastic, like melt in your mouth it's going to be hard to move in like 3 seconds, why did i have another basket of that fantastic bread kind of way. was there still room for dessert? why yes, don't you know you have a dessert stomach? wholly separate from your food stomach? no you didn't? well you do. we shared the baklava, drooooool, no I'm really drooling, paired with lovely ice cream a fantastic finish for the night. recommended for a special date or celebration.
WOW!!!. This place is amazing; I love Greek food and by far I can say that evvia has the most flavorful and succulent dishes I've ever had. This is probably the best Greek restaurant I have ever visited. Every time I go to evvia they are very welcoming and make you feel like you are at home. A must try is their evvia pita.
Not worth the price. The food is good, but I know have had better. Service is a-ok. I just know I have had a lot better. Kokkari is amazing though. (Although I did have the waiter spill wine on us on accident and he didn't comp the wine, but shit happens)
It's funny when you go to Palo Alto, you know it's a nice city but when you walk down University you wouldn't necessarily think that some of the most affluent people in CA are dining around you. But that's the feeling I get when I eat at places like Evvia. It's not a pretentious place by any means. The service was good and people were friendly. You just get the sense that this is one of the select dining spots for PA families. Either that or every PE or VC person working on Sand Hill or in downtown PA. In terms of ambiance, I wouldn't mind going back but just make sure you're at least business casual so you don't look too out of place. My overall experience was good but I didn't think the food was that amazing. Tried the Souvlaki and lamb for entrees.   The lamb was good. Tender meat but the flavoring was a bit bland.  Souvlaki is a kebab that sits on top of some rice. Meat was extremely tender and the rice had a lemon flavoring which wasn't bad. Good texture to the dish. Lamb chops and shrimps for appetizers. Lamb was good and meat was very tender. The shrimp was too salty IMHO. I'll probably come back to give this place another chance. It's a nice place but I need to find a dish that's worth coming back for.
3.5 stars. Usually Greek is very conducive to veggie filled fare, but Evvia's attempt at upscale dining leaves health-conscious vegetarians (like my dad and cousin) behind. They had one vegetarian entree, a cheese and herb ravioli, but my dad is perpetually on a diet and likes to minimize his cheese (among other saturated fats). My dad and cousin resorted to ordering several of their appetizers instead of their one entree, which I wouldn't have expected out of a non-steakhouse restaurant in Northern California. Anyway, despite that the food was overall pretty good. Dolmathes were too sour, but the zucchini cakes (Kolokithokeftethes) were delicious! We also tried the Soutzoukakia (meatballs), featured on Best Thing I Ever Ate, which I thought were only mediocre. Not worth getting. However, our main entree, the whole fish -was really great. My mom usually finds something to complain about every meal, but she had nothing but good things to say about the dish! Despite our enjoyment of the meal, I have yet to come back with my family. I think this place would be much better for a once-in a while date night, rather than your go-to Saturday night dinner.
This is one of my favorite restaurants!  They have the most yummy food in south bay and the most amazing service.  Everything here is great!
I must have had high expectations for this place, because while I loved the interior of the restaurant and the view of the kitchen, etc, the food really didn't deliver gourmet greatness.  A lot of the entrees were just... mediocre, and some were bad! :o( And this was a Saturday night people! Here's a quick summary if you don't want to read the below:  Food didn't live up to the hype, service was good, dessert was better. Appetizers: 1. Grapeleaves -- Pretty good 2. Fried cheese -- I LOVE cheese, so fried cheese sounded like heaven on earth, but it wasn't. 3. Calamari -- tasted OFF. Something was weird about it, like a weird smoky taste which actually may have been in the aioli .... I don't know, but it was disgusting. 4. Eggplant cakes -- unmemorable Entrees: 1. Souvlaki - BO-RING!! This was something I can do better at home.  Flavors were eh, meat was a tad tough, and overall it was just miserably boring. 2. "THE" Lamb -- I had this, and I'm not a HUGE lamb fan, but I had heard so much about it & not much else on the menu stood out.  It was okay-good -- cooked very well, even though it seemed a tad charred on the outside... the presentation was better than the meal. 3. Ravioli -- Hands down the BEST thing I tried! So surprised! It's an interesting combo of rapini & other greens and a cheese that's not feta.  I would definitely suggest this entree! 4. Someone ordered the chicken and said it was good... -- Overall, I wish I had just ordered the burger! Dessert [SAVING grace] 1. Phyllo wrapped something -- pretty good 2. Chocolate cake -- good, but the same old thing 3. Sundae -- an amazing sundae! I can't really explain it, but it was awesome!
We were very much looking forward to dining here since the reviews are so good. My wife and I decided to order a number of appetizers to share as we had a big lunch earlier. While a couple of the dishes were good, the rest were average. We were happy with our wine and dessert but don't think we will return given the prices.
Came here with a fairly large group (about 14 or so) people and we pretty much took over the restaurant. The atmosphere of this place I absolutely love. A bit loud for a dinner date place, but the lighting is definitely nice. We ordered a large number of appetizers for the meal but they were a bit forgettable (not bad -- read on). For my main dish, I ordered the rib eye steak, medium rare. For $39.99, this was truly the best.steak.ever. I cannot say I've had better steak than from here. The steak was well seasoned, but not over seasoned. The meat was very juicy, and the outside had a nice thin crust while the inside was cooked perfectly to medium rare. In addition to the food, Evvia got all the "small" stuff right too: the waiters are on top of EVERYTHING, from clearing plates, putting out new silverware for each meal, to pouring wine every few minutes. I LOVE this place. Evvia is definitely one of the best dining experience I've ever had and I wouldn't hesitate for a moment to recommend this place to others!
What else does one need to say about this place? The chicken and lamb are cooked to perfection. The lentil soup is flavorful and is served in a generous portion. The service is solid. I have been here over a dozen times in the last year and have never ever had anything but a spectacular meal. If not the very best restaurant in Palo Alto, certainly in anybody's top 3. A little pricey but worth it (this same quality in NYC would be 50-75% more price wise).
Omg yum! Cozy romantic atmosphere. Beautiful inside. Busy but no too loud. Everything is good! Wonderful service.
I love the food here. D-E-L-I-C-I-O-U-S! We enjoyed the Tzatziki - served with house made pita bread and the classic Greek salad of tomatoes, cucumbers, green pepper, red onion, oregano, olives & feta as our appetizers. Both were very light and refreshing. The tzatziki is better than the one served at the Hellenic cuisine restaurant in Los Gatos (hint, hint). I had the whole fish (it's a white delicate flavored fish, I believe it was Branzino) with lemon-oregano vinaigrette & horta greens. It was so full of flavor and obviously grilled perfectly as I could still taste the delicate fresh fish without it being overdone. My date had braised lamb shank. Very rich, but he enjoyed it with the greek salad to cut the richness of the lamb in between bites. The ambiance is sexy and has great energy. The service - excellent! I enjoyed dinner here with a sexy date! I will definitely return soon!
I left this place unimpressed. Vibe was very...shall we say Yuppie meets rustic Napa vineyard. Good things: Our waitress - knew her food inside and out, could pronounce the names of dishes flawlessly, and had some good recommendations, appetizers, and dessert Food: The dishes had alot of potential, but as a restaurant that seems to be built for volume, quality seemed to suffer especially in the main courses. We ordered: Appetizers (Great service, served to each party member and explained) Fried Cheese/ Saghanki - delicious Spanaktropia - light and fluffy, good filling Koloktheripas - cucumber cake, very good. Chicken Solvaki - Best presented dish, a few pieces of chicken were undercooked. (Our waitress threw in dessert - good on her) Kokinos me Manestra - Lamb Shank - Huge hunk of meat, served on the bone.  It was massive, fatty and made me feel like a cave man.  I wish they had reduced the portion size slightly and been more delicate with the cut. Psari Psito - Whole Fish - dry and over cooked. Dessert Baklava Ice Cream - sugar, baklava, hints of other spice = awesome Galaktaboreko - delicious and decadent.  It was a great mix of hot and cold with alot of texture in each bite. All in all - ok. A good place to bring clients and use the expense card.  Wouldn't come on my own.
lamb chop is really goodMust have a try for the first time. Chocolate lava(with vanilla ice cream ) is very very delicious.
I love Evvia. It's great for a nice family dinner but also great for a business lunch. Service is good, food is great and the ambience is warm and homey. Be sure to make a reservation because it's usually difficult to get a table otherwise. Of course, the spanakopita, dolmas and typical mediterranean dips are good. But what I really enjoy is some of the more unusual dishes: - zucchini cakes - Gigantes (baked beans with tomato and feta) - Saghanaki (fried cheese with lemon...really good, but just know that it's very salty) As I often find with Mediterranean food, appetizers are better than the entrees. They do have a few good pastas and whatnot, but nothing too memorable. I just wish they did a vegetarian moussaka.
I am trying to be subjective about Evvia on it's own and not Evvia Vs. Kokkari... The menu is exactly the same, being a sister restaurant you can somewhat expect that. Evvia is much smaller than Kokkari...MUCH smaller. Valet parking is somewhat strange, there is not a lot of parking in Downtown Palo Alto, they could improve on their Valet parking strategy a bit. My husband made reservations for my birthday, which was a Monday this year and this place was still a madhouse. For obvious reasons...the food is amazing. The Maitre'D was very personable and accommodating. We arrived about 15 minutes early for our reservation and were seated at our exact reservation time. We opted to wait outside as the bar was insanely crowded. We had the Spanakotiropita & the Kolokithokeftethes for appetizer and both were super, exactly as they are at Kokkari. This is actually the first time we have actually got entree's at Kokkari/Evvia as we usually get a couple appetizers, a bottle of wine, and dessert and are more than full when we leave but this time we opted to try a entree's. I tried the Moussaka and it was so good. Absolutely tasty! I have had bad experiences with Lamb and this was amazing. My husband had the Moscharisia Brizola (aka Rib Eye Steak) and said it was amazing as well. Our waiter & all other staff was very accomodating and genuine. But...seeing as this is quite the trek for us, we may opt to go back to Kokkari. I just like the SF scenery and the size of the restaurant better than this location.
What an absolutely fantastic restaurant. I've been here twice and have been blown away both times. The food here is absolutely to die for. Absolutely everything I've tried is delicious. Their meat is well-marinated/spiced and cooked to absolute perfection. It is never dry and always flavorful and juicy. Appetizers, salads, side dishes, and desserts are always so well prepared and savory. I am not a huge drinker but their selection of alcohol is quite impressive. The wait staff is fantastic. They are polite and eager to please. Considering how packed this place gets, I still feel like I get great service and attention. On a busy night, I was still able to get seated immediately despite being over an hour early for my reservation. I'd highly recommend this for a date :).
Thanks SD for dinner! Ordered: 1) Lamb Chops: 4/5, it was okay, if it was a little bit tender, I would've given it a 5/5. The lamb chops tasted like it was cooked with higher heat than normal. 2) Beef Souvlaki: 4/5: WOW, the barley pilafi was DELICIOUS..more delicious than the main ingreident, beef, on the plate. The same situation happened with my steak---cooked with higher heat than normal. 3)  Phyllo wrapped semolina custard with pistachio ice cream-5/5, oh man, DIFFERENT and DELICIOUS!!! Two bad it was like $9 and came with two dinky phyllo wraps. The ice cream was delicious as well! Worth a try though! The service was good, but the tables were super close to each other. I had to go use the restroom, and had to squeeze through chairs and the wait staff.
I'm Greek and love Greek food, that's why I was in heaven the day I found Evvia! This is the real deal. Great, authentic Greek meals in a warm, intimate atmosphere. I've tried a number of selections here and have not been disappointed once! But my favorite dish here, by far, is the lamb chops, Arnisia Paidakia - rib-cut, mesquite-grilled lamb chops with olive oil roasted potatoes. Not only are they the meatiest chops you'll find in a local restaurant, but they are the most flavorful I have ever had! And I've been eating lamb almost my entire 47 years, growing up in a Greek family. I love to cook and have tried to make lamb chops this good, and frankly I haven't been able to get close. For desert you have to try Yiaourti me Meli - home made yogurt topped with walnuts, fruit compote & honey. You've never had yogurt til you've had this! Better than ice cream, I swear! Evvia makes you even more proud to be Greek and really jealous if you're not!
ok, this place is one of the best Greek restaurants I've ever been to. Here's what we had. apps: a greek form of bruschetta (4 stars) fried zucchini cakes (4 stars) entree: Lamb chops (5+ stars) roasted pork (4.5 stars) dessert: that philo dough filled with sweet cream and pistachio ice cream. (5+ stars) it was awesome. and the service was really phenomenal.
Had a very good meal with three friends chicken lamd and fish. The fish was overdone which is why we didnt rank higher because wine and other food very good. Pricey and a fun place with lots of energy
I've been here twice in the last year and one time it was stellar and the other time was not so much. The time that it wasn't great I was with a friend after a party and they weren't very busy but the place was still off the hook loud.  We ordered small plates and one of them was burned so we sent it back.  The manager came over and apologized to us and didn't charge us for the dish so they did the right thing but they have such a high reputation to uphold that it was disappointing. The other time I came here was with a large group and everything went perfectly.  I keep highly recommending them but if you're not happy with what you get, be sure to say something to make it right.
My business partner and I were walk-ins a couple of weeks ago, Monday night. The place was packed but we managed to get 2 prime seats at the bar in the back, great view of the main dining room. Starting with the bartender who mixed a perfect Grey Goose martini and suggested an excellent bottle of Duckhorn Cab, the entire experience was first-class (my father's expression - old-school Ivy League). I had the Gigantes appetizer and the Moscharisia Brizola main course....double yumm (why my father suggested I not become a food critic). Ambiance was a classy combination of northern California cool and Greek rustic. Windows/doors opened onto Emerson so on a nice evening, the cool air and Peninsula light make for a lovely experience, even when dining with my cranky business partner. Next time you're on the Peninsula, forget Il Fornaio and all the other places du jour and get your hungry self to Evvia.
Some of the best food in Palo Alto comes from this amazing Greek place. I normally do not care for Greek food in general, but this is certainly not a typical kabob place. Expect to bump into the power brokers of Palo Alto VC community. Simply the best lamb chops I have ever had... and consistently so... I have dined here a couple dozen times and have enjoyed the lamb chops about 75% of the time I go... I always tell myself I will order something else... but it never happens. I am not a dessert person, but be sure to ask for their yogurt with honey and walnuts. Amazing! Simple. Satisfying without being too sweet. Good wine list with reasonable prices. Make sure to make reservations well in advance. Also note that just because there is no availability on OpenTable does not mean their are not tables available. Be sure to call in for the ideal dining times.
The lamb chops are to die for!!!!!!! Simply the best I've ever had anywhere.
I recieved a call from the owner today to discuss my experience and go over the events that evening. I was told he was going to investigate and get back with me. This is a positive move on his part and congratulate for reaching out. I told him about my past experience with his SF restaurant and would always have find memories of good food and good service. This establihsment in Palo Alto however needs some adjustsments and fine tuning. I will update when I have my 2nd call with him. Update; No call back as promised,I'm done with this process; another lip service....my ratings stand.
Arrived to find to my reservations was changed without notice or apology. Last visit for me, your... Read more 
I really love greek food . they offer great food but the portion are soooo small!! I give them 3 stars . Evvia Estiatorio very  very OVER priced Very nice restaurant , very crowded. it is hard to set comfortable with out touching the person in the opposite table ! basically hard to move .
yum. The lamb chops are really quite good and I like the restaurant decorations. One thing though, is that the restaurant is super tiny and we literally could hear everyone's conversations. If you are spending that kind of dough, I prefer Dio Deka.
I've heard people rave about Evvia for the last several years.  It pains me deeply to realize that I've spent 3+ years living in the Bay Area, working on the peninsula, and only this week discovered this Palo Alto precious gem! I snagged a 12:00 pm lunch reservation on Open Table about 10 days in advance.  I arrived about 15 minutes late thanks to an impromptu phone call that went late.  Parking, while not normally a challenge around University Avenue, was predictably a pain when I was running late.  The place was full of power lunching lawyers and financiers.  The hostess was a bit snappy when I pointed to my name on the reservation list while she attempted to deal with another patron.  (At this point, I noticed the enormous diamond on her finger and laughed to myself that only in Palo Alto would the wives of the wealthy be working in restaurants.)  I wasn't trying to be rude, I simply expected to be shown to my table where my guest was waiting for my arrival. The initial snafu aside, I was very pleased with the service.  Our server offered personal recommendations and went above the call of duty to divide and plate our entrees so that we could each sample a bit of the others.  After beginning with the spanakopita (by the way, who doesn't love cheesy spinach and herbs in phyllo?!) out came the albacore pita (my selection) and the chicken souvlaki (my guests selection).  It took two servers to bring us our lunch as the restaurant had gone through the effort of plating both entrees for two people.  It was an embarrassing amount of food, so needless to say, I had leftovers! I loved the light albacore tuna pita, which came with some spicy dressed greens and a bit of feta cheese.  The tuna was seared perfectly and the caramelized onions offered a sweet accent to the slightly salty pita shell.  The chicken souvlaki was coated in a zesty blend of spices and the grilled pita was among the best I've ever had.  Thicker than customary, it will be the first item I request when I return to Evvia for another magnificent meal!
EVERYTHING was DRENCHED  in oil.  Starting with the roasted beets appetizer to my porkchop entree and my friends lamb chops.  All the plates had a ring of oil and after having the bread served with dipping oil, it all just seemed to much and heavy. On a side note the service was great, but you really need to make a reservation WEEKS in advance if you want to eat before 9PM.  Not worth the rave..
Fancy Greek food? When I think of Greek food, I think of Gyro, Daphines, feta cheese. Wanted to show the girl a nice time. you know wine and dine her cause that usually leads to something good for me. hahaha. got here a little early so we had some wine at the small bar. very dim here. almost tripped over a couple of chairs cause im half blind. wanted to play the GQ look so i didnt wear my glasses. (wink) i was impress with the decor. they sat us down. waiter came by chopped it up and told us his recommendation. service was +1. got teasers, brussel sprouts and muscles, i mean mussels. so far so good. had their most popular dish the lamb chops. was impressed by the size of the lamb chops. nice and meaty. (that's what she said) bit in to it and noticed this taste like my sister's lamb chops which means it was perfect (hope she's reading this haha) over all had a good time here. price was decent. not too expensive. i would give it 5 stars but im feeling snobby today. cheers.
I've been to Evvia over 50 times, and consider it the best restaurant in Palo Alto, bar none. Manager Panos Gigonas is a great, warm-hearted guy who makes you feel at home. You can *always* count on the quality of both the food & the service; I have literally *never* been disappointed with any of the 20+ different dishes I've ordered. The wine selection is great, and if you can't get a table, the bar is always worth waiting 5-10 minutes for to get a seat for two. Evvia & Evvia staff have become a part of my life, and I am so much the richer for it!
Not worth the money. We came with a group of friends earlier this week.  Though we had fun, the food wasn't up to par at all- basic Greek restaurants in NYC serve better food for much less money. We had: -dolma - not interesting -dips combo - tatziki was tasty, taramosalata was really not interesting at all- the fish roe was not present and it just tasted like salty creamy stuff -asparagus- best part of the meal! -salmon- my SO ate it, but didn't enjoy it.  Over-salted, not very flavorful, and overcooked.  mashed potatoes that came with it were runny. -lamb shank with orzo- really not good.  I had only a few bites. orzo was floating in a thin meat sauce that had a funny (not in a good way) flavor too it.  The lamb was very tender and portion was quite big, but i didn't like the flavor of it at all. All this came out to be an expensive, mediocre meal. I'm not a fan.
You know a place is worth trying when your Greek friend tells you this is his number one spot. It can't be any Greek friend but one that still has a bit of an accent and he looks at you like he's never been more serious. So I take the chance to check it out when a friend of mine was visiting from overseas. A reservation was hard to come by but managed to get a table for later in the evening. Three things really impressed: - * The service was impeccable. First, by the barman, who looked after us while we waited to be seated. He chose out a great bottle of cab sav, moved us over to another part of the bar when the stools freed up so we could both be sitting down and even had a word with the maitre d' to ensure we weren't forgotten about (even though he reassured us, he still went ahead and talked to him). * Once seated, our waiter, Dave, was also great. My friend and I both wanted to try the Arnisia Paidakia (rib-cut, mesquite-grilled lamb chops with olive oil lemon roasted potatoes) and the suckling pig which was a special I believe. Problem solved, he quickly offered to split the lamp chop dish onto separate plates and to have the suckling pig in the middle to share. He also checked in regularly and made sure we got what we wanted, nothing seemed to be any trouble for him. * Food was really outstanding. The lamp chops were amazing (so much so that we ordered a second plate!!) and the suckling pig was also delicious (everything but the skin as it was a bit tough but hey, it's skin, that's what holds everything together so no complaints! :) The desserts were incredible - highly recommend the Yiaourti me Meli (home made yogurt topped with walnuts, Medjool dates & honey) & the Baklava (traditional baklava drizzled with honey syrup served with vanilla ice cream). Great for a special occasion as it's a bit pricey but the overall experience was very positive and definitely would come back. Oppa!
Very delicious fancy Greek food. The mezes are great (try the spanakopita or the artichoke and eggplant skewers which was oh so perfectly charred), and I really love their bubbling hot moussaka served in a bowl. Oh, and don't forget the lamb shank with orzo! I'd suggest getting a reservation before you go because this is one of the few places that is worth the price on University Ave. We did get a feisty server one time - but the service wasn't bad overall, certainly worth overlooking for the great food.
What can i say, this place rocks! They have one of the best lamb chops in California. The only thing i didn't like is their soup and salad selection. Other than that everything is perfect: atmosphere, service, wine selection.
I got the lamb chops at lunch, a friend got the lamb souvlaki. I replaced the roasted potatoes with the spinach side that comes with their fish.  It was pretty good, but then again the whole plate seemed dosed in oil which tends to make things taste good :) There were 2 lamb pieces and kind of weird--one was reeeally fatty (I'd say 80% fat, very minimal amount of meat), and the other was much more lean.  Had I known, I would have kept alternating bites of the two to balance it out.  I really like the taste of lamb fat though, but other people would probably have problems eating literally balls of pure fat--even for me it was too much. The lamb souvlaki was also really good.  Very juicy and not dry at all, nicely spiced, and not as fatty as the lamb chop. Too expensive for the amount of food overall.  If I wanted to, I could make just as tasty lamb chops at home for a fraction of the cost (and have)...
The most ridiculous meal I've had in a LONG time. In a good way. A group of us dined at Evvia for a friend's birthday. This is THE perfect place for a special celebration, or even a date night. I must say though, please make a reservation. Every single table was packed through 9-9:30pm, and the wait was crazy. It was insanely nice to walk past the madness at the door and be seated in a promptly manner. For appetizers, we started with the crispy zuccchini cakes and a plate of Greek spreads (Taramosalata, Tzatziki, and Favasalata) served with grilled pita bread. There wasn't a whole lot special about the zucchini cakes, but the pita and spread plate was just stellar. Each person at the table ordered a different dish, but me being me, was able to sample them all. - Halibut atop mushroom ragout and wild potatoes: The most AMAZING preparation of halibut I've encountered so far. Crispy exterior, moist interior, lack of fishy-ness, buttery, and just plain orgasmic. I was so glad that I ordered this as my entree. - Sea bass with tomato puree: Not a huge fan of this fish, but then sea bass isn't one of my favs. The friend who ordered this said it was a fantastic preparation. - Arnisia Paidakia: Rib-cut, mesquite-grilled lamb chops. The restaurant's signature item and the item that a chunk of Yelpers were recommending. Uber tasty. - Arni Souvlaki: Grilled lamb skewers. This dish was slightly on the medium rare side, so a bit extra chewy. The marinade was ridiculous though -- total tastebud thrill! - Evvia Pita: Essentially a Greek pizza on pita bread. The kalamata olives + feta combo was a bit overwhelming in the salt department. Very flavorful overall, but just too salty for me. For dessert we ended up ordering the special -- pumpkin bread pudding. Me + bread pudding = bff's for life. Pumpkin flavor? Oooo, so good. Definitely opt for this one, if available. The food, service, and overall atmosphere was just impeccable. I'd return here in a heartbeat. Note that it is slightly on the pricey side, so perfect for the nicer occasion or the night you feel like having a nicer meal.
Great food... Lamb chops can't go wrong!
Had the octopus for appetizer and the famous lamb chops. Both were very good. Nice atmosphere and completely packed all the time
To be honest, the first time I was here, I was not nearly impressed.  However, this time, and thanks to Yelp.  I decided to take some of the advice from Yelpers and Viola!  It was good choices! Appetizer: Octapodaki tou Yiorgou (grilled octopus) and Skasta Main: Arnisia Paidakia (Lamb Chop) Dessert: Galaktoboureko - must try Well, I'm speechless.  I kept telling my friend I don't like Mediterranean food and now here I am... so impressed with their foods. Awesome food!
If you like Greek food, Evvia is a good place for you. Yes, the food is delicious. Yes, the wine list has variety and is reasonably priced. Yes, the service is spot on. Yes, the bartenders are hot! So, what are you waiting for?
If you have not been at EVVIA , stop reading this and go NOW !  (well call and reserve they are always packed ) THE best octopus.  The best lamb . The best Greek yogurt. What can I say I'm in love with Evvia, and their amazing simple food . I lost count of how many times I've been there and the service is always  excellent.
Great food and service with an upscale yet relaxed atmosphere, open kitchen and locally sourced food.  The aroma of all the food cooking is a nice feel and tantalizes your senses to hunger. We started with the grilled octopus and spanikopita.  Both were great, the octopus was tender and very nice balance of acidity.  We ordered a pinot based on our waiters recommendation and he was spot on, the wine was great, with a nice peppery finish and lots of depth. For the entrees we had the lamb shank and moussaka which were both great, and quite large so we had to take some home.  Even the dog will be happy with the shank bone. It was my mom's bday so our waiter brought the chocolate cake and we had coffees to help us digest all the food. The service was always professional, attentive and there when you need it.  Since we are both foodies living in SF we have high standards for both food and atmosphere to enjoy the experience and want to come back, this place gets both.
Wonderful eating experience in downtown Palo Alto.  Beware it's expensive, but definitely worth it. We had drinks and appetizers at the bar while waiting for our table to be ready.  The bartender was attentive, well-versed on all menu items and gave excellent recommendations. Our table service was equally as good and the food was phenomenal.  At the end of the day, I could have ordered an appetizer, a salad and then dessert, but I had to try the fish...ugh, so filling. The lamb chops are the best, lamb meatball appetizer is delish, the sea bass was tasty and the dessert (the house specialty that has cheese wrapped in phyllo dough) was to die for...save room. In sum, food's great; service is excellent; ambiance is classy.  Highly recommend and even recommend over Kokkari in SF.
I really hate that I'm a minority of not being a huge fan of this place!  My boyfriend took me here last evening and upon walking in, I LOVED the decor, liveliness, and was shocked that it was PACKED at 9:30 on a Wednesday.  5 stars for ambiance and service, but more like 2.5 stars on the food.  Now I'm no foodie or snob, but I was overall unimpressed.  We started with the greek salad, and the feta and olives were among the best I've had.  Then we shared 4 small plates - crispy zucchini balls with a mint sauce (awesome), lamb ribs (VERY fatty), calamari (should have stuck to my gut to only order calamari at italian restaurants, the batter wasn't great), and eggplant and pepper skewer (just so-so). With how everyone raves about this place, I'll probably go back - maybe it was an off night, but to not enjoy 3 / 5 dishes, I can't rationalize the high price and high expectations just to be very disappointed.
Dear Evvia - I award you the honor of my 100th Yelp review - for an amazing meal! Visiting was an impromptu dinner decision..one of the best I've ever made. I came here on a Sunday...I called in the late morning and they were able to squeeze us in (party of 3) for a 7:30 seating.  I was ready to be wowed as I had been told good things by many people that live in the area. First up, the house made pita bread with 3 dipping sauces. Warm, toasted pita bread..tangy Tzatziki..yum! Next up, the wood grilled octopus salad - not bad, but not really my taste. Then we shared 3 dinner entrees - the lamb chops, the ravioli, and the moussaka.  The moussaka blew me away - it was the best i have ever had.  Oh, and the lamb chops - simply divine. We finished our meal with the traditional baklava and the Evvia Sundae - this sundae is a MUST ORDER - it is outstanding! Will definitely be back! Great food, service & ambiance - this place has it all!
There's a reason why Evvia doesn't take walk-ins on a Friday or Saturday night or most other nights of the week for that matter. The restaurant is known for its scrumptious Greek fare, its impeccable service, and its warm and cozy atmosphere. Oh, and let's not forget about the hot waiters, but I doubt that is the main reason for frequenting this place for the mainly middle-aged to older crowd. It's an icing on the cake for me though. Make reservations here if you want to enjoy a wonderful date night, celebrate an anniversary or if you just want to splurge a bit and enjoy a darn good meal. I've been lucky enough to sit my behind on one the six chairs at the small bar a few times, but don't come here expecting there's space there. Evvia's wait staff is extremely helpful in trying to find you the perfect glass of wine. They are happy to produce several different generous tasting pours and they know their wines, which is a huge plus for me. You'd expect the service to be a little slower judging from how busy the place is, but I've never been ignored, never had to wait long for my server to check on me and have always been treated like royalty. One of my favorite appetizers is the Xifias Souvlaki - grilled swordfish skewer with a garlic mash - you will stink afterwards, I guarantee you that, but you'll also be in heaven. Soak up the leftover sauce and olive oil with their fresh focaccia bread. The grilled lamb riblets with sage and the grilled lamb sausage are also divine. Last night I had their seasonal roasted butternut squash topped with olive oil, pumpkin seeds and pomegranate apple. It was amazing and I'm hoping to recreate it at home. The flavors here are simple, straight forward and always dead-on. I haven't had anything that I wouldn't order again. In regards to entrees, I'm generally either too stuffed from all their amazing starters to order one, or I go with the lamb shank. The meat literally melts on your tongue and all I want to do is lick the plate clean after I'm done. My boyfriend denies me that pleasure. I retaliate by ordering the Evvia Sundae for dessert. It comes topped with hot fudge, whipped cream and toasted hazelnuts. Guaranteed to send you into a food coma. Finish your meal with a nice Ouzo and a Greek coffee. Simply perfection.
AMAZING.  Hands down one on the best restaurants in Palo Alto.  I'm Greek, and let me tell you...I actually appreciated the cuisine of my heritage for once. SERVICE: Impeccable.  John, the bartender, was extremely helpful, giving us his recommendations on entrees, wine, and dessert.  We weren't even planning to eat at the bar, and he treated us like we were his only customers.  Ask him anything about the menu...he knows his stuff!  Our table server, Maria (and she is Greek as well), was wonderful and so attentive. She even packed our unfinished bottle of wine so we could enjoy it another night.  Awesome! DINNER: OMG-moment...like other reviewers have said here, you HAVE to get the lamb chops (Arnisia Paidakia).  You will not be disappointed!  They're cooked so perfectly; the meat is so tender and it comes on a bed of potatoes.  The halibut was delicious as well; not too fishy, and grilled to perfection.  And of course, the grilled Octopus (Octapodaki tou Yiorgou) as a starter is a must-have.  It's grilled and not fried, and grazed with lemon. It's light, a perfect appetizer that doesn't leave you too full. DESSERT: We ordered the Galaktoboureko  ("traditional phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream") - the ice cream is hand made.  It really is an orgasm in your mouth. The wine list is very impressive; we had the Alto Moncayo, Veraton (a garnacha red)...the John and Maria recommenced this, it went well with the lamb. TIP: Make a reservation!  This place get packed,as it was slammed until after closing. All-in-all, I had an great experience here, and we would recommend this place to any of our friends.
This place is great, very popular restaurant in palo alto so make sure you make a reservation specially for dinner. I started with the Crispy Zuccini cakes which came with cucumbers and mint yogurt, great convination. No greasy, crispy in the outside and tender in the inside :) For the entree I had the artichoke & eggplant soulaki wichita came with peppers, greek yogurt and house made pita bread, the bread was the thickest I've ever seen haha but it was very good. I also tried the lamb souvlaki but I wasn't really into it, I don't like lamb. The waiter was very nice and welcoming, he was also very charming so I can see how many women would come back just for the service.;) I  wouldn't mind coming back but I feel like I'm missing out a lot since I don't like lamb.
Out of all the times I've been here, I've only had one bad experience.  The last time I was here it was in the middle of dinner with my gf. We were sat in the back and the service was slow and the fish I ordered was oddly flavorless. Every other time the service and food has been awesome. The lamb, grilled whole fish and many other things on the menu are very good.  If not for the last experience I'd be tempted to give them 5 stars.
[ATMOSPHERE] : Cute, super cozy restaurant. And by cozy, I mean crowded. The atmosphere is warm, classy, and targeted for more towards the 40+ crowds. 80% of the waitstaff are young attractive male in their Late20's-Early30's && 80% of the customers are women. Yep. It's definitely a candy store for cougars. There were all sorts of cats that night : you've got the cougars, pumas, ...and then there's just straight up Mountain Lions. [SERVICE] : Ravioli WAS NOT worth the $20 (just leave the cooking to Chef Boyardee), but Fabio made my experience here Flawlessly Fabulous. Charming personality. Impeccable service. Overwhelmingly pampering from start to finish. I came here w/ 4 other girls and neither of us could decide what's for dessert. ____________________ FABIO : We have a surprise birthday dessert for you BIRTHDAY GIRL : Cool. Let's just do that. ____________________ A few minutes later he waltz out w/ 6 glasses of fine wine for taste-testing && some delectable desserts. Did I forget to mention that it was all complimentary? [TIP] : Sorry ladies, not the same questionably-gay-italian-stallion Fabio w/ long blonde mane who we see on TV.
I love Evvia, but due to its vicinity to work (which is 50 miles away from Alameda) and its business-attired diners, I can only consider this venue for business occasions. Once you're able to confirm a reservation, find parking and get seated (oh, and scoring an expense account would be a bonus!), everything at Evvia *should* fall into place. The biggest hiccup to the Evvia experience is the wait to be seated in a tiny cramped area between the entrance and the host/hostess computer station. Once I'm settled at my table, I usually order a glass of their Santorini to go with appetizers like the spanakotiropita, saghanaki (pan fried cheese!), and octopus salad. (I think at this point, I've tried almost everything on the menu, and I can't recall anything disappointing.) For the main course, the braised lamb shank with spices and orzo is meltingly tender. (This entree is for the very hungry and for those who are not intimidated by the sight of a gigantic bone rising above a mound of lamb and orzo.) The last time I was there, I tried the evening's special - a goat stew with vegetables and beans. It was so good, I was sad it wasn't a regular menu item. If you manage to have room for dessert, the phyllo-wrapped custard with pistachio ice cream is divine. The baklava can be a bit dense and heavy after a heavy meal (e.g., lamb shank), but it's a perfect ending if you've only grazed on small light plates.
I love the lamb chops.. its great. All their wine selections is great. I know some reviews say Kakkori is superior, I beg to differ . I lose the interest to drive up to the city for Kakkori, when Evvia is so much better and more intimate.
Evvia was exceptional. The decor is comfortable (decorated like you're in the kitchen of someone's warm, cozy home) and the service is extremely impressive. We started with grilled peppers and artichokes as an appetizer. They were drizzled with olive oil and minimal seasoning and were served with a side of fresh Greek yogurt. The warm vegetables contrasted with the cold, tart yogurt and together were incredible. I highly recommend this dish. The bread served at the table was also just out of the oven and served with a dish of olive oil and salt - couldn't get enough of it. For mains, my girlfriend had the braised lamb shank and I had the sea bass special. The lamb was served over a bed of orzo - the meat was very tender and the brown sauce that the meat was cooked in was rich and almost like a mole sauce. My sea bass was cooked in a wood stove, deboned by our server, and served with grilled onions and two slices of potato with tomatoes on them (I'm not sure how exactly they were prepared). The fish was perfect in that Mediterranean minimalist way; you could taste the salt and olive oil used to cook and flavor the fish but it was light and airy. We finished with a medium-sweet Greek coffee, an espresso (we got both to compare them), and the chocolate cake. The Greek coffee is similar to Turkish coffee, but a bit sweeter - no milk needed! The espresso was of course well-pulled. Finally, the chocolate cake was warm with a gooey middle and served with a scoop of vanilla ice cream. Overall, a FANTASTIC dinner. One of the best we've had on the Peninsula all summer!
So cozy and the food is so well prepared.
What a gem of a restaurant!  We had lamb, all 4 of us, but we saved room for the dessert and coffee.  What can I say, the best food and best lamb!  Have the baklava and the galatoboureko for dessert with the Greek coffee!!!  To get a reservation do it ahead of time it is tough, a very popular place.
This place is super romantic and filled with all TYPES of people: romantic couples, business dinners, family dinners, buttday parties celebrating. The moody was lively but very... elegant. Started the evening with the fried calamari and saghanaki. The calamari was perfectly fried and very tender. My first time trying saghanaki, it was a perfectly fried piece of overpowering cheese, but delicately seasoned. It was a bit heavy and addicting at the same time.. perfectly paired with fresh sourdough bread and a glass of red wine. It was very filling. Was debating on ordering the 'whole fish' dish as many, many people were ordering it and we saw the wait staff gutting the bones out prior to serving.. it smelled so tasty but we were already so full.... The Canadian opted for the fall-off the bone lamb shank coupled with orzo and myzithra cheese. It was a wonderfully tasting dish and perfectly cooked: well done but very juicy. After filling myself with the saghanaki, I opted for the appetizer mussels in wine sauce, which the waitress told me was big enough for a dinner and she was right. The mussels were hearty and the wine sauce was perfectly seasoned for sourdough bread dipping. We forced ourselves to make room for dessert. Before we even started our dessert order, the waitress cut us off with "The second one." Which was luckily, our choice: Vanilla bean custard wrapped in phyllo topped with pistachio ice cream. I was in heaven! If I knew it was this good, I would have just ate ten of these for dinner! Definitely coming back!
This is NOW my new favorite restaurant in the Bay Area.  Came here to celebrate my girlfriend's 40th birthday last Friday.  Wow - is all I can say. We shared the following amongst the 5 of us:  Spanakotiropita, Grilled Octopus, Psari Psito which was the grilled sea bass, Meatballs, and the Lamb Chops.  I kid you not - everything was wonderfully delicious and fresh.  I totally felt like I was having a sunset dinner in Mykonos with everything freshly prepared.  My favorites were the Sea Bass and the Octopus.  I never had octopus prepared that way with olive oil.  Oh my God, I must have died and went to culinary heaven.  Overall, it was a perfect night with my new-found amazing friends.  Couldn't have it any other way:)) I also liked all the desserts.  We had the Galaktoboureko, Sokolatina and Baklava.  I didn't like the Baklava (well, I never liked Baklava in the first place) but I loved everything else especially the Galaktobuoureko.  It is definitely a must-have. Now, I am planning a perfect date with my husband here and then perhaps go to Watercourse Way afterwards (wink, wink). Also, if you're going on a Friday night, don't bother looking for parking anymore.  They have $6 valet parking.  It is worth it.
I've never had a less than wonderful experience at Evvia. Hands down, my favorite restaurant in Palo Alto, and the best Greek food I've found anywhere on the west coast. I have yet to try their sister restaurant in SF, but I'm so in love with Evvia that you won't find me racing to the city. Consistently perfect from start to finish. The hostess was a little rude on my visit this past weekend, but that's not the norm.
A place that me and my bestie decided to try on a whim after a cupcake/wine event at B412 on a Wednesday evening.  It smelled good from outside and it literally wafted us in. This place is schmancier than we thought with white table cloths and everyone that walked in had a reservation. Woops!  Since it was only the two of us the owner was super nice and got us seated within 15 minutes. The food was definitely really good- perfectly smaller portions- just not sure if me and girl needed to spend 50 bucks each on a week night. Haha.  Its more of a date or special occasion place. What stood out the most for me was the lamb ribs that slid off the bone and the pistacio ice cream. Yum.
We just had another wonderful dinner at Evvia. You can make a meal out of the appetizers.  We recently tried the okra and the Greek cheese + locally grown green peppers.  Both were big winners for us.   I heartily endorse the Kolokithokeftethes (grilled zucchini cakes) and the gigantes (giant beans) as well.  If you have a larger group ask them to construct an appetizer combination for the table. The lampchops (their signature dish) is an amazing indulgence and all of their lamb dishes are strong. Over the years we've had the same servers many times, so seems like the crew there is stable and they definitely know their stuff. They have a pretty strong winelist. Only downsides are  (i) tough to get into for dinner unless you plan ahead or have a connection in and (ii) it's loud and a bit cramped.
YUMMM... Evvia is one of my favorite places to eat in Palo Alto, but sadly I rarely come here, which is due to several factors: 1. It's very pricey ($22/dish, according to Shirley H. -- hi, Shirley!) 2. It's surprisingly crowded and popular -- I dropped in with a date on a random Saturday night around 6, and they were completely booked and only seating those with reservations for the night. 3. It can be a bit stuffy, and I feel like it's more of a place for older people (though where in Palo Alto doesn't feel like that? Pizza My Heart, I guess.) The food is delicious though, and some of the best Greek food I've had in the Bay Area. The lamb chops were really good and I actually finished most of them -- I get bored of my food pretty quickly and rarely finish a large dish, but the lamb chops were amazing. I came here with a large group before Viennese Ball and the restaurant was very accommodating. There were several large groups there that night, but we never felt ignored or rushed.
I've been wanting to try Kokkari but was happy to get a taste at Evvia during a celebratory lunch with a group of colleagues. Our group of 8 was seated comfortably at a large round table during the busy lunch hour. The restaurant feels open and elegant and the service was courteous and friendly. But let's cut to the chase. The FOOD is what really matters here! We ordered a selection of appetizers to share. The standouts: *Lamb Riblets: tasty, juicy, suck the meat right off the bone good. *Sweet Peas: super fresh *Taramosalata, Tzatziki, Melitzanosalata with pita bread - All 3 were delish but the Tzatziki was outstanding *Gigantes: we all had a hard time getting over how GIGANTE the beans really were! *Greek Salad: light, refreshing, and feels like it came right out of the garden! We also tried the swordfish skewers, zuchhini balls, dolma, feta and olives. All were decent but not my overall favorites.The desserts also got rave reviews (sundae, yogurt with nuts and fruit) ; however I did not indulge as I had stuffed myself full of pita. Bottom line: a wonderful dining experience. Fresh food paired with a lively ambiance. And add in good conversation: it was the perfect opportunity for my group to exchange personal stories about our travels to Greece and Turkey. And since I won't be traveling to Europe anytime soon, I will be back at Evvia. As in this weekend. For date night dinner with the hubby :)
Went to the place for a special occasion. For starters, when we called to reserve a table, we were told that we would not have anything until very late that evening (around 9.30pm). We called again after 20 minutes of trying another place we thought we might like, and were told, lo and behold, we could just come on over and they would accommodate us! Even more surprising was the fact that when we did reach the restaurant at around 7pm, another couple walked in before us. We could overhear that they had no reservation, and the Maitre d' just sat them down! So, it turns out, that they don't have such a shortage of seating. We had an attentive host and were served well. The food was OK, frankly. Being from NY, we have had excellent Greek food before, and this restaurant was fine. Not amazingly outstanding, as some of the other reviewers may suggest. Since this is a more fine-dining kind of place, I wanted to add that the tables seemed much too close for a fine-dining experience, and the place was noisy. Even walking to our own table seemed full of peril since we were afraid we might knock over someone's wine glass with our bags/jackets. Overall, I would give this place between a "meh" and an OK.
By far the best Mediterranean restaurant I have been to in Palo Alto. Got the Lamb Meatballs appetizer on a recommendation from the Food Network. Absolutely delicious! For those of you who have been to Cincinnati, think Cincinnati chili in ball form. Also got the Katsiki Yiouvetsi for entree. Never had anything like it before, delicious braised goat, orzo, tomatoes and green beans stewed together and served piping hot. My only complaint was that our party had to wait 20 minutes after our reservation time to get seats. Otherwise, a flawless dining experience. Friendly waitress, good drinks and delicious food.
Crazy busy even on a random Wednesday night!  Walked in with no reservations and ate at the tiny bar, but thankfully, the bartender provided excellent service (I also had great bar-dining service at Kokkari in SF).  It doesn't sound like you can go wrong with any of the entrees on the menu!  We split a couple appetizers (both of which I previously ordered at Kokkari) and the braised lamb shank, which was more than enough for two.  The prices make it difficult for this to be a regular dinner spot (oh, and also the fact that I don't live in Palo Alto anymore...), but it'd be a great place to take guests, dates, or old friends.
So, I only had a salad and an appetizer, but both were excellent, fresh, authentic, delicious, and wonderful wine list and service.  But I have to go now, I am busy begging them to open one in Napa.
While the experience at Evvia is always fun, in my mind the food is living on its past reputation. What do I mean? Well, last Saturday I found the food uninspired and bland. Dull dull dull...Sorry!
Wonderful food.  The grilled artichoke appetizer was the best.  The salmon was perfect.  I asked our waiter to pair my meal with wine.  He made a terrific choice. Why only 4 stars you ask? - very loud restaurant, hard to hear conversations if you are there with more than 4 people. - the floor is very slippery.  Not great for women wearing heals.  Ladies beware of wearing your cute high heals at this place. Overall a very good restaurant.  Next time I will remember to wear flats : ).
The restaurant was great. Service was good and the food was fantastic. Only downside was trying to understand the menu. It was all Greek to me!
Tried to go there last night (Tuesday) at about 8pm, party of two women, professionally dressed, with no reservation. Not sure what was wrong, with the mature gentleman host working the front door but the level of attitude he directed at us the moment we crossed the threshold turned me off from this place indefinitely. I have been regular and consistent customers of Kokkari in San Francisco, and am saddened by the attitude I received at my first and now last visit to Evvia.
I thought I wrote a review for this place a while ago but I guess I just imagined it! Evvia rocks! I came here with my family a while ago and it was definitely a memorable experience. We had a reservation so we didn't have to wait. We were then helped right away by a super friendly waitress who was super patient waiting for our drink orders (they have quite a wine menu so my mom and I were figuring out what bottle the two of us wanted to down--it was our birthday dinner). We wound up getting a Southern Rhone blend and it was very good. My sister also wanted a specialty drink but virgin (she's still a young'n) and the waitress suggested a virgin mojito, which I definitely did not know existed. It wound up being really good! Anyway, the menu is a bit smaller, which is good because we know the food is high quality, and there is everything that someone would want. I got the lamb, and mmm my mouth is watering just thinking about it! The meat fell off the bone, and it was absolutely delicious. It came with risotto if my memory is correct, and I wish there was a little bit more rice provided because the lamb's saltiness balanced really well with the rice. Throughout our meal, the waitress kept coming over to our table to refill our wine--my glass was never empty! And the table was pretty much silent because we were all enjoying our food so much. Great atmosphere, really nice place to take a date who you are trying to impress, but be prepared to drop some serious bills. It's a pretty expensive restaurant but the food and service is way worth it.
Love the food and great service! Love the lamp more than anything . They make it so delicious and it does not taste gamey at all. So much flavor .Yumm!
Had a great time here. This place has a nice atmosphere and decor, although it is a little loud for my taste. We ordered two appetizers: the octopus and the lamb riblets. Both were great and came hot and fresh. Then I ordered the salmon fillet and my friend had the beef souvlaki. Again, both dishes were great! Finally, for dessert, I ordered the  Galaktoboureko  (phylo-dough filled with semolina cream served hot with pistachio ice cream); AMAZING. The bill was $130 (including two appetizers, two drinks from the bar, two entres, one dessert and 15% tip), very reasonable! Overall, I had a great experience and will definitely return to Evvia.
The pork chop was phenomenal and the bartender let me taste a couple reds before committing to ordering a (nicely sized) glass. Also, the decor is really nice. I'm a big fan.  Not sure why they try to close at 9pm on Sundays - the customers are still pouring in!
We had the lamb chops and the lamb rotisserie. The chops were good, the rotisserie not worth the money at all. Rotisserie was dry and overcooked. Veggies that came with it were undercooked and tasteless. All in all, way too pricy for what you get (quality wise, not quantity).
Every visit and every item on the menu is filled with promise and goodness! I'm usually prefer calamari but if you see the grilled octopus appetizer on the menu go for it - it's tender and flavorful and is octopus done right. The fried cheese appetizer (Saghanaki) is addictive with the bread but you must eat it right away before it gets cold, tough and greasy. Don't dismiss the Gigantes fava beans which are quite delicious and make a great side dish to the lamb chop or lamb shank entrees which are as good as all the other reviewers claim. For dessert, the warm chocolate cake is a real winner as is the phyllo wrapped custard (skip the baklava because it's just a little too ordinary in comparison; stay away from the rice pudding which is stiff, dry and kind of uncooked). You must plan in advance since it's hard to get a reservation here.
My dad was back in town on a business trip and feeling too lazy to come back up to SF a second day in a row for dinner, so I began looking for places available on Open Table and saw Evvia available. Little did I know while booking that it was the sister restaurant of Kokkari which we went to for a business dinner. We were seated promptly and started looking through the menu and ordering some starters. Of those that we ordered two that stood out were Tiganita Kalamarakia - crispy calamari with lemon, parsley & anchovy aioli Octapodaki tou Yiorgou - traditional grilled octopus with lemon, oregano & olive oil The Octopus was absolutely delicious. I could eat an entire octopus if you put it in front of me prepared by the Evvia kitchen!. I was fortunate enough to travel through the Greek Islands with a friend a couple years ago and this was just as good as it was there. Perfectly grilled slightly chewy but not tough in any way and absolutely delicious. I just ate dinner and I'm getting hungry thinking of that octopus. For entrees we got Moussaka ( baked casserole with eggplant, lamb ragout, potatoes & yogurt bechamel) and Katsiki Yiouvetsi (braised goat with roasted tomatoes, green beans, Greek olives, orzo & herb feta). The Moussaka was delicious and took me back to the meals we had on Santorini and Mykonos. I'm not sure that I've ever had goat before but this was recommended by the waiter and sounded delicious. It did not disappoint. The goat was delicious. Overall Evvia was delicious. I would highly recommend it if you are in the area, and check out Kokkari if you are in SF.
Our server on my last visit was awesome.  She read the table's fortunes since I convinced everyone to order coffee.  She brought great apps to share and samplings of dessert. This seems to be a venue of choice for business dinners so this is probably the third or 4th visit and luckily they've all been better than my first experience here.  My last few visits I've gone with the grilled fish and have enjoyed the flavor and presentation. We were asked to move to another table near the end of our meal service because ours was the only one that would accommodate the party size for the next reservation, but somehow another table got up and we no longer had to move......
I have to say that I was underwhelmed. Reading the reviews on yelp I really expected more...well for... Read more 
Excellent Service, Great food, One of my favorite restaurants in BayArea.  I would highly recommend the Fish and Lamp Chops.
I'm not one who's very familiar with Greek food and if you were to ask me in the past, I would have said that I'm not a big fan. But this place is GOOD. I came here with several co-workers for lunch on a Wednesday. We had made a reservation for 11:45am and when we arrived most of the tables were still open. However, when we left the place was packed. The service was great. Our waiter was very attentive and happy to share his recommendations. We ended up getting several appetizers to start with and I ordered the Chicken Pita for my entree. It definitely wasn't what I pictured and ended up being much better than I had expected. I love the fact that it's made with phyllo dough (very buttery and flakey). We also ordered several desserts and (of course) had to try the Baklava. Everything that we ate tasted wonderful and it was a treat to have something different. The relaxed atmosphere was also nice and even though all the tables filled up, it never got too loud. Our meal ended up being about $30 a person, but we did order a lot of food. I highly recommend this place to everyone, whether you're a Greek food person or not.
We went back for dinner, and I must say I ate a very good whole baked fish here! Still not sure this place is worth it.
not genuine greek food, overpriced for what it offeres, not impressed at all ... i feel all the... Read more 
The best Greek food in the bay area.  The restaurant is warm, the staff is friendly, their wine selection is great, and above all, the food is to die for.  Fresh local vegetables and the most delicious lamb. I've been here about 4-5 times over the past two years and they have consistently served up a fantastic experience.
You have to book a table here pretty far in advance, but it is worth the planning. Evvia is unpretentious and simply amazing. It is not haute cuisine, but it's some of the best darn chicken around. It's the best translation of "ethnic cuisine" into fine dining that I've ever seen. The flavors are bold and feel authentic. The waitstaff is knowledgeable and helpful. The daily rotisserie specials are great (but watch out because if you arrive late in the night, they may be out of the this). The wine list is great, but they're also fine with you bringing your own. I have tried most of the menu and really enjoyed a majority of dishes, but I keep going back to the baked feta and prawn appetizer.
Well you cant go wrong with this place. They served the most amazing chops, I ever had. Staff is really courteous and welcoming, and loved the rustic environment.
What's fabulous about this place (besides the lamb which is obvious, and the goat which is less obvious, and the lovely appetizer platters etc.) is that the chicken here is cooked so well that you can actually bite on the bones and they will crunch in your mouth, ala a fabulous potato chip - only with slightly more chewing required... You can see the delicious redness of marrow here. Oh, hot tip, ask for an appetizer sampler and they will put something together for you... Oh and some members of our party were flushed with the happiness of alcohol and the staff was more than courteous about that, so it's a great sort of place to go if you have people like that in your group.
The absolute best Greek food this side of Chicago! Everything was perfect. Need I say more?
I have been here twice - once for lunch and once for dinner. Both times, service and food were both good...but I guess with all the glowing reviews, I expected something a little more. The most recent time, for dinner, I shared an heirloom tomato salad, grilled octopus, tagliatelle with lamb ragu and yogurt sorbet. The tomatoes were excellent - sweet and complemented by feta and balsamic.  This dish definitely highlighted the fresh produce.  My favorite part of the octopus salad was the combination of garlic, olive oil and lemon - always a winning combination for grilled anything!  The lamb in the ragu was very tender, but I didn't like the brininess of the olives in the dish. The flavor was a but overpowering. Honestly, the highlight of the meal was dessert (which it so often is!). Yogurt sorbet over a raspberry granita - creaminess of the sorbet with the tart sweetness of the raspberry was refreshing on this hot summer night! One thing is that portion sizes are not that large. However, this is a great excuse to share a few dishes. There are also specials that always sound appetizing, including fresh fish and rotisserie of the day.  Want to try the lamb chops everyone raves about next time, when I'm more hungry!
The Background: I came here for a birthday party and they did an amazing job with a large group.  I would say there is great food, amazing service, and nice decor.  Only reason it doesn't get a higher review is because it is rather expensive. The Positives: They are really on top of their game in terms of food and service.  We had a group that spanned 4 tables and they did an excellent job waiting on us.  On top of that, the food here was really good. The Negatives: It's a very expensive restaurant.
By far the best place I have tried for Greek food! I am more of a chicken lover so I went for the Chicken Pita.  The taste, the crunch, and the consistency of all its parts was quite appetizing.  I was very much satisfied. The greek salad was tasty as well. CROWD:  During the day there is a whole lot of business professionals, I'd suggest making reservations or go sit at the bar on the corner.  The bartender was very friendly and dare I say good "eye candy" for those that are curious. ;) There are generally more middle-aged people or couples because the restaurant does give a nice cozy atmosphere. If you haven't tried Evvia and like Greek food, take a chance at this place.  You will not regret it!
evvia is amazing  i went here for graduation it was delicious i will definetly come back!!!!!
This was my first experience at a Greek restaurant, and I must say I left extremely satisfied. The place was very cozy and nice, and the staff was super helpful and friendly. My date and I arrived a little earlier than our reservation time, which was at 8:30 and the place was packed! Considering it was a Tuesday night I found that to be a little annoying, but after having the awesome Kotopoulo Souvlas - lemon-oregano rotisserie chicken with roasted root vegetables & Evvia dressing, I understood the overcrowding issue; why would't it be crowded, the food is to DIE FOR!  I will definitely be coming back here!
I was first introduced to Evvia by my boss in high school after she said that it was one of her favorite restaurants. Now that I'm a little older, I agree with her that Evvia is one of the better restaurants in the South Bay. First, the atmosphere: Evvia is always busy, whether you come for lunch (mostly business people) or dinner (families and couples), so make reservations. The restaurant has an open kitchen, which makes you almost feel like you're dining in someone's home. Last time that I visited, they were cooking a lamb, which was pretty amazing to watch. The service is attentive--waiters are polite and helpful, especially if you ask for recommendations. The food is very good. I've been here about half a dozen times, introducing my family and a number of friends to Evvia. All of them thought that the food was delicious. I recommend the lamb chops,  spanakotiropita, saghanaki (pan fried cheese with peppers on top-excellent with the complimentary bread), chicken souvlaki, and galaktoboureko (a must try if you like vanilla bean). Overall, a great restaurant to try if you're in Palo Alto, or if you're looking for an upscale Greek restaurant!
We studied their menu online before deciding to eat here.  What attracted us?  Fried smelt!  We were going to have small plates for dinner but of course that didn't happen. We didn't make a reservation, figure we will get a table if we get there early enough.  We did. Open kitchen with nice homey feel, like in someone's kitchen. What we had: Glass of Malbec and Tempranillo - $9 each - both surprisingly good. Fried smelt - ok served with a garlic spread - lemon wrapped in cloth - too small and a bit too much batter for my liking - Zarzuela is better but they only have it as special - $9 Organic heirloom tomato salad - special - served with a soft cheese mixed with dates and honey - very good - $10.50 Branzino - european sea bass - grilled, deboned served w/ boiled mustard greens - very tender and flavorful - $32 - I have to say, this is probably the 2nd restaurant outside of a Chinese restaurant where they really know how to cook the fish. Roti - slow cooked lamb all day - piece each of shoulder, chuck and shank w/ fried potato and a slice of fried skin - $32 - flavorful but  wish we ordered the infamous lamb chops instead. Rizogalo - rice pudding and summer fruit with honey - good - $8 decaf - $3  and glyko - sweet greek coffee - $5 - very flavorful - both piping hot
Let it be known that this is the place that changed my mind about lamb. First of all, I don't eat lamb.  The scent is a little too much for my delicate taste bud.  However, my friend claimed that if I don't like lamb here, I probably wont like it anywhere else.  Seeing that lamb does constitute over 50% of the menu of Evvia, I decided to try the rack of lamb.  It was absolutely the best lamb I've ever tasted.  Upon sharing it with the rest of the party, they all agreed.  It was made to perfection, juicy, melt in your mouth, with the perfect blend of aroma and seasoning that was not too vile. The service here is excellent, despite our constant crack of lame jokes.  They even catered to our request for an appetizer sampler even though it was not on the menu.  Embarrassingly, I do believe we had miscalculated and ended up tipping them only 11%.  Next time, I will do the calculations to make sure I tip them at least 30%.
I almost feel silly adding my high praise to the already ridiculously long list of people that are doing exactly the same. But I will say this:  Evvia is one of my favorite restaurants.  Anywhere.  Period.  It's that good. It's also worth noting that I usually just ignore the waiter/waitress at restaurants when they are giving the pitch on the special for the day.  At Evvia, that's basically all I ever end up ordering.  Occasionally, you can even get some Rabbit Stew (which I HIGHLY recommend doing).  Most folks that I've gone here with swear by the whole fish as well...though I'm admittedly too lazy to spend my time picking through bones while I'm eating dinner. I've never been to another Mediterranean restaurant like this.  It's just incredible.
Culinary orgasm. This is Mediterranean food done properly. The zucchini cakes, lamb meat balls, grilled artichokes & eggplant, and the sampler of dips and pita were excellent. The lamb was the real star of the show. Best lamb I've ever eaten in my life. I had the rotisserie of the day, but the chops were out of this world. I LOVE this place.
Great ambience, excellent food, impeccable service. Try the lamb chop with roasted potatoes, they're amazing!
Other than waiting 20 minutes for a table (past our reservation time), this place rocked. The food was amazing and the atmosphere was very welcoming while still upscale.  I highly recommend the saganaki!
First of all the service and the ambiance were excellent.  Mosna was our server and she was delightful.  We had a group lunch, so had a little of everything.  The owner graciously was able to get our party of 10 in when we called on short notice close to our desired time.  It seemed like a happy place to work. THE FOOD: Dolmathes were good, but a little too lemony for my palette. Zucchini cakes: Perfectly fried texture and a wonderful marrying of flavors.  I don't really like zucchini.  Think crab cakes but with texture, yogurt/garlic (liike raita) and cheese flavor. Salmon:  Cooked to perfect/ perfectly, moist and flavorful.  The Greek Fries were loved by everyone at the table, with just the right amount of feta and oregano. Beets:  If you like beets, these are refreshing with a light garlic cream and fresh grill. Butternut squash:  OMG!  With pumpkin seeds & perfectly browned butter w/spices. Olive oil:  Is fresh and virgin enough to eat with their perfectly crusty bread with warm center.  Perfect crunchy crust. Dessert:  I only had the pistachio ice cream, which accompanied some filo type desert, but it was so creamy and full of vanilla and rich egg yolk flavor with chunks of pistachio.  Two bites were quite a delight. Greek Coffee:  Similar to Turkish coffee.  I inquired about the cardamom, which the server was polite enough to ask in the back.  None. BUT, she gave me a nice sampling of their Greek coffee gratis and it was  a wonderful finish to the meal.  Next time I will sneak in cardamom. Restina:  A nice and refreshing resin flavoured wine if you enjoy it with the right part of the meal. I am definitely coming back and bringing some foodies with me.  I hear the lamb is wonderful and by the way they knew how to cook salmon, I am sure it is.
I'm going to make this one short and sweet. There are already 130 reviews about how excellent the lamb chops are here. Here's one more. GET THE LAMB CHOPS!! Wonderful list of old world and new world wines. The grilled octopus appetizer is delicious, and make sure you save room for the Evvia sundae for dessert. PACKED on a Monday night - it's probably the only spot in Palo Alto that's consistently busy every day of the week. Make resies! Money well blown.
LAMB CHOP LAMB CHOP LAMB CHOP. That is all you need to know and that is all you need to get. Grilled octopus for apps were decent; soft and chewy, but missing the grilled taste. I ordered the grilled whole fish Mediterranean sea bass ($32) and greens, paired with Thomas Fogarty Pinot Noir. Tasted very well with a squeeze of lemon. My friend regretted his goat dish after tasting my girlfriend's excellent LAMB CHOP. It was INSANELY GOOD, perfectly cooked with the right seasonings. With savory potatoes, the dish was unbeatable compared to the whole fish and goat. Super busy on a Monday night, so the service was somewhat slow, but tolerable. Ambiance was nice with warm tones and loud. For dessert. the Evvia Sundae was over-the-top indulgence ($12), but worthy for those Sweet Toothers. HIGHLY RECOMMEND the lamb chop. Period.
Wow this place is good... just thought I'd get that out of the way. My colleague is leaving for a new (better) job in SoCal.  We decide to meet halfway for lunch, to pickup his work laptop and a farewell lunch.  He suggests Cheesecake Factory in Palo Alto.  *uncomfortable pause* Hmmm...  I then exclaim, "NO CHAIN FOOD."  He says okay then, how about Evvia?  That's his favorite place in PA.  Its not chain food so I agree... then I quickly check Yelp reviews before I head out the door.  Everyone says gotta try the lamb chops.  All the way down there I'm thinking, "Please have it on the lunch menu, please have it on the lunch menu."  Yep its on there. Drinks: Aris.  Nice. Greek. Beer. Appetizer: Spanakopita.  Nice.  Perfectly flaky. Entree: Lamb Chops.  Damn nice.  There's a gazillion reviews saying the lamb chops are to die for.  Yes, get it... even if you're vegetarian.  Its $28 for lunch but you only live twice and there's no lamb in heaven (or hell depending on your behavior). Dessert: Galaktoboureko and Sokolatina.  Wow both were really nice.  The chocolate (Sokolatina) would be perfect with port or coffee... its heavenly.  Girls take note. Sure its a bit expensive for lunch ($100 for two, excluding tip), but I told my friend and colleague that everyone should get a farewell lunch... just don't come back.  Okay I was kidding.  Bring someone here if you want to show them an excellent meal with attentive, friendly service.  Worthy of all five stars. Free 2 hour parking right across the street BTW, very cool.
I've been stuck in the bubble that is Palo Alto for the past two and a half weeks.  Being that I am a Cal Golden Bear through and through I am supposed to hate this place...  Prices are through the roof and it lacks the diversity that I love in Berkeley, but try as I might, I cannot bring myself to do it.  There are far too many good eateries here to hate this place.  There are some other redeeming qualities in this town, but I'm not going to admit them. Evvia is the latest of my culinary adventures at the Farm and it's oh so good.  Although the restaurant was packed both nights that I dined here, the service was great.  Just the right amount of attentiveness, without the hover that some servers mistake for good service. After trying many different dishes these are my favorite: Salata Epohis and Katsiki Yiouvetsi, a.k.a. a yummy salad and braised goat.  The salad had shaved fennel, heirloom cherry tomatoes, manouri cheese and Marcona almonds.  The sweet tomatoes along with the light licorice flavor of fennel balanced the creaminess of the cheese and the richness of the almonds.  Perfectly dressed and perfectly seasoned.  The braised goat was beautifully presented in the earthenware dish in which it was cooked.  Tender and flavorful without any excess fat.  The artichokes, roasted garlic, pearl onions and feta were the perfect accompaniments to the Napa valley goat and orzo.  Don't be afraid of goat because it's delicious! Palo Alto may be winning me over, but I can still bitch about Stanfurd.  Stupid tree... :)
I wanted to give this place 5 stars--whenever we go out to dinner, my dining partner always asks what rating I'm going to give it, and yes he reads my reviews (HIIII!! SHOUTOUT! kthxbai) After I had so explicitly mentioned that I wanted to go somewhere in San Mateo, he made reservations at this place instead. In Palo Alto. Not San Mateo. BUT! I can't blame the boy for trying, he spent a bunch of time earlier yesterday trying to find a place open after 9pm and couldn't. The service is damn near impeccable here, but they seemed a little rushed because it was the end of the night and we kept ordering food. I'm not too familiar with Greek food--Greek people, yes. One of my best friends happens to be full 100% Greek and he lets me know all the time. BUT! I have to say my first introduction with full-out Greek food was amazing. The wood oven baked Prawns with tomato and feta were burning hot and delicious--the sauce reminded me of Spain for some reason. It tasted homecooked, which isn't something you get out of a restaurant these days. Then my dining partner mentioned that his guilty pleasure is the lamb meatballs, which were served beautifully on our bread plates. Once again, very, very well done. The Katsiki Yiouvetsi is Napa Valley goat braised with pearl onions, artichokes & feta cheese, which he ordered. OMG. AMAZING. I'll be ordering this next time, THANK YOU VERY MUCH. Wanting to try something new, I got the Moussaka, which is a baked casserole with eggplant, lamb ragout, potatoes & yogurt bechamel. Yes, that was good--but not spectacular like the goat was. I took both mine AND his food home, and it's waiting patiently to be eaten at 1pm. Because I am a pig, I ordered two desserts. And Greek coffee. Which I will be returning to Palo Alto again tonight to get, I think. For dessert we got the Galaktoboureko, which is traditional phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream --no, you're right. I didn't even  TRY to pronounce that--and the Sokolatina, a warm chocolate cake with vanilla ice cream & dark chocolate sauce. The Galaktoboureko (that took 5 seconds to spell) was awesome, I'll be ordering that again for SURE. The Sokolatina however, lacked something. I don't know what it is, but for some reason every chocolate cake I try just doesn't...TASTE right. It's good, no doubt, but...there's a certain negative je ne sais quoi I can't put my finger on. The fork had something to do with it, because I could taste that too. Until then, I will be putting my fingers in the cake, and eating with my hands. Overall, it was good. Our waiter recommended a wonderful chardonnay for me (ask for one with a lot of melelatic fermentation and they ACT like they know that is--hell I don't even know what it is, I just know it's delicious!), and I, somehow, managed to stay sober. Enough to not stumble over to the kareoke bar next door and belt out Journey. Because seriously, no one wants to hear that shit.
On my recent return here, I decided this place offers comfort food at its finest. It really is Suany Fat Pants' paradise. I voraciously munched on the complimentary bread, shared two appetizers, licked my entree plate clean and stole part of my pig-out partner's dish. Breakdown time! -The Evvia Pita is definitely worth the carbs. Piled with caramelized onions, olives, tomato slices and cheese, I had to restrain myself from eating the entire order. I'd choose this over sexytime anyday. - Flavorful and succulent oven-baked prawns in a tomato-based sauce. Too bad the appetizer portion only consists of four prawns. Stiiiingyyy! -Best lamb chops ever! I'm salivating right now just thinking about this dish. -While the ribeye steak is good, it's definitely outshined by the lamb chops. -Don't even get me started on the olive oil roasted potatoes that accompany the lamb chops and steak entrees - VERY crispy on the outside, soft and fluffy on the inside. While three wedges look measly, it's definitely plenty for one person. Sofa king delicious! There was a douche sitting at the table next to us who would not stop talking loudly about his work experience in the restaurant industry and how Evvia is "THE best restaurant in Palo Alto". Just his luck, I was enjoying my food way too much to get out of my seat or I would have walked over and shoved my elephantitis tranny balls in his piehole to shut him up.
I've probably passed by Evvia 100 times before finally deciding to have dinner here on a whim. As... Read more 
Delicious, rich and I am a fatty mcfatterton after dining here for a delicious lunch date with my BFF (oh yeah, I should mention I was a fatty mcfatterton here and THEN had a milkshake from the PAC up the street!) We had lunch here prior to heading to Half Moon Bay for our overnight and since my husband does not like Greek food at all, I was hoping that this place would be worth it....and it was! The bread was served with a really really good eggplant spread. Not something quite new but not quite like something I have had before. We ordered some kind of thing to share with a wonderful what must be house made thick pita bread. It was heavenly and I would go back for this. For a main course, I ordered some kind of Chicken "Pita"  that wasn't pita at all, but a rich chicken and spinach concoction in phyllo dough. It was rich, buttery, fattening tasting, and melted in my mouth. It was so wonderful, but I could only eat a portion of it as it was so rich and I am sans a gallbladder. Since my BFF also Yelps, I will leave it to her to review her meal (she had a salad and a soup of some kind if I remember correctly) and we were both too full for dessert here (but I did find room for dessert up the street a short time later!) YUM YUM YUM-this place is worth coming to!
Lemonade- yes, that's right. The lemonade here is a 10/10. It's fresh, and not too sweet. Doesn't taste like syrup concentrated lemonade you find in the grocery store, which some restaurants try to pass off as "freshly squeezed." Prawns appetizer - I believe they took it off the menu, but in case they put it back on, it's a great dish to begin your meal with. Spanakotiropita/Horopita (because of the spinach crisis, they now use wild greens) - I LOVE the cheese pies here. They are soooo good, flaky, and full of flavor. I wish they'd make them a little bigger, or add more to the portion of two. Dolmathes - I'm not  a big fan of Dolmathes, but my bf LOVES them here. Taramosalata, Melitzanosalata or Tzatziki - These are all very good, especially the roasted eggplant dip. Could use more garlic though. But I have learned that people were complaining about the garlic so now you  have to ask for more. WTH! Just chew some gum or brush your teeth. Lamb meatballs - Cooked medium, this is good shit! Accompanied with slices of cucumber and yogurt sauce. Riblets appetizer - GOOOD!!!!!!! Avgolemono Gia Dio - This is a very light cream and lemon soup with small shreds of chicken and rice. Think chicken noodle soup, but lighter with lots of lemon in it. Pretty tasty. Moussaka - Not a big fan of Moussaka, but I have ordered it here. The waiter recommended it to me as he is a big Moussaka fan and said it is great here. I tried it, was tasty, but not my preference of flavors. The waiter asked me how I liked it and I said that "yes, it's good, but not really my favorite flavors." He was gracious enough to order me Souvlaki instead. Because my  bf already had his lamb chops, he gave us free Spanakotiropita to munch on since I had to wait for my order. He also gave us TWO FREE LAMB CHOPS! And he gave us two free desserts (lava cake and the custard dessert)!  How cool is that? Mosharisia Brizola  - Rib eye is great. Yummm medium rare! Kokinisto me Manestra - Not a big lamb fan, but this lamb shank is extremely tender, falls right off the bone. Great flavor and seasoning all around. Souvlaki - I always order the beef souvlaki. It is one of my favorites. The spices are perfect, and I love the little wrapped lemon they give you. The rice is DELICIOUS, and the mushrooms too. Perfect compliments to eachother. Arnisia Paidakia - I normally don't like lamb, but the lamb here is SO GOOD!!!!!! Ordered medium rare, juicy, succulent, full of flavor. Can't go wrong here. I've made all my friends try it, even the ones that aren't lamb fans and they loved it. Raviolia - This was tasty, but I prefer their other entrees. Chicken Kabob - Very good, similar to the beef souvlaki. Fragokota - rotisserie faraona hen over almond wood with faro dolmas & baby turnips. This is very very good. But I will stick to the beef and lamb dishes as I think that is Evvia specialties. Plus, I'm a beef girl. Pacific Sea Bass - sea bass on a ragout of fresh beans, artichokes & olives with a sweet pepper dressing. This is a great dish if you are a sea bass lover. However, seafood is not my main love (meat is), but I found this dish to be tasty and light. Satisfying as well despite the lightness of it. Galaktoboureko - THIS IS MY ULTIMATE FAVORITE DESSERT EVER!!! I can't believe how perfect (to me) that this dessert is. I LOVE custard, and I love phyllo. Put them together *drool.* The pistachio ice cream is also perfect, not too sweet w/ real pistachios in it. This is the real deal. Sometimes I go to Evvia just for this. Sokolatina - This is my second favorite lava cake. (My first favorite is at the CIA in Napa). You can't go wrong with a well prepared lava cake with vanilla bean ice cream. Rizogalo - I had this a long time ago, but I remember it being very good. I love rice pudding. I just can't get myself to order anything else again except for the custard dessert or the lava cake. Metrio Greek Coffee - I have to try everything once. Greek coffee is a bit gritty (as intended) and you aren't supposed to stir it. I'm a coffee/cappucino/latte lover so this was "interesting" to me. Probably something you have to acquire a taste for. Perhaps the espresso lover would like it more? Sea bass - Very light but had the right amount of flavor. I still am a red meat girl so it wasn't as satisfying. I fell in love with Evvia the first time I ate there. Sadly, they cut their portions in half the past year. One of my favorite restaurants in the area. Great service. Waiters are honest about recommendations. See my Moussaka description. =) Beware, $20 corking fee. Oh well. --------------------------- Update --------------------------- I took my coworker here for lunch. We had the spanakopita, pita dips, lamb chops, and custard dessert. He had no words to describe this meal. It was so delicious to him that he said it made his toes curl. HAHAHHA! He is also not a lamb fan, but he absolutely loved it.
Its always hard reviewing a place where everyone else who has reviewed it says the same thing....... LAMB CHOPS vs LAMB SHANK *~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~ Let me tell you, both are a knockout. Went on a weekday (packed) and didn't get to order the special (lamb chops are a regular menu item, but shank is a daily special on ... special days? so redundant) because they had run OUT. It was only 7, so don't be indecisive like me. Either way, both will leave you happy. *~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~*~ I tried the calamari and spanakopita for appetizers, and the filo pastry filled with custard with pistachio ice cream on the side. AMAZING DESSERT. I recommend if you are a fatty like me, to eat everything I ate because the whole meal was phenom. Make sure to call ahead; its a pretty crowded place! Also, its a tad on the pricy side....even still, well worth it.
Evvia had been on my bookmark list for a few years.  I have NO idea why it took me this long to finally try it!  I want to kick myself for depriving myself of such goodness.  Evvia is simply divine. My boyfriend and I came to Evvia on one of our first dates and it was a fantastic experience.  Not only was the food fantastic, but the atmosphere and great service made us love the restaurant even more. We ordered a fantastic bottle of white wine and the following dishes: Crispy Zucchini Cakes - with cucumber & garlic skordalia - $8.75 - lightly fried and oh-so-delicious Avgolemono Soup - traditional egg-lemon soup with chicken & rice - $7.50 - It's so hard to find a good avgolemono soup, and this one is fantastic. Beef Souvlaki - beef filet, sweet peppers, mushrooms & onions with Cretan rice - $20.75 - The beef was flavorful and perfectly cooked. I wish we were hungrier so we could have tried more dishes.  I would love to come back with a bigger group so I can sample a little of everything.  ;)  I was eyeing every dish that the waiters/waitresses were bringing out. The prices at Evvia are on the high-end, but the great food, excellent service, and warm atmosphere make it worth every penny!
WARNING** WARNING** WARNING** $71.50 bill for...lunch. 2 people, before tip, without drinks. Ughh. Okay, anyone who has read my prior reviews knows that I defend restaurants that are pricey claiming, "you get what you pay for!" In my opinion, this was outta control. Let me regale you with why our bill was so high. I took out a friend who happens to be moving to Arizona so it was my bon voyage gift to him. We ordered a starter, zucchini cakes ($8.75); 2 entrees, chicken soulvaki ($16.50) & the special of the day, a whole grilled fish (AQ); Ended with dessert, Galaktoboureko ($8.75), which was pretty amazing. So, my friend's fish dish was listed as AQ on the menu. Of course neither of us asked the price. It was $32.50. For dinner this seems completely reasonable but for lunch it just shocked me. The restaurant was beautiful, the service was very good (aside from the snooty hostess who was VERY Palo Alto) and the food was all very quality. I loved the dessert the most. I guess I did learn a lesson however: Get the quote on the special so you don't have an "oh S**t" moment when you get the bill.
Told this was one of the best restaurants in Palo Alto, it wasn't a surprise to find that even with a month's advance planning we couldn't get a reservation for the team later than 6:15 p.m. last night.  I'd been craving good Greek food and Evvia delivered. We all started with shared appetizers and I have to compliment our waitress who arranged that there would be sufficient for each diner to sample everything even though the party size was an oddball five. But the entree was the highlight.  It was a lamb night all the way.  While one person strayed to the chicken, there were two lamb chop orders from the table, one lamb shank, and then my order of the night's special rotisserie lamb fixed three ways.  The difference between 4 and 5 stars is the "hmmm" factor when you find yourself helplessly making noises while you bite into the succulent dish.  I just kept groaning while I progressed through the plate.  I liked the roasted potatoes, but the roast lamb with fresh-squeezed lemon on it was absolutely amazing!!!  And there was even some yummy crackling cooked perfectly.  OMW.  Absolutely perfect!!! For dessert we shared some baklava (no big deal), but all agreed the Galaktoboureko (custard stuffed phyllo) was wonderful and its only shortfall was based on the wish there was more on the plate (I think there was a secret wish at the table that each had their own order, and sincere regret about the decision to share). Evvia ... really, really, really good.
Evvia Estiatorio is amazing! I had an incredible dinner here with my sister and friends. I can not tell you how amazing it was.  The ambiance is rustic.. I had a fine glass of wine to start.  Each dish had it's own unique, rich flavor.. Evvia gave me a lingering impression of excellence all across the board.. the cuisine.. ambiance.. and just to experience it all in one place.. Magnifique!
We went here on Friday night for our annual friend's Christmas White Elephant dinner. Ok so we get there at 9pm because it's the only time that they had left for a party of 10 so close to Christmas. Amazingly I get there on time! That virtually never happens when I am going to meet a group. I have like perfected my lateness so well that I can effectively order from the menu while during my drive to the occasion usually now, but alas I did not have to use those skills this time. None of us knew what to order so we went with some wine, and then appetizers chosen by the waiter. We had spanakotiropita which is delicious because it's wrapped in phyllo dough which is always yum. Then we had the dolmathes which I never love because of the dill and lemon, I just don't like the sourness of it. The flatbread was good, as well as the classic greek salad. The best appetizer was the grilled octopus. It was amazing. For the entrees I ordered the special of the day which was a whole sea bass with scalloped potatoes. It was truly truly truly outrageous, whoa Jem! Unfortunate for me they included this really cool half of lemon covered in cheese cloth to prevent the pulp and seeds from spreading all over the fish, but I went all crazy with it and made my bass extremely tart with lemony juices. But alas it was still good. The Moussaka which a friend had next to me was SO good. It was like a lasagna with lamb or something, minus the pasta. But really good. I think the eggplant could have been cooked just slightly longer so that it would have been softer, nevertheless it was still good. The lamb shank was also tres yummy, not being lamby flavored at all, which sometimes it can get and in which case I hate. The Moscharisia Brizola was the dish I regretted not getting after having a delicious slice.  It's basically grilled aged rib eye steak with olive oil lemon roasted potatoes. I just am a meat and potatoes kinda gal. I heart beef so much so much. I was really impressed with this restaurants selection of entrees. Their appetizers were ok, but the main feast delicious.
O.....M.....G.... I loved this place!  (So much so - I wrote a novel!)  OK sure it's not on par with my Michael Mina or French Laundry dining experiences but perhaps that's why I loved it so much:  My expectations were not off the charts like they are when I dine at a Michelin-rated hot spot.  Heck, and I don't even love Greek food! First off - I (yes, a little oddly) enjoyed Evvia's location.  It's not smack in the middle of University but a little more modestly located just off the "main strip" on Emerson.  There is valet parking for $6, plus of course your offering of tip. Stepping inside Evvia on this cool November evening was one of the most welcoming feelings I've experienced upon entering an eatery in a long time!  The restaurant has a warm, cozy, rustic feel without feeling old or worn.  It felt like a classy yet cozy lodge in the woods.  The ceilings were high, the large flower arrangements of orange, yellow and browns reminded me that Fall is upon us, the open kitchen was warm and bustling, the happy din of a packed room of diners told me people were enjoying themselves, there was what appeared to be a fireplace/fire-pit to the side though I don't recall if it was operating. As I stated earlier, I don't love Greek food.  I don't crave it like I crave other fare...  I'm therefore not very familiar with it.  But Evvia's menu was simple, not overwhelming and helpfully explained what each (very long titled) menu item was.  Our biggest problem was deciding whether to order an appetizer and two entrees or to order a handful of appetizers and split an entree.  In the end we settled on the latter so that we could sample more menu items.  We started with glasses of wine.  A Merlot for my friend and a Rose' for moi.  Mmmm the perfect way to begin a cozy meal. First came our Spanakotiropita and my being so far removed from anything Greek - I don't quite understand why it's not called Spanakopita since it seemed to be the same thing in my experience.  [Perhaps someone reading this who knows can message/compliment me and inform!]  Fried crispy without being heavy, the spinach and feta inside this little filo package was perfect and not too salty.  Two of these yummy little triangles arrived - delivered to the table on one plate and quickly served to each of us with an olive to garnish. Next came our Kolokithokeftethes.  Please don't ask me to say that five times fast.  Or even once for that matter...  These were perhaps my least favorite of the items we ordered.  Not because they weren't good but because they weren't spectacularly memorable like the other items.  These fried zucchini cakes were tasty; slightly crispy on the outside and soft and warm on the inside.  They were served with a small mound of skordalia - a garlicky, potato mash. The Evvia Pita should perhaps be called the "Evvia Pizza".  That's exactly what it looked like, tho there was no tomato sauce to be seen (Thank God).  A wonderfully soft, toasty pita was covered in sweet carmelized onions then sprinkled with a mild white cheese, sweet cherry tomatoes, bits of olives and a smattering of basil leaves.  The whole thing had a gentle flavor.  No one ingredient stood out and the whole thing was delicious - though filling! Our entree for the night was one I knew we couldn't pass up after reading other reviews: the Kokinisto me Manestra; aka lamb shank.  I love lamb shank.  This one was no exception.  The meat was moist and tender to the point one could cut it with a fork.  The shank was served over a small pool of orzo swimming in the liquid from the lamb shank preparation.  I was slightly disappointed that the broth was a bit too salty.  It's a shame when this happens at a restaurant since (NOTE TO CHEFS!!  I can't believe this is news:) diners can always salt their own foods but of course we cannot remove salt from said food!  Sheez...  Good thing it was not over-poweringly salty which is why I still give it high marks. My dinner companion was the same friend who started me down my "tart yogurt" path to happiness at places like Fraiche and Harmony.  So it seemed only fitting for us to order the Yiaourti me Meli - homemade yogurt with walnuts, poached dried fruit and honey - for dessert.  We were not disappointed.  The yogurt was smooth and thick and so tart that my friend had to slow down a short way through saying her throat was tingling from the tartness (she was perhaps the slightest bit tipsy from her generous glass of wine too :P).  I had no problem polishing off a larger portion of our yogurt and almost wanted to lick the bowl! We split our bill down the middle, both paying $50 for this truly wonderful dining experience.  I'm looking forward to returning and broadening my repertoire of familiarity with Greek dishes!
It's 1999 again, folks. The pundits have been predicting a full return to our dot-com glory days for a while now, but I'm calling those days officially "back" as of last night. I had dinner with an old buddy last night in downtown Palo Alto (and yes, just to get us off on the right foot here, he's a Web-1.0-business-development type too). We met up at the Blue Chalk (that's right, you're getting the theme now), which was of course closed for a private reception. Who's renting it out, you ask? Why naturally it's a group from AOL alongside their friends in interactive ad agencies, brand advertising clients and a handful of VCs. So anyhow, we chuckle at this and, given that we weren't planning to eat at Blue Chalk anyhow, we wander north in search of food and shelter at one of Palo Alto's wide selection of 3.5 star, techie-serving eateries. We are turned away by long waits from our first three stops because, despite the fact it's 8:30pm on a Tuesday, every one of these places is literally overflowing with the well-coiffed, jacket-and-slacks-wearing private equity crowd and their gelled-if-not-quite-as-well-coiffed, jacket-and-jeans-wearing friends who run marketing for one of the local start-ups.  Eventually we end up at Evvia, which is packed with the same crowd and requires a 30 minute wait... but by now we've foregone the dream of fast service, so we jostle through a few striped shirts to buy time at the bar. The dinner itself at Evvia was great, just as it's been on my other 4 or 5 visits.  We started with their classic dip-and-pita plate that's always my highlight, then split the Moussaka (super heavy but tasty) and an excellent pork rotisserie special with green olives and new potatoes.  We also shared a bottle of the house Zin, which was fine but a little sweet for my taste. So I'll see you at Evvia sometime soon.  Heck, if we're going to be in a bubble again, I'm not going to sit on the sidelines. [phone rings] Okay, better run.  I've got some co-branded Web marketing deals to work on.
If you can't afford a ticket to Greece, why not just stroll over to Evvia?  The food is authentically Greek, not overdone, and finished enough to feel like you're in one of the best tavernas on the Greek Isles. The menu has a multitude of appetizers or mezes.  You could leave very satisfied dining on these alone.  My favorites are the fire grilled octopus (tender on the inside, crisp like bacon on the outside) drizzled with a lemon-olive oil vinaigrette; and of course, there is the gold standard: Saganaki (fried Kefalotyri Cheese, with lemon squeezed on top).  If this is on a menu, I order it, no matter what. A delicious assortment of rustic breads fill your basket, waiting to be dipped in olive oil and sea salt.  And in the Greek way, you must sop up the extra juices from your mezes. Entrees include the traditional red meat Greek bonanza, but Evvia offers other options such as several types of fish, roasted chicken, and a pasta dish. You can order a whole fish grilled or baked, each with its own accouterments.  We ordered the baked, which was surrounded by roasted onions, tomatoes, olives, and potatoes.  The fish was moist, and the skin crisped to perfection.  Am I making you drool yet? Now, for dessert.  If you must try only one, try the Galaktoboureko, golden phyllo wrapped around warm semolina custard, with a side of pistachio gelato. Lastly, and my favorite part: Greek coffee.  They have traditional Greek coffee that will keep you up till the sun rises.   When finished you can turn over your cup and if you have a Ya Ya, or Thea, she can tell your fortune with the grounds.  It may result in you having to carry garlic in your pockets, or an evil eye pinned to your jacket, but the experience will be truly authentic. Extra points for serving the Greek's own crack: Frappe.  This is what it means to be Greek in the summer.  Aerated iced coffee that is whipped into heavenly lightness and then poured over ice.   No relation to the Frappuccino, this drink is all Greek. If Greece hasn't made its way onto your itinerary yet, make Evvia your next stop, it's the next best thing.
This is a fave restaurant of one of my good friends and she insisted I try it so on her day off we ventured off to Palo Alto to give it a shot. When we arrived we were greeted by a waitress and thankfully my dining companion made a reservation because it looked like the restaurant was packed with business folks entertaining clients. Immediately after we were seated we were greeted with some warm bread and some olive oil and salt for dipping. Pretty tasty- I loved the center of the bread since it was nice and soft but the edges were just too crunchy for my liking. For an appetizer we tried the taramosalata, tzatziki and melitzanosalata  sampler platter served with house made grilled pita bread. Delicious! The platter also contained some dolmathes (grape leaves stuffed with rice, mint, dill, tomatoes, olive oil & lemon), some cucumber slices and some olives. Overall a great way to start our lunch journey into Greek food. For my entree I selected an albacore tuna pita. The name alone intrigued me enough and since I've been in a total fish mood I went for it. I knew I made a good choice when everyone around us was ordering it! Plus my dining companion said she hadn't seen it on the menu before so it must be a relatively new item. The tuna was cooked perfectly and served in a pita bread with red pepper, carmelized onions and some kind of green sauce. For the pita itself it was good but I think they may have left it in the oven a slight bit too long for it became kind of hard on the bottom making it hard to cut with a knife. The pita was served with a bed of mixed greens and fresh onion slivers. I had a great time at Evvia and will definitely come back to try some of their other dishes. Service was very attentive and professional (i love how they change utensils for you after the appetizer course) and food was good, albeit a little on the pricier side. If you want to check it out, I highly recommend making a reservation!
*FLASH* *FLASH* *FLASH* You would think we were japanese tourists the way we were paparazzi-ing our way through dinner. But I guess that's what happens when you eat with another foodie who likes to take pictures of anything and everything from the food to the decor...hey, waiter! Strike a pose! *FLASH* Palo Alto has some hidden gems so when Jason C. suggested this Greek place, I was excited to try it especially since I found out it was the sister restaurant to a place I'd been wanting to go to, Kokkari in SF http://www.yelp.com/biz/... It was a rainy day but the minute I stepped into Evvia, I was warmed up by the decor and there was a complete holiday feel to it - from the xmas lights to the large wreaths http://static.px.yelp.co... . We were seated at a cozy table by the open kitchen..and by cozy, I meant warm...as in hot...right across from the wood burning stove http://static.px.yelp.co... . As if my Asian face needed another way to get redder, especially after a glass of Pinot. We started out with the zucchini cakes which the waiter proceeded to take the time to individually put on our plates...talk about service! I bet Jason C. was hoping the waiter would then spoon feed him airplane-into-the-mouth-style. Flavorful dipping sauce but would have been better if the batter was crispier than oily. http://static.px.yelp.co... The brussel sprouts were a bit too charred so some I had to remove the outer layer..but it was for my mom, who said always eat your vegetables. http://static.px.yelp.co... The salmon arrived at our table - even though we didn't order it. And being the Asians we are, we told the waiter he was more than welcome to leave the dish there..uhmm free of charge. We didn't taste it, but of course had to sneak in a picture. http://static.px.yelp.co... OHHH EMM GEEE...the lamb chops were delicious! Perfectly spiced, well-charred, and cooked to a good medium rare - not gamey tasting at all. The reviews on here that raved about the lamb were no joke. http://static.px.yelp.co... And to continue our meatatarian escapade, we ordered the lamb shanks as well. The meat wasn't overly dry and the orzo was a perfect complement to the dish. http://static.px.yelp.co... He eyed the chocolate cake on someone else's table even before we sat down. I still think Roy's ( http://www.yelp.com/biz/... ) has the best chocolate cake hands-down but the one here was still pretty good. But how can you go wrong with oozing chocolate and ice cream? And oh yes..cookie crumbles. http://static.px.yelp.co... 5-star rating for the service alone. I really do believe that service can make or break a meal - our waiter was very attentive without being overbearing, knowledgeable about the food & wine, and offered to take a picture of us without us even asking (hmm maybe he DID think we were japanese tourists) Great place for a first-date-must-impress-her-but-look-like-I'm-not-trying...or a second-date-so-I-can-get-a-third-date-to-seal-the-deal type place. HA. Or even for a small group dinner. Okay, we'll just say any occasion...like days that end in Y. Thumbs up for Greek food..just more of a reason for me to travel to Greece...now! Thanks Jason C. for introducing me to here...and for letting me use your credit card to treat you to dinner :P
I've had great meals and good service at Evvia once seated...leading up to that the service has been insulting.  I live in downtown PA and have wandered in to Evvia several times for dinner after/before a movie at the neighboring Aquarius theater. Several times the hostess has made us feel completely unwelcome.  Generally unfriendly, they practically laugh in your face if you dare to enter without a reservation. The mark of a truly great restaurant is one that can handle success with grace.
Excellent food, service can be spotty. I've been here many times and in general it's fantastic. It's one of my favorite restaurants in Palo Alto and will continue to be even though I've had a few issues. But let's start with the good: Amazing food. Lamb Chops, Steaks and in general anything that comes off their grill is crazy good. Starters, salads and soups are all mostly good. There is one "deconstructed" salad that freaked out a friend of ours. I've had the classic Greek and the arugula and both were great. The lentil soup is really good, but not amazing. I highly recommend the Feta cheese. The custard dessert used to be amazing in the past, but I haven't tried it in some time. It probably still is. The bad: Service. So of like 5-6 times I've been here, maybe 1-2 had bad service moments. Last week we had a waitress who really should not be working there. Issues included: - Rolling her eyes at us and sighing. Fake smile when we looked at her. - Bringing out a salad after the entree and bringing out the wrong one - Hastily grinding pepper like she was taking out her problems on it - Taking away plates too early, seemed to be hurrying us along. If she would have grabbed my plate with Feta still on it, I might have had to take her outside. :) Once in the past I got an undercooked bird on Valentines day. Rough because they turned down the lights even more than usual and I had to use the back light of my cell phone to confirm that I was eating bird sushi. Over all I'll still keep coming here (although if I get that waitress again I'll probably ask for another or have a frank talk with her). Other things: Nice ambiance, huge menus (food and wine), and you are fairly tightly packed in but the tables are turned nicely. Nice licorice candies -- don't eat too many!
I've been back twice since my previous review, making total visits at least 5 that I can remember. The first time with my family, everything was smashing. Among the other dishes I mentioned previously, we had the delicious Garides tou Fournou (oven baked prawns with tomato & feta). My mother commented that any restaurant that still makes fresh, hot coffee past 10pm is okay with her. I was there again on a fairly busy Wednesday night (good to see them busy even in this economic climate, but I suspect places that are consistently good will never have a problem). They are adjusting prices. The same bottle of wine which cost us nearly $100 last year was $66 last night. The waiter remembered me from my family visit over a month ago, which may be an indication that I'm there too much. But oh, you can never be there too much. Not only did I get myself a yummy meal, my date (who had never eaten there before) was supremely impressed. It probably helped that we finished the entire bottle of 2006 Thimiopoulos Uranos Xinomavro between us, but anything to ensure an amazing first date, right? Speaking of dates: this a solid place to do it. The atmosphere is fun and loud so you can really get to know each other without having to keep your voice down. The food is impressive. The service is warm. The wine will lubricate the conversation. Guys, you will look good if you bring the ladies here. Ladies, I will commit light treason for you if you bring me here. I've actually done some math and I have numbers for you now. 3 starters + 2 entrees + 2 coffees + 1 dessert + wine + tip = about $100 per person. FYI. my favorites: Octapodaki tou Yiorgou - traditional grilled octopus with lemon, oregano & olive oil Anginares Souvlaki - grilled artichokes & eggplant skewer with Greek yogurt Arnisia Paidakia - rib-cut, mesquite-grilled lamb chops with olive oil roasted potatoes Psari Psito - whole fish with lemon-oregano vinaigrette & horta greens (usually grilled branzino) Rizogalo - arborio rice pudding with poached dried fruits (no more roasted pear)
Evvia calls themselves Hellenic or Mediterranean cuisine with new California influence, but I feel... Read more 
"Everything is good," Art S. kept on saying. Is the lamb good?  Yea... everything is good.  Oooh, what about this beef filet?  "Everything is good here.  Everything." When the man is right, the man is right. Starting from the drinks to the appetizers to the main courses - not to mention the topnotch service  - - Evvia Estiatorio excels. Located in lively section of Palo Alto, Evvia offers valet parking for your convenience, and has a bar to accomodate a few patrons or lushes to get your drink on while you inevitably wait for seating. Our party of five had reservations for 9 pm, but we were seated much later than expected.  After Art S. made them aware of that fact  - they brought over 2 orders of appetizers "on the house" for inconveniencing us.  Wow.... sure, it was late, but we weren't THAT inconvenienced.  We were just getting our drink on at the bar....... it's not like WE knew what time it was either! For the main course, our table ordered several orders of lamb chops, pork loin, and fresh whole fish.  (You'll have to forgive my lack of short-term memory when it comes to names of dishes!)  I took food from Warren and Rosemarie C. just to say I tried everything so I could YELP it alllllll!!!!  It was all good stuff - perfectly seasoned and cooked.   Pork fell off the bone, it was so tender.... lamb was really topnotch in that there was no stench to lamb that can happen, flavor and texture was just amazing, and the fish was simply delicious, fresh and tasty!  If I had to pick, though - I'd say the lambchops were the best.  Warren C (aka Super Savior, hahaha), who had the pork, concurred.  Tender as the pork loin was - - the lamb was perfect. Their wine list was quite impressive.  None of us being wine connoisseurs - we handed over the menu to Archie R, who at least has a sister who owns a winery (and a sommelier by association beats no association, right?), to scan the list.  When he narrowed it down to two, I pointed, and a wine was finally picked.  That's called teamwork!  A red.  Called Something Arnold... or Richard... or something.  'Twas good. I am no expert on Mediterranean cooking but good food, I know, and this place rocks.  "Everything is good" means just that - - - everything IS GOOD!!! The bartenders and servers were truly outstanding in service, very polite, friendly, and accomodating.  A definite plus to any meal.  Cost was appropriate to the quality of food, and throw in the freebies they gave us on the house, it was perhaps downright economical.  I believe it was about $60 pp including a bar tab of 2 drinks pp?  (Someone will correct me if I am wrong....) Thanks, Art - for introducing a new cool restaurant to me, as well as providing good company with Archie and Rosemarie, and Warren. I still don't get, though, what this had to do with food in DANVILLE??!!?!!  :-) Archie - you ARE a chick magnet!!!  Them hostesses were droolin'!!  Hehehe....
Lamb is my least favorite meat.  Duck, rabbit, chicken, pork, turkey, beef, fish, lobster, ... they're all head and shoulders above lamb in my opinion.  But you come here for the lamb, so that's what I ordered.   And so I had the somewhat unique experience of thinking something was really fucking good and yet not really liking it at all. I love, on the other hand, seared sea bass, and that's what the girlfriend ordered.  Unfortunately, she complained, her sea bass was burnt. As you know, searing involves putting the fish in a pan at high heat, so one side of the fish is exposed to very hot metal and thus might burn.   This adds a little touch of crispiness on the outside that is actually quite appealing. So who are you going to believe?  The restaurant that gets rave reviews from everyone -- on Yelp and otherwise -- or some random Yelper complaining about how her fish is "burnt".   I know, that Yelper is probably just whining, right?  It's probably SUPPOSED to be that way.  I bet that sea bass is fucking bomb. I'm totally with you.  That's why I gave my girlfriend a tired look and asked her to give me a bite.  (Ok, I would have asked for a bite -- or several -- anyway.) My bad, Gloria.  You were right.  As you always are, I'm learning.
I haven't been here in years but even after all this time, this place is still the best Greek food in the Peninsula! I came with a work group and we all loved it. I did find it a little odd that they automatically, for the small appetizer choices like the Spanakotiropita and the crispy zucchini cakes, added enough extra pieces so everyone could get one versus just telling us, oh this one only comes with 4, would you like us to bring you 2 extra so everyone could have one? Some of the group could have been fine just eating half a piece so they wouldn't have been so full come main course time. For an early week night, this place was packed! NO sign of a recession in here. We started with spanakotiropita which were freshly fried and the crispy zucchini cakes which were also good. The grilled artichokes & eggplant skewer was ok. The fried calamari was good, the oil was clean and I liked the lemon. I had the striped whole fish which was really good. It was mostly de-boned in the kitchen but the first couple bites were full of bones so be careful. Someone else got the lamb chops which they said were excellent. All main courses looked really good and the portions were pretty big. For dessert, we had the molten lava chocolate cake, the baklava, and the rice pudding. The cake was good. I thought the baklava was excellent and I guess I'm not a fan of the rice pudding, maybe cause it's cold? The service was excellent though. Our waiter was so friendly and attentive. I can't wait to go back.
Got takeout here this weekend, and wow, I am impressed.  I was looking for something other than stereotypical Greek food, and saw that they had a tuna pita sandwich.  I ordered it, picturing tuna salad on a floppy pita, thinking that $18.50 was pretty damn pricey. Pickup was quick:  the manager ushered me over to the bar, and I saw a very nice-looking restaurant filled with happy patrons.  I got my food within a minute, which is always good. When I opened the white container, I was surprised to see a big tuna steak inside of what I can only describe as a stromboli.  It was huge, it was delicious, and it was totally worth it.  Possibly the best tuna sandwich I have ever had.  I gotta go back and sit down in this place next time!
Evvia is the best restaurant in the bay area in terms of Mediterranean food.  My Turkish husband always takes me here because it is the closest thing to what you get on the Aegean... fresh ingredients cooked in an authentic style and kept very simple, bringing out the flavor of the ingredients. I have come here so many times so I had thought that I'd tried all of its signature dishes... but!  On Saturday night we tried the "Psari Psito" i.e. grilled fish (Branzino/ Sea Bass).  Bliss!  The fish was grilled to perfection so that its moisture was retained, and it was drizzled with olive oil and lemon... it was so good that we ate one whole fish each. I also noticed that their secret dessert dish, "Yiaourti me Meli" (Greek yogurt with honey and nuts) has finally come out of hiding for everyone to enjoy.  Evvia is where I first discovered Greek yogurt and the ones they serve here simply taste better than the Fage yogurts you find at Whole Foods (I was obsessed with this at one point)...  Don't know where they get it (do they make it in-store???) but it is surely a delightful way to finish your dinner.
First course, salad. Had a match stick, that was previously lit, in the salad.  Noticed it when I was chewing and pulled it out of my mouth.... EEEEWWWW!!! Brought it to the attention of the waiter.  Apologized, didn't seemed shocked and that was it.  Didn't bring me a new salad. Still charged me for the salad..... Didn't get a free dessert.... I couldn't even get past the the match stick to like the food. If I could give it less than one star...I would!!
This is my first review, but I was so upset over the whole experience I thought that I would share it. DO NOT PLAN AN EVENT HERE! I do a lot of event planning for my job. I called up Evvia to book an event for a large party and the event planner was nothing short of RUDE!!! She, Ms. Smith, would not answer my questions, responded with questions back and an attitude. She basically told me to go look at the web page (which is of poor quality) and hung up on me!
I really cannot comment on the food. I am sure it is good as other people here have said. You see, me and my family never had a chance to get to the table. It was my mom's birthday and we booked a table for 5 a few days in advance. We called in a couple of hours before to confirm and were asked to come in on time. We did and were asked to wait 20 mins by a pretty rude maitre de. Now, 20 mins for a popular highly rated and chi chi palo alto restaurant would otherwise be fine. But the 20 mins soon passed and we were asked to wait another 45 mins by the rude maitre de. So, what exactly is the point of the reservation, again? The reason given was - Oh we had a rush of people, thanks to the Cal Stanford game. Reminded me of the Seinfeld episode where Jerry tells a car reservation agent after being told that he does not have a car inspite of a reservation - "You see, taking the reservation is not the difficult part, HOLDING it is. Anyone can take a reservation" Now, not that the seating/waiting area is that spacious to begin with and my relatively old parents were not exactly very comfortable. No attempt was made to accomodate them given the incompetence of the front staff. We just decided to walk to another restaurant and follow it up with this review. We did not let them ruin my mom's birthday.
The food here is amazing!  I came here for lunch for the first time and loved it!  It is definitely one of our favorites! The food is tasty we ordered a ton of food and liked everything!!! The staff is  great.
This restaurant was a COMPLETE disappointment.  As a greek, I really hope people don't think this is how stingy greeks are (or that greek food actually tastes like this!).  SO why is this place so crowded?  It leads me to believe that the Palo Alto restaurant frequenting crowd must only be about image, not content of the food. +1 Star--  Ambience (trendy modern greco-decor) +1 Star-- Service (friendly and courteous) -1 Star-- Food (very salty moussakka, undercooked salmon, very hard saganaki) -1 Star-- Portion Size (literally 1-2 bites for 10-15 bucks) -1 Star-- Price (OUTRAGEOUS!!!) You know it's sad when the 4$ gelato across the street was the highlight of the night.
I L-O-V-E, LOVE, this restaurant! I adore everything about Greek and Mediterranean cuisine, so I decided to come here for 20th birthday. And in spite of the restaurant's popularity, I was still able to get reservations for a party of six the day before. *Incredible service! - The valet:  very welcoming and was more than ready to provide us assistance once we arrived. - The hostess: seated us right away to our reserved table :) We even had a long spacious table all to ourselves smack dab in the middle of the restaurant. - The waiters/waitresses: the epitome of PERFECT service -- friendly, funny, helpful, prompt, and considerate :) The ambiance was unique, warm and luxurious. From where we were sitting, we could even see the chefs doing their thang in the kitchen. OK, onto the good stuff--FOOD!!! We ordered their incredible zucchini cakes for our appetizer, and it was exactly how most of the reviewers and our waiter advocated. I also loved how our waiter placed them on our plates one at a time and topped them off with a mini dollop of a white creamy concoction. Delish! I ordered the Psari Psito. The salmon was cooked perfectly -- not a sign of dryness! The mashed potatoes and the tomato sauce suited perfectly with the salmon. And the vegetables were generously seasoned with herbs... Gah! Soooo good! I didn't get to try my guests' dishes, but they all claimed to be satisfied and happy with their choices :o) Of course we couldn't leave without getting dessert. I ordered the Evvia Sundae (chocolate & vanilla ice cream with butterscotch & chocolate sauces & a dash of sweet cream) Apparently someone spilled the beans that it was my birthday, so they plopped two adorbale candles on top of my sundae, and all the waiters/waitresses gathered around our table and sang "Happy Birthday!" They really treat you like royalty here! It was a pleasurable experience overall. Yes, this restaurant is high-priced, but its fine dining, people... you come here to splurge! It's totally worth it, though :o)
The grilled lamb chops at Evvia are the best ones I have ever had - perfectly grilled crusty exterior and tender juicy meat with robust seasonings. The service was very friendly and attentive. A added bonus for sitting at the bar is the wine-tasting. I wanted a glass of red wine to go with my lamb chops. The nice bartender who is also a wine connoisseur gave us an extensive free tasting of 6 different wines until I decided on one. Their dessert menu has ample of tempting options. My pick is the Galaktoboureko, which is vanilla custard filled Phyllos with pistachio ice-cream.  Flaky light pastry with rich warm custard, sprinkled with pistachio bits, and served with cold creamy gourmet ice-cream - great combination of temperatures, textures and flavors. Portions are huge! (It is Greek after all.) Sharing recommended.
We had a special occasion celebration at Evvia for my wife's birthday on Saturday.   The restaurant was all I expected, excellent service, very friendly and flexible - accommodated my son as a last minute add. Food was great, my lamb fantastic, wife's fish also.  Very good wine recommendation - an Amerone. All in all a very good experience, we'll be back.
4.5 stars I LOVE Evvia! I had an early reservation at 6:00 on Friday night (early bird special hour) - when we sat down I noticed that the crowd was more on the mature side. I made the reservation the day before and that was the only time available, OK? Moving on. My girlfriend and I ordered (after drooling over the menu for a good 10 minutes) Appetizers: Garides tou Fourno - oven baked prawns with tomato & feta and Arnisia Kefthedes - grilled lamb meatballs with tomato green olive compote Friend: Solomos - grilled natural king salmon with lemon potato pure & tomato ouzo sauce Me: Kokinisto me Manestra - lamb shank braised in aromatic spices, on orzo & myzithra cheese The lamb meatballs came out first, they were juicy and delicious, not gamey at all.  Compote was subtle and enhanced the flavor of the lamb. Next came the oven baked prawns and feta...the cheese was still bubbling...oh yeah...shrimp was perfectly cooked....yum! My friend's salmon with lemon potato pure & tomato ouzo sauce was also TDF.  I'm not normally a fan of cooked salmon but this salmon was really tasty and the lemon potato puree and ouzo sauce was out of this world and complimented the salmon. Next came my braised lamb shank....it was tender, moist, meat literally fell off the bone and orzo was cooked al dente.   It was very, very good. The only minor complaint I had was that the lamb was a *wee* bit salty for me.  The lamb shank was huge and naturally I couldn't finish it so I took all the meat off the bone so my friend's dog could get a treat. The next time I come here I want to try the Tiganita Kalamarakia (crispy calamari with a lemon, parsley & anchovy aioli) and Octapodaki tou Yiorgou (traditional grilled octopus with lemon, oregano & olive oil).
Great food, great service. Came here for my birthday with my DH. Ordered the grilled calamari appetizer and it was really delicious. Kind of freaked out DH, and decided next time if we ordered calamari we would make sure it was breaded and fried. I know, I know... You must order a true greek salad when you come here. With huge chunks of feta and a light lemony dressing it is divine! I ordered the lamb chops and DH ordered the lamb shank. We went on a Monday and I really wanted the braised goat, but it was not ready. Bummer. Ended up eating half my meal and half DH's meal. I enjoyed the lamb shank more than my chops. Good chops are good chops everywhere (sorry for those of you that think Evvia's are somehow superior), but the tenderness of the shank is unmatched. We went to Santorini for our honeymoon so I was quite content to have a glass of their Santorini white wine with my meal. It was heavenly. Evvia delivered exactly what I wanted for my birthday (minus the goat)! Wish I had a reason to dine here more often...
3.5 stars. While Evvia serves up satisfactory dishes in a beautiful setting (with great service, no less) and manages to be one of the best restaurants in Palo Alto, it still falls short of true excellence and fails to impress me in terms of value (besides, "best" in Palo Alto means mediocre everywhere else). At an average of $22 a dish, I expect some serious attention to detail, but Evvia just doesn't take it to the next level. Appetizers: Dolmathes, little cylinders of rice wrapped in grape leaves, are served in a puddle of olive oil and are far too tangy. The grilled octopus is good, but forgettable (and a little burnt, no less). I'm not particularly impressed with either dish. Main courses: The moussaka is scrumptious. It is the perfect little Greek version of a gratin (though I'm not knowledgeable enough to tell you how authentic it is). The braised goat dish is much too salty. The goat meat itself, though, is flavorful, fork-tender and not at all gamey - in fact, I was expecting a real difference between the taste of goat and lamb meat, but in this case, my mouth would not have been able to discern one from the other. I didn't really find the orzo at the bottom of the dish necessary, and I also thought that the soup could be a bit thicker. Dessert: The Galaktoboureko is heavenly. The custard inside the phyllo dough shell is light and airy, yet rich and creamy, delicately sweet... in short, perfect :). The dish comes with pistachio ice cream, which I don't actually think enhances the overall flavors in any way. The baklava is far too sweet, overloaded with nuts, and entirely unimpressive. Save your money and get your fix somewhere else. Evvia may be good enough for a special occasion if you want to stay in Palo Alto, but it's far from superb. I may or may not return to try more dishes.
I'm not really sure if I can provide any unique or new insight into Evvia, so I'll keep this one short. Even on a Wednesday night in Palo Alto this place is bustling ... until close!  I don't know about you, but I dig this!  Not only does it have a fabulous little vibe, but the food is DELISH to the Y - U - M - M!  We ordered a selection of appetizers which were all fabulous.  We were a table of 6 and 4 of us ordered the 1/2 order lamb chops with a substitution of braised greens (instead of potatoes).  Oh my gawd these were fabulous!  Just the perfect size plate for us!! Okay, here is my unique tid bit: Be warned, when you ask for sugar on the side of your coffee, you're likely to hear "it's not done that way".  Huh?  Wait a minute, how is sugar done???
Mmmmmmmmmmmmmmmm Evvia.  I've been wanting to try this place for a while after hearing so many good things about it! You can make reservations via OpenTable, but since it was a weekday, we (me and Angie K) figured it would be ok.  When we got there it was PACKED.  Wow!  On a Wednesday night too!  But we only waited about 10 minutes (around 8:10pm) for a table.  Actually, while we were waiting, a man who I suppose is the manager greeted us and wished us a good meal.  Very nice. The atmosphere of this restaurant is super cute and cozy.  This is a great place for a romantic date.  The dinner plates are beautiful and quite quintessentially Greek.  The bread was very good - soft on the inside and hard and chewy on the outside.  The waiter pours you some olive oil and you can ask for balsamic vinegar for dipping the bread. For the real food, we shared the following: **Avgolemono - traditional egg-lemon soup with chicken & rice **Moussaka - baked casserole with eggplant, lamb ragout, potatoes & yogurt bechamel **Galaktoboureko - traditional phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream EVERYTHING WAS SO DELICIOUS!  The soup was refreshing and really tasty.  A little bit like risotto, actually.  Very good with the bread.  I don't even like lamb, but the Moussaka was sooooooooo good.  Really comforting.  The dessert was recommended to us by our wonderful waiter and OMG it was amazing!!  I don't even really like pistachio ice cream, but it was so light and fresh and went perfectly with the phyllo-wrapped custard. This is a short review, but I cannot wait to come back and get the lamb chops that everyone is raving about along with anything else on the menu.  Mmmm....
We experienced Evvia for the first time this weekend and had very high expectations given the amazing reviews listed here. I have never written a review before, but feel inclined to do so only because of the experience we had. The staff was amazing, the food delicious, and the overall experience was extraordinary. We will definitely return to Evvia.
Finally made it to Evvia with a friend and it was a fantastic experience. The lamb chops were fantastic and so were the zucchini cakes. We shared an order of the whole fish, which was prepared really well - almost perfectly. Definitely recommend the place.
Evvia is truly a gem and worth every penny. Huge portions, tasty Greek food (something for everyone) and a charming ambiance. I personally prefer Kokkari in SF better, but only because the space is much more grand and it's a tad fancier (the fireplace is divine in the winter). But read: same menu, same excellent service and same feeling when I leave: I want more Evvia/Kokkari tomorrow and the next day and the next day...
Excellent food. Great flavors. Went for the forever-recommended lamb chops and was not disappointed. Nice ambiance. Definitely on the pricey end. One almost-the-cheapest bottle of wine, 1 appetizer, 2 entrees, and 1 dessert was about $150 after tax and tip for 2 people. The wine list is way more expensive than it needs to be. Had a 7:30 reservation. Showed up at 7:20 and were seated immediately. Wait staff was good. However, the lead waiter could have been slightly more attentive. Also ordered a ravioli dish, and the portion was a tad smaller than I was expecting. If they refined those few things, it could be a true 5 star.
I'm not going to lie - I do not like Greek food one bit. So when my girlfriends invited me to dinner at Evvia, I was hesitant. But holy smokes - this is by far one of my favorite restaurants now. ATMOSPHERE: In the heart of downtown Palo Alto, it's in a great location. The ambiance is nice and dim, perfect for a (non-rowdy) group or a date. It has a lodge-like feel to it. SERVICE: Service was great. Given, there wasn't alot of people in the restaurant for some odd reason, but the woman that served us was very polite and helpful. She was genuinely Greek and was able to recommend certain plates to us. MENU: A very decent selection. It does not have a best entree choices for Vegetarians, but there are plenty of appetizers that are sans-meat. As a meat eater, I was very pleased with the selection. FOOD: Fan-friggin-tastico!  For appetizers, we got Melitzanokeftethes  and Octapodaki tou Yiorgou. I have never had either before but we polished both dishes off clean. For entree, I got Arnisia Paidakia (lamb chops). YOU MUST GET THE LAMB CHOPS. Even if you are Vegetarian. Just kidding. Ahem. I have never tasted meat like this before. It was the perfect tenderness paired with a succulent moist texture topped off with a savory and perfectly spiced taste. A friend tried the lamb shank and even though it was fine, it was no Arnisia Paidakia. VALUE: It's not particularly cheap but was such the experience and decadent meal that it was worth every penny. OVERALL: It's great! Even if you are not a fan of Greek food, you must go to Evvia. There are some traditional Greek appetizers if you want something more authentic. In either case, get the lamp chops. Great location, so go shopping or watch a movie before dinner. It may be a better day of your life. P.S. Get the lamp chops!
Hands down, the best restaurant in Palo Alto! You cannot go wrong with anything on the menu.  I can vouch for it all.  The lamb chops, the goat, the egg plant, the calamari, the sweet beats, the Greek salad, all the desserts, EVERYTHING is worth trying at least once, I guarantee; and it all washes down perfectly with their perfect house pinot noir. Also, I must say, I'm so happy to see that so many reviewers have tried the lamb chops, as it is their signature dish, and by far the best lamb chops I've ever had in my life!  No kidding! --Side note:  Some of my closest family members live on a sheep farm and raise the lambs for their meet (so sorry for you vegetarian/vegans out there); I had to tell these family members of the shockingly fabulous lamb chops I had at Evvia that pretty much trumped ANY lamb chops I'd ever had!  Of course they were shocked I would say something so offense to them... however... when they came here to visit, I immediate took them to Evvia to show them what I was talking about.  Needless to say, they instantly agreed.-- The staff is absolutely delightful.  The ambiance is perfect, not too loud, not too chill, perfect for gathering at the bar, a date, a party, an office meeting, virtually any occasion, or in my case... everyday of the week!  I could not rate this place more highly.
I hadn't been back here in a while, but went last night for the sole purpose of getting the Whole Striped Bass.  It was just as awesome as I'd remembered - the skin was crisp, the meat was moist and tender, and with the perfect amount of seasoning that is subtle but brings out the flavor of the fish.  The greens served on the side were delicious, and the lemon they provide to squeeze on top really brought all the flavors together. We started with a shared appetizer of Pita me Tiria, which I guess changes with the seasons because it's different on their website from what we had.  It had pieces of tomato with mozarella and greek basil with a sprinkling of olive oil - yum! We also shared an order of the lamb chops, which I will be having for lunch again today because we couldn't finish them after having the two other courses.  The chops are served with a couple "french fries" that are steak-cut.  I usually don't like this style, but the outside was perfectly crisp and seasoned while the inside stayed the right consistency. For drink, we had the Santorini white wine that was absolutely delicious.  Our server at our table was terrific, very knowledgable about the dishes, and entertaing as well.  The service at the bar while we waiting for our table (we arrived about 15 minutes early) was superb also. We skipped dessert as we stuffed ourselves on the wonderful food, but everything I saw at nearby tables (baklava, homemade ice cream sundae) looked amazing. I know there's a sister restaurant in the city (Kokkari), but to me it just isn't the same as this one.
This place is amazing. Definitely STILL one of my favorite places to eat in Palo Alto. The cuisine is always scrumptiously prepared with the best ingredients- definitely freshness you can taste. Naturally, the boy and I always over-order when we're here. And we try our very best-est to eat all of it. This time, there were leftovers (gasp*), which we reheated the next day for a quick bite. So delish. Just as good. Absolutely adore this place. Great staff that delivers fantastically doting service everytime. The owner seated us at the same table as our previous visit. Cute :o)
Evvia Estiatorio is every bit as delightful as its sister restaurant- the city's beloved Kokkari.... Read more 
Amazing as always. Decided to wander away from our usual: *Xifias Souvlaki, grilled swordfish skewer w/romesco sauce, AMAZINGLY juicy and the puree was a smokey delight. *Evvia Salata, a favorite, romaine & raddichio, creamy light dressing, perfect flavors. *Kokinisto me Manestra, lamb shank, orzo & myzithra cheese, falling off the bone good as usual *Katsiki Yiouvetsi, Napa Valley goat braised with artichokes, orzo & feta cheese, so fragrant, reminds me of Greek SOUL food. *Moussaka, beautiful succulent layers of ingredients. *Galaktoboureko, traditional phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream, OMG, I die!!! Amazing!!! Needless to say, I licked the plate CLEAN. *Baklava, traditional baklava drizzled with honey syrup served with vanilla ice cream, very good, but I thought it was TOO nutty. Pinot Noir by the glass is priced right at $10/glass. Healthy tip: Purely by coincidence we had leftovers and the moussaka to go, LOVED how all the oils and bechamel sauce congealed on the side, so I can limit the creaminess-Greek cuisine is just a tad rich for me. Again, another fantastic evening at Evvia, be sure to make reservations prior, there was a line forming on Sunday evening.
Excellent service with very knowledgeable information on the wine list and menu.  Modest dining room... Read more 
I got gypped! I went here for one of my friend's birthday with a group of 13 people. When I first walked in I felt claustrophobic, there was no space anywhere! They were packed. Right when you walk in you walk right into the reservation desk. The tables in this restaurant are literally touching the tables that are beside it. After looking at the menu with a whole bunch Greek words I couldn't understand I decided to go with the ravioli. The ravioli was $19 which was the cheapest thing on the menu, entree wise. The food took pretty long to get to us... but when we were finally served I was SHOCKED to see that I only had FOUR ravioli's on my plate! FOUR! I paid $19 for 4 ravioli's! They were basically $5 dollars each! I honestly wouldn't have minded paying that much if the ravioli's were good. But honestly they were the worst tasting ravioli's I've ever had. I also tasted the Rotisserie chicken and the Solomos (Salmon, mashed potatoes, vegetables). The chicken had a good flavor but was really salty. The salmon was good but nothing special and the mashed potatoes that came with it were horrible. Extremely salty and tasted like they just boiled them, mashed them, and then put a cup of salt in it. The service was good though, but this place is still not recommended.
I don't really know a lot about Greek/Mediterranean food, but what I do know is THIS PLACE WAS AMAZING.  Came here as a last minute decision for my anniversary with my boyfriend, and we were super lucky to get seated right away (this was extremely rare, so don't take this part of my review to heart).  Love the decor, hands down, and although it does get a tad noisy during the dinner crowd, I still enjoyed the romantic lighting. Our server was fantastic; just enough charm and charisma without seeming flirtatious.  He totally hooked me on the halibut special, but when he saw me hesitate at the mention of clams (I have a shellfish allergy), he offered to have them prepared separately on the side in case my boyfriend would like to try them, which he GLADLY accepted and told me they were delicious.  I'll just have to take his word for it, because I LOVED my halibut!  Crispy on the outside, perfectly done on the inside, light but flavorful sauce.  I scarfed the whole thing down and couldn't care less that I was missing out on the clams. If you're there for a special occasion, let your server know, and you'll get a wonderful dessert; we had the most heavenly baklava, although I didn't have the heart to tell our server that when I said "anniversary", I meant as boyfriend and girlfriend, not as a married couple.  Still, he was very sweet about it and it gave us a laugh. LADIES:  Be careful wearing heels here!  The wood flooring is a lot smoother than it looks!  I almost took a tumble myself, right next to a large table of other guests.  And in my little black dress, that would have been all sorts of bad news.
It's pretty near impossible to get reservations on a Friday and Saturday night here unless if you like to eat after 9, which we do not.    We came on a Sunday night just a little after they opened.    They were pretty empty, but as soon as we started dinner, the place was packed.    On with the food, we asked the server to choose our appetizers for us.   We got: Crispy Zucchini Cakes - with cucumber & mint yogurt - $8.75   (These were fantastic, crispy on the outside and creamy inside...will order again) Octopus - traditional grilled with lemon, oregano & olive oil - $11.75  (Yummm, I love octopus, these were perfectly cooked) Calamari - crispy calamari with lemon, parsley & anchovy aioli - $11.75  (These were cooked perfect, but pretty standard) Taramosalata, Melitzanosalata or Tzatziki - served with house made pita bread - $7.5 each  (We ordered all 3, a bit too much though, we could of skipped this) For dinner we got: Octopus Salad - wood grilled octopus with roasted red peppers, olives & frisee salad - $14.95  (Again, I love octopus and this was great) Psari Psito - whole fish with lemon-oregano vinaigrette & horta greens - AQ  (The special was the sea bass, it was a bit dry, needed more sauce) Moscharisia Brizola - grilled aged rib eye steak with olive oil lemon roasted potatoes - $36.75  (Cooked perfectly medium rare, had the right amount of seasoning, very good) Kotopoulo - lemon-oregano rotisserie chicken with charred sweet peppers & onions; Kalamata jus - $23.75   (Great tender chicken) For dessert we got: Galaktoboureko - traditional phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream - $8.25  (This was so delicious, especially the ice cream) Sokolatina - warm chocolate cake with vanilla ice cream & dark chocolate sauce - $8  (Can warm chocolate cake ever be bad??) The service was perfect, the atmosphere was lively, the only issue was the price ...esp for a glass of chardonnay $12!??!?!
I ate waaaay too much. The fried cheese was too salty, but certainly an authentic dish to try. The moussaka left something to be desired...again, mine is better ("again" bc I said this about Kokkari's moussaka too), but was piping hot and felt like my Greek grandmother was hugging me. The beef shishlik dish (forgot the name) was the winner. The meat was well-seaoned and tender and the orzo (I think it was orzo) was delicious. We were too full for dessert. So...we got dessert...the semolina-custard one warpped in phyllo dough. The semi-sweet Greek coffee was a wonderful finish with the dessert too. (I hoped they'd bring out those small iron pots with your coffee, but they didn't...). Oh! I tried to read my fortune....something about a mountain I think. I forgot the highlight... ...and then Dave Navarro walked in. Yep.
I have had many, many delicious lunches at Evvia; it is probably my favorite restaurant in Palo Alto.  I withhold the fifth star only because I have yet to experience dinner there. Evvia specializes in high-end Greek-Mediterranean food.   I'd advise starting out with the Greek Spreads -- the roast eggplant salad (one of the spreads) is amazing.  The Calamari is also tasty. The lamb dishes really stand out -- whether it's the lamb sandwich or the rib-cut lamb chops, the chefs at Evvia cook lamb PERFECTLY.  Probably some of the most tender, delicious lamb I've ever eaten. I'm also a big fan of the Ahi Pita.  I'm thinking it must have some sort of secret addictive chemical in it that makes me crave it fort-nightly. The desserts: all fantastic, particularly the Galaktoboureko (if you pronounce it right, it's free! I wish...), which is a phyllo wrapped semolina custard with pistachio ice cream... and you can never go wrong the Baklava. And the  Greek coffee -- similar to Turkish coffee, with grounds in the cup, heated over warm sand -- is a must.  I usually like my coffee black, but I make an exception for the "Metrio" (medium sweet) blend.
You go to Palo Alto and you think Sand Hill Rd., Stanford University & Neiman Marcus, not the most heartwarming of images. Step into Evvia, and you will be taken back by the most hospitable of service, outstanding Greek cuisine and the fantastic bartender. There are several standouts from their simple menu: Classic Greek Salad (once again, roughage makes a complete meal) Greek Spreads Flatbread Arnisia Plevrakia - grilled Anderson Ranch lamb riblets... omg delicious and im not a lamb lover! Mosharisia Brizola - grilled ribeye steak... thick, juicy & tender Make room for dessert even if you're bursting at the seams: Galaktoboureko - phyllo wrapped vanilla custard w/ pistachio ice cream The waiters here are swift, helpful & generous, always ready to accommodate your every whim. They deserve a good gratuity, you won't feel cheap! I repeat, save room for dessert!
I would recommend this for a date restaurant. It was a nice atmosphere with delicious food. We ordered Kolokithokeftethes - zucchini cakes Tiganita Kalamarakia  - Calamari Souvlaki  - beef filet and ended it with a chocolate lava cake....all of it was AMAZING!! The martini's are soooong tasty too. =) I plan on going again!
Did you know they have Napa Valley Goat on the menu? I was trying to get them to tell me what exactly makes a Goat a Napa Valley goat. Was it conceived in Napa Valley? Did it grow up in Napa Valley? And would it hang out with a Sonoma Valley goat? These are thing that really need to be explained before even attempting to order this dish off the menu. Besides my genealogical quest to find out the goats roots, I thought the venue was quite nice. The food, atmosphere, and presentation were really top notch. The price was a bit $$$$..its about $60 per person after appetizers and wine. Its a great place for a special occasion like birthday or anniversary. I think you can justify dropping that kind of money if that is the case.
Holy cow this place is amazing.  I walked in expecting a good meal, but what I got was an absolutely fantastic, darn near perfect meal. Chef Jim and our waiter John took wonderful care of us last Friday night.  Our reservation was at 5:30, but my friend was running a bit late so I settled in with the wine list to wait.  John (he told me that because there are a lot of Johns that work there everyone tends to call him Limbo) helped me to select a nice white wine that really helped to set the tone for what was to come (I cannot, for the life of me remember what it was, but it was good). By the time my friend arrived we were both ravenous, so we proceeded to make pigs of ourselves.  We started off with gigantes (white beans in a tomato herb sauce), the dish was delicious, well spiced, and nicely portioned.  The Chef also gave us a lovely artichoke and roasted red pepper dish that was divine. I was already beginning to get full, but the main course was yet to come. Part of the beauty of dining with close friends is ordering together and sharing, which, of course, is exactly what we did.  With a little bit (ok, a lot) of help from Jim and John we finally settled on Psari Psito (there were three different kinds of fish, we got petrale sole) and Kokinisto me Manestra (braised lamb).  Both dishes absolutely blew me away.  The sole was delicate and lovely, the lamb was fork tender and beautiful, the flavors of both were perfect. After so much food we simply did not have room for dessert, but with such stellar service and exceptional food can there really be any doubt that there will be another time?
The best Greek food I've had, ever! (disclaimer: I have not yet been to Greece) A group of us from work had dinner here last night and all agreed it was one of the best restaurants we'd been to in a long time. We ordered several appetizers, all so very good: Spanakotiropita (perfectly made), Dolmathes (also perfect), Flatbread (think Greek pizza from heaven) and Gigantes (I could have had this for a meal and been happy) Half our group had the lamb chops and the rest of us had the Moussaka, which we split between 2 people each (this was a great idea, btw). It was so good I wish I had leftovers to eat today. I might possibly have dreams about it tonight. We brought our own wine so I can't say anything about the wine selection. After bread & olive oil, appetizers and a meal we were painfully full and picked out our "fantasy desserts," what we would have eaten had we saved any room. I would have had the Bougatsa (warm ricotta cheese wrapped in phyllo with Granny Smith apples & dulce de leche ice cream). At that point pretending to have ordered it was just as good. I was wishing for someone to bring me a wheelchair and roll me to my car (and even better, drive me home). The ambiance was warm and cozy...a perfect date place. I was amazed at how packed the place was on a Monday night so I highly suggest making a reservation, no matter when you plan on going. I will certainly be back in the very near future...I am in love.
Visited this place while traveling for business. Not only the food unbelievably fresh and delicious, but it is a super cute place. It's spacious with an open kitchen and overall rustic feel.  The atmosphere is charming and warm - I could tell it was a popular spot, but it's not too annoying. I dined with a co-worker who is vegetarian and we ended up getting an assortment of vegetarian apps...utterly delicious! Among the winning veggie picks - Evvia Pita (at first I thought it was a pureed zucchini dip to be served with pita chips, but not at all - it looks like a flatbread).  Mezzesalata (eggplant dip) - fresh, no fillers, plenty of acid and the pita is special - hot, crisp and fluffy. (In addition to the fresh bread at the table!)  The absolute winner was the eggplant & artichoke grilled skewers.  It came with a thick delicious yogurt sauce that I wanted to smother on everything.  The eggplant and artichokes were perfectly cooked, charred and tender. I also  got the Evvia salad which was well chopped and perfectly dressed - light and refreshing, great portion. Can't wait to come back!
The ambiance is warm and welcoming. I love the copper pots hanging above the exposed kitchen. The large candles give the place a very intimate atmosphere. For appetizers we got the octopus and dolmas. Both were unbelievably delicious and light. I shared baby lamb with a friend and it was amazing! I am that rare person that likes gamey meat, that's why I love lamb. The baby lamb is not gamey, but has it's own distict flavor. It was very tender and the potatoes it came with were cooked perfectly. I will definitely be back!
I so loved the lamb chops at the Kokkari Estiatorio in SF that my husband wanted to surprise me with this similar restaurant in Palo Alto (on our way to a surprise CA coast vacation!) Ya, my husband rocks! Yay for me. This is kind of four stars regarding food alone. It's very good, but not very remarkable. The service is nothing less than perfect. Kokkari's lamb chops beat Evvia's hands down. I don't know what Kokkari does to that lamb but it's a lamb miracle. I don't think it's fair to expect miracles. Zoey had nothing but smiles at Evvia's. Lots of people, lots of noise, she was in princess baby heaven! Evvia's was packed when we went. I had a look on my face like "what's the deal with all of these people?" My husband mentioned that Stanford is nearby, which explained a lot. Lots of professor-types, intellectuals and moneyed folks. Yay for them. I'd recommend Evvia's for a date, a girls' night out, and the like. If you have enough to drink you won't notice that the food is not as great as Kokkari's. But whoever's doing the hiring here is definitely not an idiot. These are TRUE service professionals. Maybe they're just Stanford material... whatever, they're special. We had a great time. We definitely couldn't do this every day but I don't think I'd want to anyway. There's a lot of hot air in here, boys and girls! My husband pressed me to give Evvia's five stars, which I probably would have given them anyway. PS We were stupid not to get dessert here. The desserts look TDF.
Sweet jesus this is some of the best Greek food I have ever had. Kind of a yuppy crowd (in Palo Alto, who woulda thunk it?) but the food is so good it doesn't matter. Make a reservation unless you plan on going at off hours. We barely got in for lunch at 1:30 on a recent visit without a reservation. I don't think you can go wrong here. The greek spreads are amazing. The spanakotiropita is so tasty as too completely justify its syllablic excess. The lamb sandwich (and the amazing accoutrements it is served with- the best potatoes on earth and very tasty if a little overly salty mixed greens) is to kill for. Very nice wine list, and full bar with quite an assortment of ouzo. The yiaourti me meli is one of my favorite desserts on the planet. When I dream about this place I wake up in a pool of my own drool. It will put your favorite Greek restaurant to shame. One of your best bets in downtown Palo Alto by far. Pricy but worth it. Pretty reasonable for lunch.
I was going to take everyone's advise and go here with a group for my birthday until I checked the website. If you want to have a group of 12 or more you'll need to make a deposit of 50% and have a fixed price menu that starts at $55/person! This place may be great for a casual dinner but for a typical birthday bash where everyone is contributing it won't work at all. :(((( They' ve lost my business.
So it appears that this is the sister venue to Kokkari in the city- and it really lives up to the hype.  The atmosphere is very open and warm inside- bright and charming.  For the lunch time experience I was actually very impressed. After visiting the menu online, the octopus salad was calling my name- and it had to be done.  If you're an octopus fan, you'll love it...but be prepared for a taste of authenticity. It is tender and well- cooked, but there is a taste of the sea (which might taste a bit gamey to some). My lunch date had the ahi tuna pita- which was to die for. I've never had anything like it really: the sashimi grade tuna is wrapped in a dough pocket with a kind of pesto sauce and served with feta cheese, and a side of greens. It comes out piping hot but perfectly seared on the inside, and a crispy crust. They even had a fantastic heirloom tomato salad that was off the menu and summer fresh...the mozzarella was almost a creamed consistency...perfect for this sweltering heat. The service was very professional and tailored- a really high class establishment with top quality ingredients. But I hear the lamb is the reason to check this place out, so lunch is just whetting the appetite.
Evvia is one of my new favorites as far as Mediterranean restaurants go. Here's what we got for lunch: Swordfish Souvlaki (with garlic sauce) - 5 stars - Amazing! The fish totally melted in my mouth, and I couldn't get enough of the garlic sauce. Highly recommended. Octopus (grilled with lemon, oregano & olive oil) - 4.5 stars - This was also pretty good. I loved the flavors in the sauce. Dolmathes (grape leaves stuffed with rice, mint, dill, tomatoes, olive oil & lemon) - 3.5 stars - Not bad, but I've had better elsewhere. Mediterranean-style tomato salad (daily special) - 3.5 stars - I could have probably made something somewhat similar to this at home, so I'm not sure if I'd get it again. I did like the cheese / dressing - interesting mix of flavors. Overall, I think Evvia is definitely a step above other Mediterranean restaurants in the Peninsula. I'd come here again to try some of the other dishes on the menu. Tip: Be sure to make a reservation beforehand if you don't want to be stuck sitting at the bar or the communal table.  Also, it's a great spot for lunch if you aren't super hungry (or if you're prepared to spend a bit more than usual), as portions are small.
I must have had high expectations for this place, because while I loved the interior of the restaurant and the view of the kitchen, etc, the food really didn't deliver gourmet greatness.  A lot of the entrees were just... mediocre, and some were bad! :o( And this was a Saturday night people! Here's a quick summary if you don't want to read the below:  Food didn't live up to the hype, service was good, dessert was better. Appetizers: 1. Grapeleaves -- Pretty good 2. Fried cheese -- I LOVE cheese, so fried cheese sounded like heaven on earth, but it wasn't. 3. Calamari -- tasted OFF. Something was weird about it, like a weird smoky taste which actually may have been in the aioli .... I don't know, but it was disgusting. 4. Eggplant cakes -- unmemorable Entrees: 1. Souvlaki - BO-RING!! This was something I can do better at home.  Flavors were eh, meat was a tad tough, and overall it was just miserably boring. 2. "THE" Lamb -- I had this, and I'm not a HUGE lamb fan, but I had heard so much about it & not much else on the menu stood out.  It was okay-good -- cooked very well, even though it seemed a tad charred on the outside... the presentation was better than the meal. 3. Ravioli -- Hands down the BEST thing I tried! So surprised! It's an interesting combo of rapini & other greens and a cheese that's not feta.  I would definitely suggest this entree! 4. Someone ordered the chicken and said it was good... -- Overall, I wish I had just ordered the burger! Dessert [SAVING grace] 1. Phyllo wrapped something -- pretty good 2. Chocolate cake -- good, but the same old thing 3. Sundae -- an amazing sundae! I can't really explain it, but it was awesome! P.S. This place is loud.
Their fried oyster appetizer is delicious!  Fresh oysters for sure. Best entree to get is the rack of lamb (full rack is good to share for 2 people!). Chocolate molten cake for dessert is a heavenly closer. The waiter was very nice as well.
I tried the Galaktoboureko: custard in a pastry, with pistachio ice cream (See my photo).  It is good, but it does not live up to the hype, and it's not worth a trip. However, their Greek coffee is excellent, and worth a trip.  It's like Turkish coffee, but unlike Turkish coffee, it tastes really good.  It's also $5 for a very tiny amount.
Simply outstanding! The lamb chops called Arnisia Paidakia were phenomenal! I don't think I can eat lamb chops anywhere else BUT here (perhaps at Kokkari since that's their sister restaurant). My friend had the Moscharisia Brizola (grilled aged rib eye steak with olive oil lemon roasted potatoes) which was good, but it's no competition and nowhere near as spectacular as the chops. I am NOT a lamb-lover in the least, but theirs made me change my mind otherwise. We had the Tiganita Kalamarakia (crispy calamari with lemon, parsley & anchovy aioli) and I wish we were more daring to try something unfamiliar. Although good, I found it to be a pinch too salty. Will definitely explore other options next time. For dessert we shared the Bougatsa - warm ricotta cheese and granny smith apples wrapped in phyllo with a scoop of dulce de leche ice cream. O. M. G. !!! Hella good, my friends! Hella good! It was quite a bit smokey in there; so much so that I carried the smell with me all the way home (thus minus the one star. I couldn't wait to shower it off). The staff was fantastic and super friendly.  As we were leaving, the manager said to come back again soon. Ohhh believe me, I am making a comeback! And SOON! The entire dining experience was excellent from start to end. Definitely a fan (and maybe a regular) =.)
Greek food is not one of my first choices - but this place had really good food and a nice atmosphere.  It also was pretty busy for a Monday night.  All the appetizers were tasty.  The lamb chops were awesome.  The whole grilled fish was to die for - very simply prepared with some herbs and lemon stuffed inside.  Six people in our party and every entree was prepared excellently.  Good wine list too.  This place is definitely worth a visit.
Overlooking busy, busy Emerson Street. Evviia looks like a rustic Mediterranean country inn, with fresh flowers and exposed heavy wooden beams running across the ceiling. Evvia is perfect for a date, but in cooler weather, if you want a seat by the fireplace, make your reservation at least two weeks in advance. Old-World Greek traditions as well as modern takes on seafood and other dishes abount at Evvia.  We had the grape leaves stuffed with beef and rice and flavored with mint and egg-lemon sauce along with a dish of their calamari.  Our main course dish, moussaka (baked casserole with eggplant, potatoes and lamb ragout) was flavorful and cooked to perfection.  Ditto the ravioli, stuffed with a rich zucchini-feta blend. Try the souvlaki (mesquite-grilled beef, mushrooms and onions served over wild pilaf rice), too and let your waiter/waitress recommend a good wine. On this particular night, we bought our own great bottle because we were celebrating something special with good friends. Did you know you can bring your own bottle of wine with you to dinner?  Yup.  It's true. Evvia is a little something different - - and I mean that in a good way.
Yum! I can't think of a comparable place in the area. This is a step above the other good restaurants we've been to in the Palo Alto area. Not quite Gary Danko or Kaygetsu, my foodie holy grails, but also not as outrageously pricey. A great place to go for business (i.e. someone else is paying!) or celebrations. I came with a group from work and loved it so much that I took DH here later for a hot date. We know first hand that it's hard to walk in and get a table, but I was able to score a table for two at 6 pm Saturday a day ahead of time. I won't attempt to name everything we ate by what it was called on the menu (it's greek to me, hehe) but we started with pita wedges and a sample of the three dips - the eggplant was similar to baba ghanoush but a little lighter, tsatsiki cucumber-yogurt dip, and a cod roe dip that looks like hummus. That last one sounds gross to me, but it was creamy, light and really delicious. We also had a greek salad which had amazing feta cheese. Our server recommended a white wine from the island of Santorini and we savored every tasty sip of that bottle. We both chose the grilled whole fish, since we're pescatarians, but I hear the lamb shank is great. DH had the sea bass and I had the petrale sole. Both came with spinach on the side and plenty of lemon to squeeze over the fish. I'm not a huge fan of whole fish because the head creeps me out, but at least they removed the spine and made it very easy to eat. Both our fishes were amazing. And then...the dessert. I'm running out of superlatives. We had the yogurt with dried fruit, honey and walnuts. Sounds kind of healthy, eh? If you haven't tried Greek yogurt, this is a must have. It's so different from the typical American kind  - thick, creamy, delicious goodness. We also had the Galaktoboureko, a phyllo wrapped custard with pistacio ice cream - yum again! I had a greek coffee, which was like an espresso except that the fine grounds settle at the bottom of the cup like sludge - watch that last sip! DH had a frappe iced coffee. The ambience at Evvia is great - an intimate setting, very warm - and the open kitchen is a great touch. I loved the stacks of bread (which was also very good, btw) on the counter. Our server, Gina, was very friendly and helpful with recommendations and seemed passionate about the food, like she was raised in a Greek family eating these wonderful dishes. A great place to go when you want something really special.
Had dinner here recently for a friend's birthday and was very pleased w/our experience.  I was surprised w/the turnout on a Monday evening - there were no empty tables - so I took that as a good sign. We had a few appetizers and they were pretty good but nothing worth remembering.  I ordered the Beef Souvlaki and my boyfriend ordered the Lamb Chops (also recommended by our waiter).  Both dishes were superb.  The beef was cooked to my liking and the veggies were not overpowering.  I tried my BF's lamb chops and it was even better than I imagined. A MUST TRY! We ordered several drinks plus bottles of wine and champagne.  The bill came out to about $65/person (split evenly) and definitely worth it. -1 star because they sat us near the kitchen and it got way too hot.  We had a party of 10 and it was obvious the restaurant was at capacity and they squeezed us into the tightest location. Suggestion: Make a reservation or you're in for a long wait.
Love Love Love Evvia!! Did I mention I LOVE Evvia? Now that I live the life of a Suburban Housewife, I don't get to Evvia very often (which is very sad-the not going to Evvia part, not the suburban housewife part) but back in the day when I was a Corporate "Working Girl" I went to and planned many a business dinners at Evvia. My husband and I went so often they knew us by name. We had "our" waitress. The owner would often comp us a bottle of wine. We shut the place down once with a large recruiting dinner. I have NEVER been disappointed. The food is amazing!  The lamb is the best I have ever had. The service is superb. The atmosphere is inviting and warm with a rustic trendy touch. Not a bad thing to be said about it. Many wonderful meals and memories made with friends here. LOVE for Evvia!
I am in love with the atmosphere here. It's gorgeous, I love everything from the giant vases filled with colorful flowers to the copper pots hung above the kitchen/prep area. I came for lunch with my coworkers but I think this would also be a great place for a date. Atmosphere gets an A+ in my book. The service was excellent too. My water glass was always filled and they were quick about replacing plates/silverware and taking away empty plates. I like when I don't need to ask for a refill on my Shirley Temple too :). The food was yummy too! We had the prawn, zucchini, and their flat bread appetizers. I picked the fish of the day (sole) for my main course - whcih was HUGE I might add, but I secretly wished I had ordered the lambchops like my coworker. He said it was delicious and I was a bit envious ;). The fish was good, but it didn't blow me away. They should really add more seafood options to their main courses. We ordered a bunch of their desserts - the baklava, sokolatina (the warm chocolate cake with ice cream), hot fugde sundae served in a cool glass, and something else with a custard filling... everything was rich and delicious! All in all, this is an OK place to eat, especially if someone else is paying for it :). I don't think I would drop +$20/entree myself though. If prices were cheaper and if my fish had blown me away, I would've given 4 stars probably.
They must change the menu up as there was no pork on the menu this past Sunday - lots of lamb, fish, beef, and goat yes. We started with the Gigantes Mezze - large lima beans in a fab pesto tomato sauce with feta on top. It was very good with the fresh french bread.  then we shared a Marouli Salata, which turkish swears is "Turkish"... it was also very good and very fresh! For the main course we all had to share cause everything looked so good - Moussaka, Salmon and Souvlaki. The Moussaka has an awesome yogurt bechamel on top! The Souvlaki was amazing, tender and cooked perfectly. The Salmon was very tasty too! The service was very friendly and she made some nice suggestions especially on the wine - the wine list was a little overwhelming at nearly 4 pages. She even charmed Turkish with her explanation of the particular Olive Oil they use. The Baklava was with walnuts and served with a lovely custard vanilla ice cream, nice surprise and well liked!
I rarely go to Palo Alto to visit my BF - he usually comes to SF to visit me :P hehe.  But when I do go, I sometimes get surprised with reservations to my ALL TIME FAVORITE restaurant in the south bay: Evvia!! This place is just as good as its sister restaurant, Kokkari - it even has the same look and feel too - just a little smaller venue.  The food here is equal to that of Kokkari = AMAZING. The pita bread isn't the kind of pita bread you get from the super market - it's fluffy and warm. Yum! Appetizer plate - yes please! Dolmas, hummus, cheese, veggies, etc...ahh I'm getting hungry just writing this review. Saghanaki, aka fried cheese w/ oregano and lemon juice?! I never thought I would eat this, but the crispy outside and gooey inside make this one of my favorite FAVORITE starters of all time. I usually order the lamb for dinner.  It's so tender and perfectly cooked - moist meat, a little charred, and super tender.  They serve it with some greek style fried potato wedges that have a hint taste of lemon and herbs - mmmmm. Please save room for dessert, especially for the Galaktoboureko (try saying that five times fast!)  -it's a traditional phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard with pistachio ice cream.  This is the perfect dessert. I swear.  Crispy, creamy, not too sweet and served with ice cream...it's the perfect way to end a meal. I recommend making reservations because this place is always packed.
Evvia Grilled Lamb Chops with 1990 Domaine Tempier Cuvee La Tourtine!  Gastronomic match made in heaven...or in this case, Palo Alto. Get the Greek trio dips and grilled lamb meatballs for appetizers.  And don't forget the phylo cigar dessert.  Avoid the 1993 Chateau d'Yquem by the glass.  It was oxidized and had sugar crystals at the bottom of the glass.  At $20 a glass, it wasn't too bad...but bad wine is still bad wine. Love the wait staff, especially the waiter who buffed up my bruise ego.  Yes, the Desperate Housewives look is eye-catching, but also serves as good fodder for the wait staff's backroom quips.  Meoow!
--- Fell Short For Us. --- 4.5 stars on average with 300+ reviews?  Holy Acropolis. we were enthusiastic about trying this place out.  But perhaps we were there on a Sunday night*, it fell far short of what we expected, and I'm not sure that we're a "high expectation" kind of couple. First the good parts. + Atmosphere is phenomenal.  Warm, cozy, without being snooty.  The open grill is a great touch and we ended up being right there next to it. + Had no problem with bringing a baby along, and I noticed several other diners with babies. + Prawns with tomato and feta were to die for.  I don't know where they're getting their tomatoes but would love to buy those babies by the crate they were so flavorful.  Add that wonderful spice on each of the prawns and we sopped up every little last bit of that dish with bread. And then on to why we figured we MUST be there on an off-night... - Waiter seemed to want to be somewhere else.  When he spoke with us, his eyes were always darting around elsewhere.  He neglected to mention any specials even when my wife asked if there was anything else we should know.  When we finally pointedly asked him if there were any specials, he "remembered" them. - Water, iced tea, bread, olive oil, etc. were consistently empty or unattended.  On a Sunday night after 8 pm, it doesn't seem like it would be too busy for this.  And at a place like Evvia, I would think that typically, they'd be more attentive. - The food was ok, but not mind-blowing.  It's the first time, I've loved all the non-meat accoutrements and eaten around the meat of entrees.  We order the Souvlaki and the Salmon.  The Souvlaki beef was mostly flavorless -- we had expected more marinade or flavoring.  The rice pilaf that came with it was another story -- lemon, orzo, barley, brown rice, raisins, butter, carrots, onions, astoundingly delicious.  The Salmon as well -- tender but mostly flavorless again.  It was the tomato sauce again to the rescue, accompanied by some fantastic green beans. I'd like to say we'll try it again some day but with so many restaurants, it's hard to justify a repeat visit. * Tony L (tonyleachsf) informs me that generally Sun and Mon's are off-days for restaurants -- when the real cooks take off.  Tue is a good day to attend because they're more likely to be experimental that day.
I have no Idea why I did not yet reviewed Evvia. Although this is one of those places which cause a real pain when it's time to take out the wallet, It is our favorite restaurant  and we  visit here often.  We like everything about it: the setting that creates a casual-elegant, and always cheerful atmosphere, the ambiance, and the superb service. Ahem...almost forget - and the food. It has everything for everyone, casual, business, romantic dinner, or a group evening. It provides the perfect setting. (for romantic evening don't forget to reserve a table by the fireplace). While fans of almost everything in the menu, I'll mostly recommend the  Stripped bass (yes, let them do the work for you and take out the bones), the lamb chops, and shank, also the octopus salad, and as appetizer the Greek spreads. I have one exception, I really really really DISLIKE - stay away from the  Moussaka.
The food was tasty, the service was amazing.
Evvia is my "go-to" restaurant for a fine dining experience.  It's truly one of my favorites on the Peninsula. This Mediterranean restaurant is fine dining at its finest, with service, wine list, delectable entrees, and ambience all in its favor.  Also known for a great wine list too, Evvia delivers an overall dining experience that should be reserved for special occasions. Evvia brings in its beef from special suppliers in the Midwest.  Reservations are an absolute must.  It is hard to say what is most memorable about the Evvia experience.  The quality and creativity of the entrees, the impeccable service, and the general ambience all contribute to a wonderful dining occasion.  It's fair to say I am quite the fan.  My only misstep in ordering at Evvia once was their moussaka...which wasn't bad, but perhaps not something that showcases their true culinary talents.  I have taken my out-of-town guests here and they all agree this place is out-of-this-world. In my opinion, this restaurant adds a Star to Downtown Palo Alto itself! Yes, some will say this restaurant is expensive.  And, it is.  Hey, this is fine dining guys, not in-and-out burger! One of my Palo Alto favorites of all time, this is clearly a special place.  Reservations are a must, and requires some advance notice from my experience. Update (March 2007):  I went for another outstanding and memorable dinner.  Service remains top-notch, and the appetizers and my entree (their well-known lamb chops) was spectacular.  The lamb sets the bar for that dish. I reaffirm:  5 stars...
I was here on someone else's dime. One of the post-docs in my lab had a paper accepted, so we came here to celebrate. I arrived late because of an experiment I was still running, so I missed most of the appetizers, unfortunately. The lamb chop was amazing. It was just the right amount without being too much. The potatoes tasted a lot like papayas for some reason, but it was a welcome change in taste. Delicious, well flavored, this entree was top notch. I finished it off with a Galaktoboureko, a vanilla custard wrapped in phyllo with some pistachio ice cream. It had me wishing I wasn't at a work function so I could have ordered a second. I am definitely a dessert person, and it was definitely THAT good. I patiently await the next time.
The best souvlaki I've had in the Bay Area hands-down.
Based on my one visit: this place has some great dishes and some not so great dishes, and for the price I expect more consistency. I will probably try this place one more time and if I find more dishes I like i'll consider bumping it up to 4 stars. My favorite dish by far was the Kolokithokeftethes appetizer - zucchini cakes with a garlic potato dip. Even the boyfriend, who hates zucchini, thought these were delicious. I also enjoyed the Salata Epohis - very fresh ingredients and good dressing. One of the things that convinced me to try this place is all the rave reviews about the lamb (side note: lamb is so underrated!) but I wasn't that impressed with the lamb shank (Kokinisto me Manestra). The meat was not particularly tender, it was too fatty, and the orzo it came with was ridiculously salty. Their Saghanaki was pretty good but not heated long enough - the cheese should have been meltier. The Evvia Pita appetizer sounded good on the menu but wasn't at all what I was expecting. It was like a pizza where somehow the dough wasn't cooked enough but the toppings were overcooked, and to make matters worse the dough was really sweet, which didn't seem right at all. I would recommend the Galaktoboureko dessert (not just because the name is fun to say) - custard filled phyllo dough with pistachio ice cream. I also tried a bite of the Bougatsa (phyllo with ricotta and apples), which was kind of similar but not as good.
Evvia is one of the better restaurants in PA.  It has survived longer than Spago's (did they go outta biz or what?), maintaining a full house every night of the week.  Despite several more trendy alternatives in the area, my preference is almost always Evvia.  The food is excellent...always! If it's your first time and you're a party of 2, I recommend ordering several of the tasty (yet petitely portioned) apps and sharing the lamb chops.  Your second time at Evvia, be sure to try the fish of the day, served whole, and de-boned at the table.  It is simply grilled to perfection w/garlic and lots o' lemon. The ambiance tends to be a few large groups, many couples, and a few tables of friends.  Don't expect a rowdy or stuffy place, kinda in between.  If you plan on going out afterward, I'd recommend picking a more lively spot (like Mantra, Junoon, Three Seasons, etc.). I've ordered take out from here once.  They missed an entire entree, but graciously offered me a glass of wine while I waited.  They did charge for the slip-up, which I thought should have been comped given the fact that I had to wait, spent $200 on the food, and my brother works at Yelp (hello!). All in all Evvia is the perfect spot for a date night, family dinner, or celebrations of any sort (kids and babies are welcome too). Check out their sister restaurant, Kokkari, in the city (expect a 10-minute wait w/your reservation, but it's a great excuse to hang at the swanky bar).
I recommend making reservations for right at opening...5:45! If not the wait may be long. We had the mushrooms for appetizer and lamb shank for dinner... Deeeeelicious, great service, sexy atmosphere and I topped it off with and Irish coffee instead of desert and it was one of the best I've had.
Believe the hype.  The lamb chops are the best I've had without question.  A nice plus is that they offer a half order for $17 instead of the $32 for the full order.  A half order is only 2 lamb chops, but they are so rich and good that it feels like a lot more. That also leaves room for the dessert which is a bit expensive but again is worth it.  The yogurt sorbet with strawberry granita and fresh berries was extremely good.  The granita was especially good.
There's ONE booth in the entire restaurant. I never knew the phrase, "who do I have to sleep with to get a _______" but now I do. On Friday, the buzz of the lunch crowd was no match to the NCAA imaginations that were going on in my head.  I know mash-ups are oh-so popular for the tech community. How about an Evvia / Old Pro combinator.  We could call it V-Combinator
I've been dying to go here ever since I went to its sister restaurant Kokkari. Our co-workers from NY were visiting so what better excuse than to show them one of Palo Alto's finest. We had a party of 20, which meant we had to do a pre-ordered prix fixe menu. To satisfy the carnivores, pescetarians, and vegetarians, I ordered: Course 1 - Spanakopita, Pita, and Calamari Course 2 - Lamb Chops, Salmon, and Ravioli with veggies and roasted potatoes on the side Course 3 - Warm chocolate cake Since we had such a wide selection and wanted to try everything, it looked more like a chinese buffet on my plate than a $$$ restaurant. With the prix fixe nature, we were only served one of each thing. The food was excellent and it was nice to try a bit of everything but the overall eating experience would have been nicer with a smaller party. Favorite dishes were the spanakopita, pita, lamb chops, and chocolate cake. Definite props to the service. We probably had anywhere from 3-5 waiters attending to us at a time and our wine glasses never went empty.
Delicious. Okay, I could have ended my post there, but I've more yelp-manners than that. I went into Evvia with two expectations 1) the food was gonna be good 2) it was going to be pricey. Both were true. Our party of 4 ordered 1 appetizer, 1 dish each, & 1 dessert. Price per person? $55 including tax & tip, no wine. I'm not a fan of lamb, but my two friends who ordered lamb dishes said the meat was tender and extremely flavorful. If it tasted half as good as my souvlaki, I wouldn't have been surprised by their raving. My beef cubes were still oozing juice when brought to me, and I could literally pull the meat apart with my fork and knife. The cretan rice was a little undercooked, but I wasn't going to complain -- I was too preoccupied with my roasted sweet onions  and sour cream sauce to lift my eyes off the plate, let alone hail a waiter. I sampled the chicken, which had crispy skin, and moist, moist meat with a strong lemon flavor. The baklava was served with vanilla ice cream, wasn't too sweet, but not memorable enough to order again. Overall, wonderful atmosphere. You can see your house bread cut for you, the chickens on the rotisserie, and bottles of wine in a room. Classy, but casual enough to walk in with a dress shirt and slacks (for a guy), or heels and a nice top (for a girl). Highly recommended to impress a date or celebrate a special occasion. Five stars, I'm a fan.
I've always been tempted to skip the entrees, which are fine but not exceptional, and just order appetizers + dessert.  Things that are fantastic: Prawns baked with feta & tomato Spanakotiropita (phyllo with spinach + feta) Dolmathes (grape leaves stuffed with pine nuts, rice, and herbs) Galakotoboureko (phyllo with vanilla custard + pistachio ice cream) Yiaourti me Meli (greek yogurt with fruits and honey) Second-best restaurant in Palo Alto after Tamarine for dinner.  Better than Tamarine for lunch.
After perusing the menu, we decided to feast on a variety of appetizers.   (The entrees didn't look nearly as interesting.)  We tried: - Prawns with tomato and feta:  not worth it, only 4 medium-sized prawns for $10.75 and the taste/quality was not good/interesting enough to justify that price. - Smelts: the best appetizer we tried, lightly fried and crisp, the potato and garlic skordalia (a thick puree) was such a great complement to the dish.  Generous portion for $9. - Zucchini cakes: these were standard zucchini cakes, nothing special. - Sweet peas and feta: very yummy, I've never had fresh peas before and they were absolutely delicious.  The peas were firm and crisp, and the feta paired very well with them. - Arugula salad with stone fruit: very good, but honestly, it's hard to go wrong with arugula.  Salad also contained nectarines, cherries, feta, salt, and pepper.  Nectarines paired best with the arugula. Note that this is the type of restaurant where there are many regulars, so there's a lot of interaction between the staff and the frequent guests.  Beware, if you're not a fan of that kind of thing (because it might bode a lot of preferential treatment a la Spiedo in San Mateo).  Also, if you do sit at the bar, don't pick the two seats at the end.  There's absolutely no room to put your legs and you'll spend an hour eating in awkward, contorted positions.
I came here with my coworkers during lunch for a birthday.  Be sure to come early or call in for reservations because the place gets packed.  If that's the case, you know what that means..good stuff! We were a huge party, so they had bread for us immediately.  For starters, we had this mixed appetizers.  The hummus dip was very good.  I didn't get a chance to try everything because there was a lot of people and I didn't want to be greedy and take everything. For my main dish, I had the sea bass.  I didn't realize it wasn't going to be a filet but rather the whole fish.  It was pretty good but lots of bones.  The mixed veggies were pretty good. Good seasoning and herbs.  My coworker had the lamb and that looked very good.  Food was pretty good..I think  I need to come back again and try the other stuff.  Everyone seemed pretty happy though.
Pricey, but delicious.  Some places are just worth the splurge!  I had dinner here with some girl friends and we all split the fried calamari, which had a nice salty batter, along with the entrees: roasted lamb shanks and salmon with tomato & mashed potatoes. The salmon dish was fair and slightly tangy, but not nearly as fabulous as the lamb!  This is probably my second or third time trying lamb (I didn't have a good first experience).  The juicy shanks were absolutely succulent and heavenly in my mouth - perfectly cooked with the right blend of oregano herbs and some citrus marinade.  Delicious! I paired the meal with a Riesling from Washington, a nice crisp fruity and tart finish.  And we finished it all with two delectable sweet treats: the warm chocolate lava cake & nutty baklava drizzled with honey, with scoops of vanilla bean gelato.  I didn't want to stop eating!  The meal set us back about $40 bucks each; definitely worth the price for this place that fulfills both high-end and high-quality.  I'd recommend making reservations, especially during the weekend and evenings.  Yet another fine dining establishment that increases my love for Mediterranean cuisine!
I am not of a red meat eater. The last time I had lamb it was chewey and disgusting. Oh my goodness, Evvia has turned me into a full out carnivore. The lamb alone turned my frown upside down. Now I heard from you guys that the Lamb Chops rule and my friend wanted the Lamb Shank. So we had to compare. While both are fantasticly delicious. My Lamb Chops won. So flavorful and it was cooked medium rare. The last chop was straight rare, but I didn't care. It was still good. Even the potatoes were cooked to perfection and they were just a compliment to the chops. I loved how the lemon was served up in the cheese cloth. Such a great idea to keep the pits from falling in your food. This is the only meal that has made me straight giggle from the taste of their food. This place is really cute. It has a great vibe. I loved the colored bottles on the back wall and the open kitchen just made the place smell soo good. This place seems to be the place for business people and ladies who lunch (or "dine" what have you). I was a little worried that we wouldn't get the service that they were getting but noooo. They treat everyone the same! Even us, who didn't order a bottle of their finest wine! Plus our server was a Greek God! Oh man, what a looker. =) This place is great for birthdays or special dates. I will definitely return and try the dessert next time.
I like high end Greek - for one thing most of the wine varietals are all different, so its a learning experience every time, although CABERNET is much easier to pronounce than most Greek varietals... Overall the experience was really good....I will say the atmosphere is more business like, then sexy/romantic. It could be made a bit warmer, darker, sultry and be more appealing as a date place. For the kinda money you are going to spend, you may want a good night kiss :p (for the record Jaime, they do have a small bar.) I made reservations last minute on Open Table (yay, small dance) and were seated promptly, fair amount of tables looked open at 845. Our server was very suave, and attentive. We kept yabbering instead of deciding what we wanted, and he was very patient and returned 3x....if he rolled his eyes, he was nice enough to do so when his back was turned. :0 Not even pretending to know Greek wine varietals I gave him a little guidance on what I liked, and my dinner companions 'budding' wine palette and asked for recommendation. I was hoping for a bit more wine geek talk but he didn't take the bait - however his selection was quite good. My dinner mate wanted something green to share to start  so we shared some kinda salad..I think they said it was Greek salad, but it was pre tossed, and I wasn't impressed and picked at it. Sides, my fave part of Greek salads are the peppers, and there weren't any, dammit. I give my dinner companion points for adventure dining - we both eyed the goat entree and to my surprise she wanted it. I was eyeing it too as I have had goat (made a goat curry myself earlier in Mexico this year.....oh ya digressing...) and if you like lamb, and stronger meats, goat can be tasty. She also kinda wanted fish, so I let her have Bambi (ok, sorry no Disney goat equivalent) and ordered whole fish, which I had glanced several good reviews on. Her dish was very good...I am a curry fan and make them myself...it was a tad strong on cinnamon, but a flavorful, hearty dish we both enjoyed. My fish...was pretty meh. It was the bream  the special fish of the night, and the texture really wasn't what was described. Easy come easy go - I shoulda went for double meat and gone lamb, but it felt like an outa the box night...sometimes ya win big sometimes ya don't. Dinner satiated gal said she wasn't  sure she wanted dessert, but would nibble on something....she almost licked her eyebrows at the chocolate dessert, so sensing weakness I ordered it. They had a molten chocolate desert thingy with the best vanilla bean ice cream I had ever tasted....unless it was served on Kate Beckinsale, I don't think it could have tasted any better. The chocolate part was molten gooey sensuous yummy too...and my table mate suddenly went into attack mode, and a 'bite'  went to 'watch that hand or withdraw a stump' as she devoured it. The effect that two glasses of good, red wine and molten chocolate have on a 120# female is simply wondrous to behold as it unfolds.....almost as good as Italian soap operas.....just less sex. We lingered until we were 2nd last, and finally last...a trend I continually find isn't hard in Peninsula or South Bay, sigh. its a  really awesome experience overall, and could, maybe should be 5 stars...but I can't give EVERYONE 5....get some dark red curtains, some candles, sultry music, put your hostess in a hot black scooped dress - then it gets my 5 star experience.....if fine dining isn't partially about romance and amore...its just not quite as magical, for me and my amex at least :) post note: holy cow this ended up long, sorry. don't drink 2 glasses of wine on a empty stomach and write reviews! feel free to send hate mail  :p
Just okay for me. I had the rotisserie chicken. It had a nice flavor but was WAY too salty. My side veggies were also extremely salty. I tried some of my BF's dish, the Lamb Shank, and it was pretty good. A few of my friends ordered the ravioli dish and they were very disappointed with the quantity and taste. Service and ambiance was excellent, however.
Even though I'm not a huge fan of Mediterranean flavors, I thoroughly enjoyed my meal at Evvia, especially their lamb chops, which were the best I've ever had. The bread at Evvia is very good.  We ordered the grape leaves, lamb meatballs, and egg-lemon soup for appetizers.  I personally don't like grape leaves, but my dining partner loves them and said they were the best he's had.  The lamb meatballs were very good and had a flavorful tomato sauce.  The egg-lemon soup was a bit too lemony for me but otherwise was very good. Our server recommended the Arnisia Paidakia, or the lamb chop, which is one Evvia's specialty.  The lamb chop was incredibly juicy and had great flavor; the lamb wasn't messed around with, so it tasted purely of great lamb.  My mouth is watering just thinking about it.... My friend ordered the braised goat dish, which was also very good but felt less special than the lamb dish.  For dessert, we had the Galaktoboureko, which is a custard wrapped in phyllo dough.  The dessert also came with pistachio ice cream.  It was a very nice mix of hot and cold and had just the right amount of sweetness. One of the few worthwhile restaurants in downtown Palo Alto, Evvia is the place to go for a great meal.  Just remember to order the lamb chop!
I had the octopus appetizer, the tatziki, and the lamb chops....loved them all. The Bartender John was great, mixed a great drink and suggested a delicious Greek white wine.
One word: Galaktoboureko!! Paidakia and Souvlaki are noteworthy, as is the Galaktoboureko dessert (better than any I've had in Greece!). Rothakina also excellent. Pricey (but worth it). Warm atmosphere. Lots of Stanford med eat here.
Qualite man, qwah- lih- TE.  The decor in the restaurant is homey and classy with a large, lovely hearth in the middle of the dining area.  I ordered the salmon and was impressed with its crisp exterior and flaky, moist interior.  Loved it! For dessert I orderd the rizogalo--rice pudding topped with miniature marinated poach pears.  This was excellent.  I asked the wine aficionado at the table to help me identify a slight flowery taste in the dish, since she's the one with the trained palate.  I remember my friend's ex boyfriend kept calling out across the table that "they" were pears....um....when he quieted down the Napa-queen identified the flower essence in the pudding as violet.  o...m....g....what lovely attention to taste they have here.
Oh my. What to say about this place, it's cool, it's chic, it's deceptively casual, and the waitstaff are geniuses. We had reservations, thank goodness, and we enjoyed a leisurely dinner lasting a couple of hours. Tapas, wine, dessert, entrees, and the open kitchen is wonderful to watch. Loved it and can't wait to go back!  Our waiter was wonderful; recognized our tablemates (we are not locals) and spoiled us all terribly. Wow and wow.
Came here last month with some friends and had a wonderful time! We had came here for lunch so it wasn't too packed at all. Service and ambiance was great! I like how we can talk in our normal indoor voice and still hear everything. We started out with the calamari and the flat bread. Both were very good! They also give you a bread on the side with olive oil to dip in as well. I ordered the Chicken Pita and that was really tasty and came with a side of salad. The pita is in a phyllo dough, so its a little bit oilier than I expected, but it was still good. Overall, I really enjoyed this place and would come again!
I came here for business lunch at once. I liked food and amibiance  but could not really enjoy meal here as I really concentrated in the conversations. Afterwards, I revisited here for dinner with my friend and had really good experience. We shared some appetizers and daily special fish, a whole fish cooked in oven with safran. It was pretty good (although I did not remmeber the name of fish...). The service here is nicde as well, the wait person is very friendly and caring. It became one of my favorites in Palo Alto downtown.
Thanks to Chef Jim W and  John for a wonderful dinner here.  The ambience and the staff at Evvia are all very friendly and attentive. We started with the Gigantes, Saghanaki and a lovely artichoke and eggplant appetizer prepared by Chef Jim W.   We could have stopped here and been perfectly happy not continuing with an entree.  Which we didn't.  :-) They do have a corkage fee for wine if you choose to bring your own.  I did bring my own, a 2004 Cakebread Pinot Noir.  This wine paired excellently with both the entrees and the selection of appetizers we selected.  Now, I am totally impressed with Evvia's wine list.  They have a terrific selection of old and new world wines to select from.  John was very knowledgeable about the wine list and more then capable of making recommendations.  That is one quality I was enjoy about going to a restaurant. Onto the entrees:  Psari Psito and Kokinisto me Manestra.  The Psari Psito was a sole in a  lemon-oregano vinaigrette with vegetables.  The fish basically melted in your mouth.  The Kokinisto me Manestra, braised lamb shank, lovely, falling off the bone.  We share both dishes.  You can't come to this restaurant and not try this dish.  Others around us ordered the lamb chops which also looked divine. We had absolutely no room for dessert but, I will have to come back here another time for an after dinner treat and dessert wine. All in all I give this restaurant 5 stars as since the entire experience was fabulous.
Came here for a birthday dinner for a friend and tried the Evvia Pita (pita with caramelized onions, Kalamata olives, tomatoes, myzithra cheese & Greek basil) and Soutzoukakia (grilled lamb meatballs with tomato & green olive compote). Both were appetizer dishes but I loved them together. Also got to try a little of the Kotopoulo (rotisserie chicken) which was also wonderful. Service here was good, the staff was nice enough store our cake in the back and light the candles for us. This place seems to get packed so a reservation is definitely recommended. Atmosphere is nice though and liked the dimmed lighting and decor. Wouldn't mind returning if I was in the area.
An ex boyfriend whom I hadn't seen in many many MANY years picked this spot for a casual reunion lunch.  Gee, that's not fraught with *meaning* or anything!  Hahaha. Fortunately, my appetite is undaunted by the prospect of a potentially heart wrenching, emotional throw-down.  I was sold on the lamb riblets from the get go.  Plus I kinda just dig the word "riblets".  Giggle. Lunch was pretty good.  We ordered the Galaktika Borabora (ok yes I know that's clearly NOT the name but that's my version of the actual Greek name cuz DUH I'm Chinese.  Not Greek.) for dessert and it was good, but sorta just tasted like a creme filled eggroll.  Does everything simply boil down to Chinese food for me?  Sorta, yeah. Bottom line:  great place for catching up with an old friend.  No emotional drama at all, thank goodness.  Just pass on the icky licorice flavored candies by the door!!  Blech.
Excellent ambiance, service, and vibe. Entrees pricey but it's well worth the expert presentation and delicious food. I had the: Solomos - grilled salmon fillet with lemon potato puree & tomato ouzo sauce was my dish of choice....finished it with pleasure. Great for a business dinner or nice night out with your loved one/ones!
It's funny when you go to Palo Alto, you know it's a nice city but when you walk down University you wouldn't necessarily think that some of the most affluent people in CA are dining around you. But that's the feeling I get when I eat at places like Evvia. It's not a pretentious place by any means. The service was good and people were friendly. You just get the sense that this is one of the select dining spots for PA families. Either that or every PE or VC person working on Sand Hill or in downtown PA. In terms of ambiance, I wouldn't mind going back but just make sure you're at least business casual so you don't look too out of place. My overall experience was good but I didn't think the food was that amazing. Tried the Souvlaki and lamb for entrees. Lamb was good. Tender meat but the flavoring was a bit bland. Souvlaki is a kebab that sits on top of some rice. Meat was extremely tender and the rice had a lemon flavoring which wasn't bad. Good texture to the dish. Lamb chops and shrimps for appetizers. Lamb was good and meat was very tender. The shrimp was too salty IMO. I'll probably come back to give this place another chance. It's a nice place but I need to find a dish that's worth coming back for.
I'm shocked I forgot to review Evvia. I am still overwhelmed by the quality of food. This place is outstanding. The food is very original, the spices are mingled in such a way that makes you want to try every plate on the menu just to see if your palate can handle it. I ordered the goat dish and my date ordered the lamb shanks. My first time with goat - I loved it. It must have been marinated for at least a week (although I don't know how naturally tender goat is.) The goat was served in a bowl with vegetables and some type of beef/veal stock. It was the most deliciously aromatic dish I have ever had. My date ordered the lamb shanks. These were fantastic also. In fact, when I go back, i will certainly order these. The wine list is nice and they even have their own house label syrah - which is cool, but not very good. For apps, we only ordered olives, but they were really good too. The four stars (really 4.5) was due to the service which I wasn't very fond of. My server was a bit uptight and pretentious in a place that I wouldn't expect that. My date has been there before and she said she's noticed it on previous occasions also. I will certainly return.
I must have walked by this place 50 times when I used to go to the bar next door, when it used to be called F&As.  Finally, now that I don't just booze, I figured I'd try the restaurant next door.  Definitely an older professional crowd. Nicely prepared medium rare lamb, tasty grilled octopus.  Nothing I'd add that hasn't been said before.   I think it'd be a nice place for a special occasion.  Polite service.
Evvia is a long-standing Palo Alto fave for good reason. When dining with a group, I like to order the house appetizer plate. At lunch, the lamb sandwich in a freshly baked pita is amazing. At dinner, the lamb riblets on the appetizer menu are delish. Beware the Greek coffee at the end of the meal. I like the mezzo (medium-sweet) version but always want to drink more than I should - and then I end up regretting the sludge-y grounds. If only I had more self-control at this piace...
Wife had the dry aged ribeye which melted in our mouths like butter and I had the lamb chops which was very tender. After sprinkling some lemon juice and kosher salt on the chops the flavor was just amazing. The tad bit of gaminess became nonexistent. The staff was very friendly and welcoming-- because we had our 10 month baby the manager made sure to sit us in a comfortable booth or a large table and our waiter went even as far as watching our Khloe and taking her around the restaraunt so we could enjoy our meal. For dessert we had the souffle with ice cream, which would have been more enjoyabe if they didn't use dark chocolate. We were dressed casual and I expected the staff to be stuck up but they were not. We had an excellent dining experience. Reservations are  recommended.
My partner and I ate here at lunch for our anniversary.  We had fabulous service; our server brought us two desserts for our anniversary.  The sommelier was very knowledgeable and helped us pick a perfect wine.  Our octopus appetizer was perfect.  The bread and olive oil are awesome.  My moussaka was to die for.  The only slightly less than perfect moment was that my partner's lamb in the lamb sandwich was a bit overcooked, perhaps it had been on the spit too long.  Overall a really nice way to spend our anniversary.
Fabulous restaurant, I dream of the lamp chops and lamb shank and also the ragu sauce!!! We continue to go whenever we can!!! Kokkari is just as good too!
Great atmosphere with tasty dishes. Depending on what time you come, you may see a whole lamb being roasted over open flame. Try the octopus, and of course the lamb. You really can't go wrong here. You'll probably want to dress a slightly formal at this place. You'll see a mid 35 - 65 year olds dining here.
It's amazing food. ...note, I'm saying that about Greek food, which really doesn't happen much.  I kind of take Jeffrey Steingarten's opinion on Greek food as a rule.  "How good is Greek food?  The British love it." Their basic Greek salad has the perfect blend of cucumbers, tomato, feta, kalamata olives, etc.  Light and refreshing, with flavor.   Their grilled octopus  is the only treatment I've had where the octopus isn't too chewy, and I love octopus.  Their lamb is spectacular, grilled to perfection, and seasoned just enough to add flavor without hiding the flavor of the lamb.  Their moussaka is to die for, with rich creamy beschamel, and a perfect blend of eggplant and lamb. The atmosphere is wonderful, very upscale cozy, if there is such a thing, and the smells from the open grill add to the place w/o adding unsettling ambiance elements like smoke and oils.  The wait staff is well organized, skilled, and knowledgeable. I watched them debone a fish with remarkable ease, and still kept the entire dish looking very presentable. It's a bit pricey, but you get what you pay for, and if you don't, you should go eat in 'n out.  It's worth it for a nice place to eat out. If you get the chance do the family style prix fixe menu.
Greek food to die for. Lamb chops that will melt in your mouth. Excellent service. I want to go specifically for the tasting menu.   Always think of it, but never order it.
Came back tonight and had 3 new apps: Melitzanokeftethes (eggplant & kefalotiri cakes with roasted pepper & cumin yogurt) - Didn't get much eggplant flavor, more of a starchy cake with a tart yogurt on top, served with julienned cucumbers.  Only 2 cakes, very small portion. Garides tou Fourno (oven baked prawns with tomato & feta) - Prawns were nicely done but tasted like an Italian dish.  Flavors weren't remarkable. Octapodaki tou Yiorgou (traditional grilled octopus with lemon, oregano & olive oil) - Tender octopus with good flavor, good portion too. We had the lamb chops again but this time it wasn't served as hot.  The lemon also wasn't baked like last time so when we squeezed the juice, it didn't help the temperature of the chops. The other 2 wood oven baked appetizers weren't as hot as they could be either.  The kitchen might have had an off night but at these prices, the food and cooking should be spot on. Fortunately, the Galaktoboureko was still good, and a nice ending to the meal. Service was great and the server let us try a few wines before we settled on an excellent glass of Pinot Noir. 3 stars, I was pretty generous with my last review.
We came here for my bday dinner last night and had a great meal. Bread was very good, so good we ate... Read more 
Positively GORGEOUS restaurant. The food is fresh and well prepared. With the exception of slightly dry pork. The service is fun and professional. The phyllo custard dessert with pistachio ice cream has made it to the all time favorites list. The bathroom has an automatic sink. Don't try to press the "button" because it ain't one. Lots of old people here. I'm in the low end of the 25-33 age demographic and this place is full of grandpas and grandmas. But I suppose who else could afford to live in Palo Alto and eat fancy schmancy Greek food?
I was amazed to see Palo Alto's supposedly scene emerge into trying to have the city scene and feel.  It was even a revelation to spend a warm summer evening at an obscure Emerson side-street off-University Avenue with Sales and Marketing folks at work. Perhaps because I am now wiser and I am tired of flexing my intellectual muscles, since I've now enjoyed flexing my real muscles, I have a newfound respect for the Sales and Marketing folks of corporate America.  Not because they have surpringly recommended this beautiful venue, but maybe because the dollar's value is dwindling and I am now keen in trying to find ways of maintaining my lifestyle, so I better like selling and positioning products, right? Yes, I am moving to sales, and yes, I'm too old for technical and intellectual bouts of aggrandizement. Beyond boring you with my Proustian and Nietzschean lamentations let me get to the point. The apps were fresh and great!  Fresh Mediterranean octopus salad was sublime, while the usual Greek dolma stuffed with al dente risotto melted in my mouth, the tender lamb rack and mixed salads made my evening, it was not enough.  We also enjoyed two nice bottles of red, our main was also fabulous.  I enjoyed tenderly grilled beef fillet over a pilaf that represented the Ottoman and Byzantinian empire with a mofo' vengeance. The company was yet another eye-opener.  I anticipated getting bored, but on the contrary, it was yet again another lesson learned... It's never over, until the fat lady sings. Evvia good job, Palo Alo, I'm impressed. But, nah, I ain't moving at all, if I move to any suburbs, it's back to Italy (only in Cagliari, please).
I've been on a search for some good Greek/Mediterranean food.  Evvia was definitely satisfying. For appetizers, we ordered the grilled octopus and the traditional Greek salad.  The grilled octopus seemed a bit too charred.  The serving size was a little small.  The taste was okay.  The salad had fresh, firm tomatoes and cucumbers. Entrees included the lamb shank and the lamb chops.  The lamb chops were delicious!!!  There were 3 chops marinated very well and was grilled to perfection.  They were tasty, tender, and juicy.  The chops were served with 3 potato wedges, which amounted to half a potato.  The lamb shank was also good, but not as good as the lamb chops.  It was a healthy portion served with some risotto.  For dessert, I tried the custard filled pastry with pistachio ice cream.  It was served hot!  Do make room for dessert! Overall, it was a delicious meal in a very intimate atmosphere.
Nom nom nom nom. AMAZING. Pork chops - succulent, perfect ratio between fat and lean meat, wonderfully marinated and seasoned Galaktoboureko (not sure how to pronounce this) - best dessert I've had in a while. The phyllo wrapped vanilla bean semolina custard filled with cream was DELICIOUS. The pistachio ice cream since it left a weird tang on my tongue. However, it had real pistachio in it. Mmmm. Service was great. Our waiter was very nice. One of the rare places that deserves a full 5 stars!
After doing a brief saunter down University Ave, we entered into Evvia and were promptly seated (Thank You Open Table). This is a high end Greek restaurant with very generous proportions.  The wine list is amicable with the paring of food.  The service was excellent throughout the entire dining experience.  My only complaint was the music was a little to loud, and made a intimate conversation hard to hear. (Even in a corner table, away from the crowd) We started with: Roasted Beets Dolmathes Entree: Roasted Petroli Sole Grilled Sea Bass Paired with a Peter Michael "Bella Cote"  Chardonnay Desert: Shared a Ravani desert with Greek coffee :) Overall a very good experience, the service was the key Evvia.
